
Leon Trotsky



THE PERMANENT REVOLUTION


(1931)

Transcribed and HTML markup for the Trotsky Internet Archive, a
subarchive of the Marxist writers’ Internet Archive, by Sally Ryan in
1996.
PERMANENT REVOLUTION was first published by the Left Opposition in
Russian in Berlin in 1930.
First English and American editions of PERMANENT REVOLUTION 1931,
re-translated by John G. Wright, for Progress Publishers/Militant
Publishing Association.
Converted to eBook format by Kollektiv Yakov Perelman, from the on-line
version of _The Permanent Revolution_ available at Trotsky Internet
Archive in October 2013. Cover provided by Cm Nikas.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Introduction to the First (Russian) Edition
Introduction to the German Edition
1. The Enforced Nature of This Work and Its Aim
2. The Permanent Revolution is Not a “Leap” by the Proletariat, but the
Reconstruction of the Nation under Leadership of the Proletariat
3. Three Elements of the “Democratic Dictatorship”: Classes, Tasks and
Political Mechanics
4. What did the Theory of the Permanent Revolution Look Like in
Practice?
5. Was the “Democratic Dictatorship” Realized in Our Country? If so,
When?
6. On the Skipping of Historical Stages
7. What does the Slogan of the Democratic Dictatorship Mean Today for
the East
8. From Marxism to Pacifism
9. Epilogue
10. What is the Permanent Revolution? Basic Postulates

The Permanent Revolution



INTRODUCTION TO THE FIRST (RUSSIAN) EDITION (PUBLISHED IN BERLIN)


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

This book is devoted to an issue which is intimately linked with the
history of the three Russian Revolutions. But not with that history
alone. This issue has played an enormous role in recent years in the
internal struggle in the Communist Party of the Soviet Union; it was
then carried into the Communist International, played a decisive role in
the development of the Chinese Revolution and determined a whole number
of most important decisions on problems bound up with the revolutionary
struggle of the countries of the East. This issue has to do with the
theory of the permanent revolution, which, according to the teachings of
the epigones of Leninism (Zinoviev, Stalin, Bukharin, etc.) represents
the original sin of ‘Trotskyism’.

The question of the permanent revolution was once again raised in 1924
after a long interval and, at first sight, quite unexpectedly. There was
no political justification for it; it was a matter of differences of
opinion which belonged to the distant past. But there were important
psychological motives. The group of so-called ‘old Bolsheviks’ who had
opened up a fight against me began by counterposing themselves to me as
the ‘Bolshevik Old Guard’. But a great obstacle in their path was the
year 1917. However important may have been the preceding history of
ideological struggle and preparation, nonetheless, not only with regard
to the party as a whole but also with regard to different individuals,
this whole preceding preparatory period found its highest and
categorical test in the October Revolution. _Not a single one of the
epigones stood up under this test._ Without exception, they all at the
time of the February 1917 Revolution adopted the vulgar position of
democratic Left Wingers. Not a single one of them raised the slogan of
the workers’ struggle for power. They all regarded the course toward a
socialist revolution as absurd or – still worse – as ‘Trotskyism’. In
this spirit they led the party up to the time of Lenin’s arrival from
abroad and the publication of his famous April Theses. After this,
Kamenev, already in direct struggle against Lenin, openly tried to form
a democratic wing of Bolshevism. Later he was joined by Zinoviev, who
had arrived with Lenin. Stalin, heavily compromised by his social-
patriotic position, stepped to the sidelines. He let the party forget
his miserable articles and speeches of the decisive March weeks and
gradually edged over to Lenin’s standpoint. This is why the question
automatically arose: What had any of these leading ‘old Bolsheviks’ got
from Leninism when _not a single_ one of them showed himself capable of
applying independently the theoretical and practical experiences of the
party at a most important and most critical historical moment? Attention
had to be diverted from this question at all costs and another question
substituted for it. To this end, it was decided to concentrate fire on
the permanent revolution. My adversaries did not, of course, foresee
that in creating an artificial axis of struggle they would imperceptibly
be compelled to revolve it around themselves and to manufacture, by the
method of inversion, a new world outlook for themselves.

In its essential features, the theory of the permanent revolution was
formulated by me even before the decisive events of 1905. Russia was
approaching the bourgeois revolution. No one in the ranks of the Russian
Social Democrats (we all called ourselves Social Democrats then) had any
doubts that we were approaching a bourgeois revolution, that is, a
revolution produced by the contradictions between the development of the
productive forces of capitalist society and the outlived caste and state
relationships of the period of serfdom and the Middle Ages. In the
struggle against the Narodniks and the anarchists, I had to devote not a
few speeches and articles in those days to the Marxist analysis of the
bourgeois character of the impending revolution.

The bourgeois character of the revolution could not, however, answer in
advance the question of which classes would solve the tasks of the
democratic revolution and what the mutual relationships of these classes
would be. It was precisely at this point that the fundamental
strategical problems began.

Plekhanov, Axelrod, Zasulich, Martov and, following them, all the
Russian Mensheviks, took as their point of departure the idea that to
the liberal bourgeoisie, as the natural claimant to power, belonged the
leading role in the bourgeois revolution. According to this pattern, the
party of the proletariat was assigned the role of Left Wing of the
democratic front. The Social Democrats were to support the liberal
bourgeoisie against the reaction and at the same time to defend the
interests of the proletariat against the liberal bourgeoisie. In other
words, the Mensheviks understood the bourgeois revolution principally as
a liberal-constitutional reform.

Lenin posed the question in an altogether different manner. For Lenin,
the liberation of the productive forces of bourgeois society from the
fetters of serfdom signified, first and foremost, a radical solution of
the agrarian question in the sense of complete liquidation of the
landowning class and revolutionary redistribution of landownership.
Inseparably connected with this was the destruction of the monarchy.
Lenin attacked the agrarian problem, which affected the vital interests
of the overwhelming majority of the population and at the same time
constituted the basic problem of the capitalist market, with a truly
revolutionary boldness. Since the liberal bourgeoisie, which confronts
the worker as an enemy, is intimately bound by innumerable ties to large
landed property, the genuine democratic liberation of the peasantry can
be realised only by the revolutionary co-operation of the workers and
peasants. According to Lenin, their joint uprising against the old
society must, if victorious, lead to the establishment of the
‘democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and peasantry’.

This formula is now repeated in the Communist International as a sort of
supra-historical dogma, with no attempt to analyse the living historical
experiences of the last quarter-century – as though we had not been
witnesses and participants in the Revolution of 1905, the February
Revolution of 1917, and finally the October Revolution. Such a
historical analysis, however, is all the more necessary because never in
history has there been a regime of the ‘democratic dictatorship of the
proletariat and peasantry’.

In 1905, it was a question with Lenin of a strategical hypothesis still
to be verified by the actual course of the class struggle. The formula
of the democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and peasantry bore in
large measure an intentionally algebraic character. Lenin did not solve
in advance the question of what the political relationships would be
between the two participants in the assumed democratic dictatorship,
that is, the proletariat and the peasantry. He did not exclude the
possibility that the peasantry would be represented in the revolution by
an independent party – a party independent in a double sense, not only
with regard to the bourgeoisie but also with regard to the proletariat,
and at the same time capable of realising the democratic revolution in
alliance with the party of the proletariat in struggle against the
liberal bourgeoisie. Lenin even allowed the possibility – as we shall
soon see – that the revolutionary peasants’ party might constitute the
majority in the government of the democratic dictatorship.

In the question of the decisive significance of the agrarian revolution
for the fate of our bourgeois revolution, I was, at least from the
autumn of 1902, that is, from the time of my first flight abroad, a
pupil of Lenin’s. That the agrarian revolution, and consequently, the
general democratic revolution also, could be realised only by the united
forces of the workers and the peasants in struggle against the liberal
bourgeoisie, was for me, contrary to all the senseless fairy tales of
recent years, beyond any doubt. Yet I came out against the formula
‘democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the peasantry’, because
I saw its shortcoming in the fact that it left open the question of
which class would wield the real dictatorship. I endeavoured to show
that in spite of its enormous social and revolutionary weight the
peasantry was incapable of creating a really independent party and even
less capable of concentrating the revolutionary power in the hands of
such a party. Just as in the old revolutions, from the German
Reformation of the sixteenth century, and even before that, the
peasantry in its up-risings gave support to one of the sections of the
urban bourgeoisie and not infrequently ensured its victory, so, in our
belated bourgeois revolution, the peasantry might at the peak of its
struggle extend similar support to the proletariat and help it to come
to power. From this I drew the conclusion that our bourgeois revolution
could solve its tasks radically only in the event that the proletariat,
with the aid of the multi-millioned peasantry, proved capable of
concentrating the revolutionary dictatorship in its own hands.

What would be the social content of this dictatorship? First of all, it
would have to carry through to the end the agrarian revolution and the
democratic reconstruction of the State. In other words, the dictatorship
of the proletariat would become the instrument for solving the tasks of
the historically-belated bourgeois revolution. But the matter could not
rest there. Having reached power the proletariat would be compelled to
encroach even more deeply upon the relationships of private property in
general, that is to take the road of socialist measures.

‘But do you really believe,’ the Stalins, Rykovs and all the other
Molotovs objected dozens of times between 1905 and 1917, ‘that Russia is
ripe for the socialist revolution?’ To that I always answered: No, I do
not. But world economy as a whole, and European economy in the first
place, is fully ripe for the socialist revolution. Whether the
dictatorship of the proletariat in Russia leads to socialism or not, and
at what tempo and through what stages, will depend upon the fate of
European and world capitalism.

These were the essential features of the theory of the permanent
revolution at its origin in the early months of 1905. Since then, three
revolutions have taken place. The Russian proletariat rose to power on
the mighty wave of the peasant insurrection. The dictatorship of the
proletariat became a fact in Russia earlier than in any of the
immeasurably more developed countries of the world. In 1924, that is, no
more than seven years after the historical prognosis of the theory of
the permanent revolution had been confirmed with quite exceptional
force, the epigones opened up a frenzied attack against this theory,
plucking isolated sentences and polemical rejoinders out of old works of
mine which I had by then completely forgotten.

It is appropriate to recall here that the first Russian revolution broke
out more than half a century after the wave of bourgeois revolutions in
Europe and thirty-five years after the episodic uprising of the Paris
Commune. Europe had time to grow unaccustomed to revolutions. Russia had
not experienced any. All the problems of the revolution were posed anew.
It is not difficult to understand how many unknown and conjectural
magnitudes the future revolution held for us in those days. The formulae
of all the groupings were, each in their own way, working hypotheses.
One must have complete incapacity for historical prognosis and utter
lack of understanding of its methods in order now, after the event, to
consider analyses and evaluations of 1905 as though they were written
yesterday. I have often said to myself and to my friends: I do not doubt
that my prognoses of 1905 contained many defects which it is not hard to
show up now, after the event. But did my critics see better and further?
Not having re-read my old works for a long time, I was ready in advance
to admit to defects in them more serious and important than really were
there. I became convinced of this in 1928, when the political leisure
imposed upon me by exile in Alma-Ata gave me the opportunity to re-read,
pencil in hand, my old writings on the problems of the permanent
revolution. I hope that the reader, too, will be thoroughly convinced of
this by what he reads in the pages that follow.

It is nevertheless necessary, within the limits of this introduction, to
present as exact as possible a characterization of the constituent
elements of the theory of the permanent revolution, and the most
important objections to it. The dispute has so broadened and deepened
that it now embraces in essence all the most important questions of the
world revolutionary movement.

The permanent revolution, in the sense which Marx attached to this
concept, means a revolution which makes no compromise with any single
form of class rule, which does not stop at the democratic stage, which
goes over to socialist measures and to war against reaction from
without: that is, a revolution whose every successive stage is rooted in
the preceding one and which can end only in the complete liquidation of
class society.

To dispel the chaos that has been created around the theory of the
permanent revolution, it is necessary to distinguish three lines of
thought that are united in this theory.

First, it embraces the problem of the transition from the democratic
revolution to the socialist. This is in essence the historical origin of
the theory.

The concept of the permanent revolution was advanced by the great
Communists of the middle of the nineteenth century, Marx and his
co-thinkers, in opposition to the democratic ideology which, as we know,
claims that with the establishment of a ‘rational’ or democratic state
all questions can be solved peacefully by reformist or evolutionary
measures. Marx regarded the bourgeois revolution of 1848 as the direct
prelude to the proletarian revolution. Marx ‘erred’. Yet his error has a
factual and not a methodological character. The Revolution of 1848 did
not turn into the socialist revolution. But that is just why it also did
not achieve democracy. As to the German Revolution of 1918, it was no
democratic completion of the bourgeois revolution, it was a proletarian
revolution decapitated by the Social Democrats; more correctly, it was a
bourgeois _counter-revoIution_, which was compelled to preserve
pseudo-democratic forms after its victory over the proletariat.

Vulgar ‘Marxism’ has worked out a pattern of historical development
according to which every bourgeois society sooner or later secures a
democratic regime, after which the proletariat, under conditions of
democracy, is gradually organized and educated for socialism. The actual
transition to socialism has been variously conceived: the avowed
reformists pictured this transition as the reformist filling of
democracy with a socialist content (Jaurès); the formal revolutionists
acknowledged the inevitability of applying revolutionary violence in
the; transition to socialism (Guesde). But both the former and the
latter considered democracy and socialism, for all peoples and
countries, as two stages in the development of society which are not
only entirely distinct but also separated by great distances of time
from each other. This view was predominant also among those Russian
Marxists who, in the period of 1905, belonged to the Left Wing of the
Second International. Plekhanov, the brilliant progenitor of Russian
Marxism, considered the idea of the dictatorship of the proletariat a
delusion in contemporary Russia. The same standpoint was defended not
only by the Mensheviks but also by the overwhelming majority of the
leading Bolsheviks, in particular by those present party leaders,
without exception, who in their day were resolute revolutionary
democrats but for whom the problems of the socialist revolution, not
only in 1905 but also on the eve of 1917, still signified the vague
music of a distant future.

The theory of the permanent revolution, which originated in 1905,
declared war upon these ideas and moods. It pointed out that the
democratic tasks of the backward bourgeois nations lead directly, in our
epoch, to the dictatorship of the proletariat and that the dictatorship
of the proletariat puts socialist tasks on the order of the day. Therein
lay the central idea of the theory. While the traditional view was that
the road to the dictatorship of the proletariat led through a long
period of democracy, the theory of the permanent revolution established
the fact that for backward countries the road to democracy passed
through the dictatorship of the proletariat. Thus democracy is not a
regime that remains self-sufficient for decades, but is only a direct
prelude to the socialist revolution. Each is bound to the other by an
unbroken chain. Thus there is established between the democratic
revolution and the socialist reconstruction of society a permanent state
of revolutionary development.

The second aspect of the ‘permanent’ theory has to do with the socialist
revolution as such. For an indefinitely long time and in constant
internal struggle, all social relations undergo transformation. Society
keeps on changing its skin. Each stage of transformation stems directly
from the preceding. This process necessarily retains a political
character, that is, it develops through collisions between various
groups in the society which is in transformation. Outbreaks of civil war
and foreign wars alternate with periods of ‘peaceful’ reform.
Revolutions in economy, technique, science, the family, morals and
everyday life develop in complex reciprocal action and do not allow
society to achieve equilibrium. Therein lies the permanent character of
the socialist revolution as such.

The international character of the socialist revolution, which
constitutes the third aspect of the theory of the permanent revolution,
flows from the present state of economy and the social structure of
humanity. Internationalism is no abstract principle but a theoretical
and political reflection of the character of world economy, of the world
development of productive forces and the world scale of the class
struggle. The socialist revolution begins on national foundations – but
it cannot be completed within these foundations. The maintenance of the
proletarian revolution within a national framework can only be a
provisional state of affairs, even though, as the experience of the
Soviet Union shows, one of long duration. In an isolated proletarian
dictatorship, the internal and external contradictions grow inevitably
along with the successes achieved. If it remains isolated, the
proletarian state must finally fall victim to these contradictions. The
way out for it lies only in the victory of the proletariat of the
advanced countries. Viewed from this standpoint, a national revolution
is not a self-contained whole; it is only a link in the international
chain. The international revolution constitutes a permanent process,
despite temporary declines and ebbs.

The struggle of the epigones is directed, even if not always with the
same clarity, against all three aspects of the theory of the permanent
revolution. And how could it be otherwise, when it is a question of
three inseparably connected parts of a whole? The epigones mechanically
separate the _democratic_ and the _socialist_ dictatorships. They
separate the _national_ socialist revolution from the _international_.
They consider that, in essence, the conquest of power within national
limits is not the initial act but the final act of the revolution; after
that follows the period of reforms that lead to the national socialist
society. In 1905, they did not even grant the idea that the proletariat
could conquer power in Russia earlier than in Western Europe. In 1917,
they preached the self-sufficing democratic revolution in Russia and
spurned the dictatorship of the proletariat. In 1925-27, they steered a
course toward national revolution in China under the leadership of the
national bourgeoisie. Subsequently, they raised the slogan for China of
the democratic dictatorship of the workers and peasants in opposition to
the slogan of the dictatorship of the proletariat. They proclaimed the
possibility of the construction of an isolated and self-sufficient
socialist society in the Soviet Union. The world revolution became for
them, instead of an indispensable condition for victory, only a
favourable circumstance. This profound breach with Marxism was reached
by the epigones in the process of permanent struggle against the theory
of the permanent revolution.

The struggle, which began with an artificial revival of historical
reminiscences and the falsification of the distant past, led to the
complete transformation of the world outlook of the ruling stratum of
the revolution. We have already repeatedly explained that this
re-evaluation of values was accomplished under the influence of the
social needs of the Soviet bureaucracy, which became ever more
conservative, strove for national order and demanded that the
already-achieved revolution, which insured privileged positions to the
bureaucracy, should now be considered adequate for the peaceful
construction of socialism. We do not wish to return to this theme here.
Suffice it to note that the bureaucracy is deeply conscious of the
connection of its material and ideological positions with the theory of
national socialism. This is being expressed most crassly right now, in
spite of, or rather because of, the fact that the Stalinist machine of
government, under the pressure of contradictions which it did not
foresee, is driving to the left with all its might and inflicting quite
severe blows upon its Right-Wing inspirers of yesterday. The hostility
of the bureaucrats toward the Marxist Opposition, whose slogans and
arguments they have borrowed in great haste, is not, as we know,
diminishing in the least. The condemnation of the theory of the
permanent revolution, and an acknowledgment, even if only indirect, of
the theory of socialism in one country, is demanded, first and foremost,
of those Oppositionists who raise the question of their re-admission
into the party for the purpose of supporting the course toward
industrialization, etc. By this the Stalinist bureaucracy reveals the
purely _tactical_ character of its left turn which goes along with
retention of its national-reformist _strategical_ foundations. It is
superfluous to explain what this means; in politics as in war, tactics
are in the long run subordinated to strategy.

The question has long ago gone beyond the specific sphere of the
struggle against ‘Trotskyism’. Gradually extending itself, it has to-day
embraced literally all the problems of the revolutionary world outlook.
Either permanent revolution or socialism in one country – this
alternative embraces at the same time the internal problems of the
Soviet Union, the prospects of revolution in the East, and finally, the
fate of the Communist International as a whole.

The present work does not examine this question from all these sides; it
is not necessary to repeat what has been already said in other works. In
the _Criticism of the Draft Programme of the Communist International_
[1], I have endeavoured to disclose theoretically the economic and
political untenability of national socialism. The theoreticians of the
Comintern have kept mum about this. That is indeed the only thing left
for them to do. In this book I above all restore the theory of the
permanent revolution as it was formulated in 1905 with regard to the
internal problems of the Russian revolution. I show wherein my position
actually differed from Lenin’s, and how and why it coincided with
Lenin’s position in every decisive situation. Finally, I endeavour to
reveal the decisive significance of this question for the proletariat of
the backward countries, and thereby for the Communist International as a
whole.

What charges have been brought against the theory of the permanent
revolution by the epigones? If we discard the innumerable contradictions
of my critics, then their entire and truly vast body of writing can be
reduced to the following propositions:

-   Trotsky ignored the difference between the bourgeois revolution and
    the socialist revolution. Already in 1905 he considered that the
    proletariat of Russia was directly faced with the tasks of a
    socialist revolution.
-   Trotsky completely forgot the agrarian question. The peasantry did
    not exist for him. He depicted the revolution as a matter of single
    combat between the proletariat and Tsarism.
-   Trotsky did not believe that the world bourgeoisie would tolerate
    for any length of time the existence of the dictatorship of the
    Russian proletariat, and regarded its downfall as inevitable unless
    the proletariat of the West seized power within a very short period
    and came to our assistance. Thereby Trotsky underestimated the
    pressure of the Western European proletariat upon its own
    bourgeoisie.
-   Trotsky does not in general believe in the power of the Russian
    proletariat, in its ability to construct socialism independently;
    and that is why he has put and still puts all his hopes in the
    international revolution.

These motifs run through not only the numberless writings and speeches
of Zinoviev, Stalin, Bukharin and others, but they are also formulated
in the most authoritative resolutions of the Communist Party of the
Soviet Union and the Communist International. And in spite of that, one
is compelled to say that they are based upon a mixture of ignorance and
dishonesty.

The first two contentions of the critics are, as will be shown later on,
false to the very roots. No, I proceeded precisely from the
bourgeois-democratic character of the revolution and arrived at the
conclusion that the profundity of the agrarian crisis could raise the
proletariat of backward Russia to power. Yes, this was precisely the
idea I defended on the eve of the 1905 Revolution. This was precisely
the idea that was expressed by the very designation of the revolution as
a ‘permanent’, that is, an uninterrupted one, a revolution passing over
directly from the bourgeois stage into the socialist. To express the
same idea Lenin later used the excellent expression of the bourgeois
revolution _growing over_ into the socialist. The conception of ‘growing
over’ was counterposed by Stalin, after the event (in 1924), to the
permanent revolution, which he presented as a direct leap from the realm
of autocracy into the realm of socialism. This ill-starred
‘theoretician’ did not even bother to ponder the question: What meaning
can there be to the _permanency_ of the revolution, that is, its
_uninterrupted_ development, if all that is involved is a mere leap?

As for the third accusation, it was dictated by the short-lived faith of
the epigones in the possibility of _neutralizing_ the _imperialist_
bourgeoisie for an unlimited time with the aid of the ‘shrewdly’
organized pressure of the proletariat. In the years 1924-27, this was
Stalin’s central idea. The Anglo-Russian Committee was its fruit.
Disappointment in the possibility of binding the world bourgeoisie hand
and foot with the help of Purcell, Radic, LaFollette and Chiang Kai-shek
led to an acute paroxysm of fear of an immediate war danger. The
Comintern is still passing through this period.

The fourth objection to the theory of the permanent revolution simply
amounts to saying that I did not in 1905 defend the standpoint of the
theory of socialism in one country which Stalin first manufactured for
the Soviet bureaucracy in 1924. This accusation is a sheer historical
curiosity. One might actually believe that my opponents, insofar as they
thought politically at all in 1905, were of the opinion then that Russia
was ripe for an independent socialist revolution. As a matter of fact,
in the period 1905-17 they were tireless in accusing me of utopianism
because I allowed the probability that the Russian proletariat could
come to power before the proletariat of Western Europe. Kamenev and
Rykov accused Lenin of utopianism in April 1917, and therewith they
explained to Lenin in simple language that the socialist revolution must
first be achieved in Britain and in the other advanced countries before
it could be Russia’s turn. The same standpoint was defended by Stalin,
too, up to April 4, 1917. Only gradually and with difficulty did he
adopt the Leninist formula of the dictatorship of the proletariat in
contradistinction to the democratic dictatorship. In the spring of 1924,
Stalin was still repeating what others had said before him: taken
separately, Russia is not ripe for the construction of a socialist
society. In the autumn of 1924, Stalin, in his struggle against the
theory of the permanent revolution, for the first time discovered the
possibility of building an isolated socialism in Russia. Only then did
the Red Professors collect quotations for Stalin which convicted Trotsky
of having believed in 1905 – how terrible! – that Russia could reach
socialism only with the aid of the proletariat of the West.

Were one to take the history of the ideological struggle over a period
of a quarter-century, cut it into little pieces, mix them in a mortar,
and then command a blind man to stick the pieces together again, a
greater theoretical and historical jumble of nonsense could hardly
result than the one with which the epigones feed their readers and
hearers.

To illumine the connection of yesterday’s problems with today’s, one
must recall here, even if only very generally, what the leadership of
the Comintern, that is, Stalin and Bukharin, perpetrated in China.

Under the pretext that China was faced with a national liberationist
revolution, the leading role was allotted in 1924 to the Chinese
bourgeoisie. The party of the national bourgeoisie, the Kuomintang, was
officially recognised as the leading party. Not even the Russian
Mensheviks went that far in 1905 in relation to the Cadets (the party of
the liberal bourgeoisie).

But the leadership of the Comintern did not stop there. It compelled the
Chinese Communist Party to enter the Kuomintang and submit to its
discipline. In special telegrams from Stalin, the Chinese Communists
were urged to curb the agrarian movement. The workers and peasants
rising in revolt were forbidden to form their own soviets in order not
to alienate Chiang Kai-shek, whom Stalin defended against the
Oppositionists as a ‘reliable ally’ at a party meeting in Moscow at the
beginning of April, 1927, that is, a few days before the
counter-revolutionary coup d’etat in Shanghai.

The official subordination of the Communist Party to the bourgeois
leadership, and the official prohibition of forming soviets (Stalin and
Bukharin taught that the Kuomintang ‘took the place’ of soviets), was a
grosser and more glaring betrayal of Marxism than all the deeds of the
Mensheviks in the years 1905-1917.

After Chiang Kai-shek’s coup d’etat in April, 1927, a Left Wing, under
the leadership of Wang Ching-wei, split off temporarily from the
Kuomintang. Wang Ching-wei was immediately hailed in _Pravda_ as a
reliable ally. In essence, Wang Ching-wei bore the same relation to
Chiang Kai-shek as Kerensky to Milyukov, with this difference that in
China Milyukov and Kornilov were united in the single person of Chiang
Kai-shek.

After April, 1927, the Chinese party was ordered to enter the ‘Left’
Kuomintang and to submit to the discipline of the Chinese Kerensky
instead of preparing open warfare against him. The ‘reliable’ Wang
Ching-wei crushed the Communist Party, and together with it the workers’
and peasants’ movement, no less brutally than Chiang Kai-shek, whom
Stalin had declared his reliable ally.

Though the Mensheviks supported Milyukov in 1905 and afterwards, they
nevertheless did not enter the liberal party. Though the Mensheviks went
hand in hand with Kerensky in 1917, they still retained their own
organisation. Stalin’s policy in China was a malicious caricature even
of Menshevism. That is what the first and most important chapter looked
like.

After its inevitable fruits had appeared – complete decline of the
workers’ and peasants’ movement, demoralisation and breakup of the
Communist Party – he leadership of the Comintern gave the command: ‘Left
about turn!’ and demanded immediate transition to the armed uprising of
the workers and peasants. Up to yesterday the young, crushed and
mutilated Communist Party still served as the fifth wheel in the wagon
of Chiang Kai-shek and Wang Ching-wei, and consequently lacked the
slightest independent political experience. And now suddenly this party
was commanded to lead the workers and peasants – whom the Comintern had
up to yesterday held back under the banner of the Kuomintang – in an
armed insurrection against the same Kuomintang which had meanwhile found
time to concentrate the power and the army in its hands. In the course
of 24 hours a fictitious soviet was improvised in Canton. An armed
insurrection, timed in advance for the opening of the Fifteenth Congress
of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union, expressed simultaneously the
heroism of the advanced Chinese workers and the criminality of the
Comintern leaders. Lesser adventures preceded the Canton uprising and
followed it. Such was the second chapter of the Chinese strategy of the
Comintern. It can be characterised as the most malicious caricature of
Bolshevism. The liberal-opportunist and adventurist chapters delivered a
blow to the Chinese Communist Party from which, even with a correct
policy, it can only recover after a number of years.

The Sixth Congress of the Comintern drew up the balance sheet of all
this work. It gave it unreserved approval. This is hardly surprising,
since the Congress was convoked for this purpose. For the future, the
Congress advanced the slogan ‘democratic dictatorship of the proletariat
and peasantry.’ Wherein this dictatorship would differ from the
dictatorship of the Right or Left Kuomintang, on the one side, and the
dictatorship of the proletariat on the other – this was not explained to
the Chinese Communists. Nor is it possible to explain it.

Proclaiming the slogan of the democratic dictatorship the Sixth Congress
at the same time condemned democratic slogans as impermissible
(constituent assembly, universal suffrage, freedom of speech and of the
press, etc.) and thereby completely disarmed the Chinese Communist Party
in the face of the dictatorship of the military oligarchy. For a long
number of years, the Russian Bolsheviks had mobilized the workers and
peasants around democratic slogans. Democratic slogans played a big role
in 1917. Only after the Soviet power had actually come into existence
and clashed politically with the Constituent Assembly, irreconcilably
and in full view of the entire people, did our party liquidate the
institutions and slogans of formal democracy, that is, bourgeois
democracy, in favour of real soviet democracy, that is, proletarian
democracy.

The Sixth Congress of the Comintern, under the leadership of Stalin and
Bukharin, turned all this upside down. While on the one hand it
prescribed the slogan of ‘democratic’ and not ‘proletarian’ dictatorship
for the party, it simultaneously forbade it to use democratic slogans in
preparing for this dictatorship. The Chinese Communist Party was not
only disarmed, but stripped naked. By way of consolation it was finally
permitted in the period of unlimited domination of the
counter-revolution, to use the slogan of soviets, which had remained
under ban throughout the upsurge of the revolution. A very popular hero
of Russian folk-lore sings wedding songs at funerals and funeral hymns
at weddings. He is soundly thrashed on both occasions. If what was
involved was only thrashings administered to the strategists of the
incumbent leadership of the Comintern, one might perhaps reconcile
oneself to it. But much greater issues are at stake. Involved here is
the fate of the proletariat. The tactics of the Comintern constituted an
unconsciously, but all the more reliably, organized sabotage of the
Chinese Revolution. This sabotage was accomplished with certainty of
success, for the Right Menshevik policy of 1924-27 was clothed by the
Comintern with all the authority of Bolshevism, and at the same time was
protected by the Soviet power, through its mighty machine of repression,
from the criticism of the Left Opposition.

As a result, we saw accomplished a finished experiment of Stalinist
strategy, which proceeded from beginning to end under the flag of a
struggle against the permanent revolution. It was, therefore, quite
natural that the principal Stalinist theoretician of the subordination
of the Chinese Communist Party to the national-bourgeois Kuomintang
should have been Martynov. This same Martynov had been the principal
Menshevik critic of the theory of the permanent revolution from 1905
right up to 1923, the year when he began to fulfil his historic mission
in the ranks of Bolshevism.

The essential facts about the origin of the present work are dealt with
in the first chapter. In Alma-Ata I was unhurriedly preparing a
theoretical polemic against the epigones. The theory of the permanent
revolution was to occupy a large place in this book. While at work, I
received a manuscript by Radek which was devoted to counterposing the
permanent revolution to the strategic line of Lenin. Radek needed to
make this, so to say, unexpected sortie because he was himself submerged
up to his ears in Stalin’s Chinese policy: Radek (together with
Zinoviev) defended the subordination of the Communist Party to the
Kuomintang not only before Chiang Kai-shek’s _coup d’état_ but even
after it.

To provide a basis for the enslavement of the proletariat to the
bourgeoisie, Radek naturally cited the necessity of an alliance with the
peasantry and my ‘underestimation’ of this necessity. Following Stalin,
he too defended Menshevik policy with Bolshevik phraseology. With the
formula of the democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the
peasantry, Radek, following Stalin, once again covered up the fact that
the Chinese proletariat had been diverted from independent struggle for
power at the head of the peasant masses. When I exposed this ideological
masquerade, there arose in Radek the urgent need to prove that my
struggle against opportunism disguising itself with quotations from
Lenin was derived in reality from the contradiction between the theory
of the permanent revolution and Leninism. Radek, speaking as attorney in
defence of his own sins, converted his speech into a prosecutor’s
indictment of the permanent revolution. This served him only as a bridge
to capitulation. I had all the more reason to suspect this since Radek,
years before, had planned to write a pamphlet in defence of the
permanent revolution. Still I did not hasten to write Radek off. I tried
to answer his article frankly and categorically without at the same time
cutting off his retreat. I print my reply to Radek just as it was
written, confining myself to a few explanatory notes and stylistic
corrections.

Radek’s article was not published in the press, and I believe it will
not be published, for in the form in which it was written in 1928 it
could not pass through the sieve of the Stalinist censorship. Even for
Radek himself this article would be downright fatal today, for it would
give a clear picture of his ideological evolution, which very strongly
recalls the ‘evolution’ of a man who throws himself out of a sixth-floor
window.

The origin of this work explains sufficiently why Radek occupies a
larger place in it than it is perhaps his right to claim. Radek did not
think up a single new argument against the theory of the permanent
revolution. He came forward only as an epigone of the epigones. The
reader is, therefore, recommended to see in Radek not simply Radek but
the representative of a certain corporation, in which he purchased an
associate membership at the price of renouncing Marxism. Should Radek
personally feel that too many digs have fallen to his share, then he
should at his own discretion turn them over to the more appropriate
addresses. That is the private affair of the firm. For my part, I raise
no objections.

Various groupings of the German Communist Party have come into power or
fought for it by demonstrating their qualifications for leadership by
means of critical exercises against the permanent revolution. But this
entire literature, emanating from Maslow, Thalheimer and the rest, is on
such a sorry level that it does not even provide a pretext for a
critical answer. The Thaelmanns, the Remmeles and other incumbent
leaders by appointment, have taken this question even a stage lower. All
these critics have succeeded merely in demonstrating that they are
unable to reach even the threshold of the question. For this reason, I
leave them – beyond the threshold. Anyone interested in the theoretical
critiques by Maslow, Thalheimer and the rest, can, after reading this
book, turn to their writings in order to convince himself of the
ignorance and dishonesty of these authors. This will be, so to speak, a
by-product of the work I am offering the reader.

L. TROTSKY
Prinkipo
November 30, 1929

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. Included in The Third International After Lenin, published by Pioneer
Publishers, New York.

The Permanent Revolution



INTRODUCTION TO THE GERMAN EDITION


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

As this book goes to press in the German language, the entire thinking
section of the world working class and, in a sense, the whole of
‘civilized’ humanity is following with particularly keen interest the
economic turn, and its reverberations, now taking place over most of the
former Tsarist empire. The greatest attention in this connection is
aroused by the problem of collectivizing the peasant holdings. This is
hardly surprising: in this sphere the break with the past assumes a
particularly sweeping character. But a correct evaluation of
collectivization is unthinkable without a general conception of the
socialist revolution. And here, on a much higher plane, we once again
become convinced that in the field of Marxist theory there is nothing
that fails to impinge on practical activity. The most remote, and it
would seem, the most ‘abstract’ disagreements, if they are thought out
to the end, will sooner or later be invariably expressed in practice,
and practice does not allow a single theoretical mistake to be made with
impunity.

The collectivization of peasant holdings is, of course, a most necessary
and fundamental part of the socialist transformation of society.
However, the scope and tempo of collectivization are not determined by
the government’s will alone, but, in the last analysis, by the economic
factors: by the height of the country’s economic level, by the
inter-relationship between industry and agriculture, and consequently by
the technical resources of agriculture itself.

Industrialization is the driving force of the whole of modern culture
and by this token the only conceivable basis for socialism. In the
conditions of the Soviet Union, industrialization means first of all the
strengthening of the base of the proletariat as a ruling class.
Simultaneously it creates the material and technical premises for the
collectivization of agriculture. The tempos of these two processes are
interdependent. The proletariat is interested in the highest possible
tempos for these processes to the extent that the new society in the
making is thus best protected from external danger, and at the same time
a source is created for systematically improving the material level of
the toiling masses.

However, the tempos that can be achieved are limited by the general
material and cultural level of the country, by the relationship between
the city and the village and by the most pressing needs of the masses,
who are able to sacrifice their today for the sake of tomorrow _only up
to a certain point_. The optimum tempos, i.e., the best and most
advantageous ones, are those which not only promote the most rapid
growth of industry and collectivization at a given moment, but which
also secure the necessary stability of the social regime, that is, first
of all strengthen the alliance of the workers and peasants, thereby
preparing the possibility for future successes.

From this standpoint, of decisive significance is the general historical
criterion in accordance with which the party and state leadership direct
economic development by means of planning. Here two main variants are
possible: (a) the course outlined above toward the economic
strengthening of the proletarian dictatorship in one country until
further victories of the world proletarian revolution (the viewpoint of
the Russian Left Opposition); and (b) the course toward the construction
of an isolated national socialist society, and this ‘in the shortest
possible time’ (the current official position).

These are two completely different, and, in the last analysis, directly
opposed conceptions of socialism. From these are derived basically
different lines, strategy and tactics.

In the limits of this preface we cannot deal in detail with the question
of building socialism in one country. To this we have devoted a number
of writings, particularly CRITICISM OF THE DRAFT PROGRAM OF THE
COMINTERN. Here we confine ourselves to the fundamental elements of this
question. Let us recall, first of all, that the theory of socialism in
one country was first formulated by Stalin in the autumn of 1924, in
complete contradiction not only to all the traditions of Marxism and the
school of Lenin, but even to what Stalin himself had written in the
spring of the same year. From the standpoint of principle, the departure
from Marxism by the Stalinist ‘school’ on the issues of socialist
construction is no less significant and drastic than, for example, the
break of the German Social Democrats from Marxism on the issues of war
and patriotism in the fall of 1914, exactly ten years before the
Stalinist turn. This comparison is by no means accidental in character.
Stalin’s ‘mistake’, just like the ‘mistake’ of the German Social
Democracy, is _national socialism_.

Marxism takes its point of departure from world economy, not as a sum of
national parts but as a mighty and independent reality which has been
created by the international division of labor and the world market, and
which in our epoch imperiously dominates the national markets. The
productive forces of capitalist society have long ago outgrown the
national boundaries. The imperialist war (of 1914-1918) was one of the
expressions of this fact. In respect of the technique of production
socialist society must represent a stage higher than capitalism. To aim
at building a _nationally isolated_ socialist society means, in spite of
all passing successes, to pull the productive forces backward even as
compared with capitalism. To attempt, regardless of the geographical,
cultural and historical conditions of the country’s development, which
constitutes a part of the world unity, to realize a shut-off
proportionality of all the branches of economy within a national
framework, means to pursue a reactionary utopia. If the heralds and
supporters of this theory nevertheless participate in the international
revolutionary struggle (with what success is a different question) it is
because, as hopeless eclectics, they mechanically combine abstract
internationalism with reactionary utopian national socialism. The
crowning expression of this eclecticism is the program of the Comintern
adopted by the Sixth Congress.

In order to expose graphically one of the main theoretical mistakes
underlying the national socialist conception we cannot do better than
quote from a recently published speech of Stalin, devoted to the
internal questions of American Communism.[1] ‘It would be wrong,’ says
Stalin, arguing against one of the American factions, ‘to ignore the
specific peculiarities of American capitalism. The Communist party must
take them into account in its work. But it would be still more wrong to
base the activities of the Communist party on these specific features,
since the foundation of the activities of every Communist party,
including the American Communist Party, on which it must base itself,
must be the _general features_ of capitalism, which are the _same for
all countries_, and not its specific features in any given country. _It
is precisely on this that the internationalism of the Communist parties
rests._ The specific features are merely _supplementary_ to the general
features.’ (BOLSHEVIK, No.1, 1930, p.8. Our emphasis)

These lines leave nothing to be desired in the way of clarity. Under the
guise of providing an economic justification for internationalism,
Stalin in reality presents a justification for national socialism. It is
false that world economy is simply a sum of national parts of one and
the same type. It is false that the specific features are ‘merely
supplementary to the general features,’ like warts on a face. In
reality, the national peculiarities represent an original combination of
the basic features of the world process. This originality can be of
decisive significance for revolutionary strategy over a span of many
years. Suffice it to recall that the proletariat of a backward country
has come to power many years before the proletariat of the advanced
countries. This historic lesson alone shows that in spite of Stalin, it
is absolutely wrong to base the activity of the Communist parties on
some ‘general features’, that is, on an abstract type of national
capitalism. It is utterly false to contend that ‘this is what the
internationalism of the Communist parties rests upon’. In reality, it
rests on the insolvency of the national state, which has long ago
outlived itself and which has turned into a brake upon the development
of the productive forces. National capitalism cannot be even understood,
let alone reconstructed, except as a part of world economy.

The economic peculiarities of different countries are in no way of a
subordinate character. It is enough to compare England and India, the
United States and Brazil. But the specific features of national economy,
no matter how great, enter as component parts and in increasing measure
into the higher reality which is called world economy and on which
alone, in the last analysis, the internationalism of the Communist
parties rests.

Stalin’s characterization of national peculiarities as a simple
‘supplement" to the general type, is in crying and therewith not
accidental contradiction to Stalin’s understanding (that is, his lack of
understanding) of the law of uneven development of capitalism. This law,
as is well known, is proclaimed by Stalin as the most fundamental, most
important and universal of laws. With the help of the law of uneven
development, which he has converted into an empty abstraction, Stalin
tries to solve all the riddles of existence. But the astonishing thing
is that he does not notice that _national peculiarity is nothing else
but the most general product of the unevenness of historical
development, its summary result, so to say_. It is only necessary to
understand this unevenness correctly, to consider it in its full extent,
and also to extend it to the pre-capitalist past. A faster or slower
development of the productive forces; the expanded, or, contrariwise,
the contracted character of entire historical epochs – for example, the
Middle Ages, the guild system, enlightened absolutism, parliamentarism;
the uneven development of different branches of economy, different
classes, different social institutions, different fields of culture –
all these lie at the base of these national ‘peculiarities’. The
peculiarity of a national social type is the crystallization of the
unevenness of its formation.

The October Revolution came as the most momentous manifestation of the
unevenness of the historic process. The theory of the permanent
revolution gave the prognosis of the October Revolution; by this token
this theory rested on the law of uneven development, not in its abstract
form, but in its material crystallization in Russia’s social and
political peculiarity.

Stalin has dragged in the law of uneven development not in order to
foresee in time the seizure of power by the proletariat of a backward
country, but in order, after the fact, in 1924, to foist upon the
already victorious proletariat the task of constructing a national
socialist society. But it is precisely here that the law of uneven
development is inapplicable, for it does not replace nor does it abolish
the laws of world economy; on the contrary, it is subordinated to them.

By making a fetish of the law of uneven development, Stalin proclaims it
a sufficient basis for national socialism, not as a type common to all
countries, but exceptional, Messianic, purely Russian. It is possible,
according to Stalin, to construct a self-sufficient socialist society
only in Russia. By this alone he elevates Russia’s national
peculiarities not only above the ‘general features’ of every capitalist
nation, but also above world economy as a whole. It is just here that
the fatal flaw in Stalin’s whole conception begins. The peculiarity of
the USSR is so potent that it makes possible the construction of its own
socialism within its own borders, regardless of what happens to the rest
of mankind. As regards other countries, to which the Messianic seal has
not been affixed, their peculiarities are merely ‘supplementary’ to the
general features, only a wart on the face. ‘It would be wrong,’ teaches
Stalin, ‘to base the activities of the Communist parties on these
specific features’. This moral holds good for the American C.P., and the
British, and the South African and the Serbian, but – not for the
Russian, whose activity is based not on the ‘general features’ but
precisely on the ‘peculiarities.’ From this flows the thoroughly
dualistic strategy of the Comintern. While the USSR ‘liquidates the
classes’ and builds socialism, the proletariat of all the other
countries, in complete disregard of existing national conditions, is
obligated to carry on uniform activity according to the calendar (First
of August, March Sixth, etc.). Messianic nationalism is supplemented by
bureaucratically abstract internationalism. This dualism runs through
the whole program of the Comintern, and deprives it of any principled
significance.

If we take Britain and India as polarized varieties of the capitalist
type, then we are obliged to say that the internationalism of the
British and Indian proletariats does not at all rest on an _identity_ of
conditions, tasks and methods, but on their indivisible
_interdependence_. Successes for the liberation movement in India
presuppose a revolutionary movement in Britain and vice versa. Neither
in India, nor in England is it possible to build an _independent_
socialist society. Both of them will have to enter as parts into a
higher whole. Upon this and only upon this rests the unshakable
foundation of Marxist internationalism.

Recently, on March 8, 1930, PRAVDA expounded anew Stalin’s ill-starred
theory, in the sense that ‘socialism, as a social-economic formation,’
that is, as a definite system of production relations, can be fully
realized ‘on the national scale of the USSR.’ Something else again is
‘the _final victory of socialism_’ in the sense of a guarantee against
the intervention of capitalist encirclement – such a final victory of
socialism ‘actually demands the triumph of the proletarian revolution in
several advanced countries.’ What an abysmal decline of theoretical
thought was required for such shoddy scholasticism to be expounded with
a learned air in the pages of the central organ of Lenin’s party! If we
assume for a minute the possibility of realizing socialism as a finished
social system within the isolated framework of the USSR, then that would
be the ‘final victory’ – because in that case what talk could there be
about a possible intervention? The socialist order presupposes high
levels of technology and culture and solidarity of population. Since the
USSR., at the moment of complete construction of socialism, will have,
it must be assumed, a population of between 200,000,000 and 250,000.000,
we then ask: What intervention could even be talked of then? What
capitalist country, or coalition of countries, would dare think of
intervention in these circumstances? The only conceivable intervention
could come from the side of the USSR. But would it be needed? Hardly.
The example of a backward country, which in the course of several
Five-Year Plans was able to construct a mighty socialist society with
its own forces, would mean a death blow to world capitalism, and would
reduce to a minimum, if not to zero, the costs of the world proletarian
revolution. This is why the whole Stalinist conception actually leads to
the liquidation of the Communist International. And indeed, what would
be its historical significance, if the fate of socialism is to be
decided by the highest possible authority – the State Planning
Commission of the USSR? In that case, the task of the Comintern, along
with the notorious ‘Friends of the Soviet Union,’ would be to protect
the construction of socialism from intervention, that is, in essence, to
play the role of frontier patrols.

The article mentioned attempts to prove the correctness of the Stalinist
conception with the very newest and freshest economic arguments: ‘...
Precisely now, ‘says PRAVDA, ‘when productive relations of a socialist
type are taking deeper root not only in industry but also in agriculture
through the growth of state farms, through the gigantic rise,
quantitatively and qualitatively, of the collective-farm movement and
the liquidation of the kulaks as a class on the basis of complete
collectivization, precisely now what is shown dearest of all is the
sorry bankruptcy of the Trotskyite-Zinovievite theory of defeat, which
has meant in essence “the Menshevik denial of the legitimacy of the
October Revolution” (Stalin)’. (PRAVDA, March 8, 1930.)

These are truly remarkable lines, and not merely for their glib tone
which covers a complete confusion of thought. Together with Stalin, the
author of PRAVDA’s article accuses the ‘Trotskyite’ conception of
‘denying the legitimacy of the October Revolution.’ But it was exactly
on the basis of this conception, that is, the theory of the permanent
revolution, that the writer of these lines _foretold the inevitability_
of the October Revolution, thirteen years before it took place. And
Stalin? Even after the February Revolution, that is seven to eight
months prior to the October Revolution, he came forward as a vulgar
revolutionary democrat. It was necessary for Lenin to arrive in
Petrograd (April 3, 1917) with his merciless struggle against the
conceited ‘Old Bolsheviks,’ whom Lenin ridiculed so at that time, for
Stalin carefully and noiselessly to glide over from the democratic
position to the socialist. This inner ‘growing over’ of Stalin, which by
the way was never completed, took place, at any rate, not earlier than
12 years after I had offered proof of the ‘legitimacy’ of the seizure of
power by the working class of Russia before the beginning of the
proletarian revolution in the West.

But, in elaborating the theoretical prognosis of the October Revolution,
I did not at all believe that, by conquering state power, the Russian
proletariat would exclude the former Tsarist empire from the orbit of
world economy. We Marxists know the role and meaning of state power. It
is not at all a passive reflection of economic processes, as the Social
Democratic servants of the bourgeois state depict it. Power can have a
gigantic significance, reactionary as well as progressive, depending on
which class holds power in its hands. But state power is nonetheless an
instrument of the superstructural order. The passing of power from the
hands of Tsarism and the bourgeoisie into the hands of the proletariat
abolishes neither the processes nor the laws of world economy. To be
sure, for a certain time after the October Revolution, the economic ties
between the Soviet Union and the world market were weakened. But it
would be a monstrous mistake to make a generalization out of a
phenomenon that was merely a brief stage in the dialectical process. The
international division of labor and the supra-national character of
modern productive forces not only retain but will increase twofold and
tenfold their significance for the Soviet Union in proportion to the
degree of Soviet economic ascent.

Every backward country integrated with capitalism has passed through
various stages of decreasing or increasing dependence upon the other
capitalist countries, but in general the tendency of capitalist
development is toward a colossal growth of world ties, which is
expressed in the growing volume of foreign trade, including, of course,
capital export. Britain’s dependence upon India naturally bears a
qualitatively different character from India’s dependence upon Britain.
But this difference is determined, at bottom, by the difference in the
respective levels of development of their productive forces, and not at
all by the degree of their economic self- sufficiency. India is a
colony; Britain, a metropolis. But if Britain were subjected today to an
economic blockade, it would perish sooner than would India under a
similar blockade. This, by the way, is one of the convincing
illustrations of the reality of world economy.

Capitalist development – not in the abstract formulas of the second
volume of CAPITAL, which retain all their significance as a _stage in
analysis_, but in historical reality – took place and could only take
place by a systematic expansion of its base. In the process of its
development, and consequently in the struggle with its internal
contradictions, every national capitalism turns in an ever-increasing
degree to the reserves of the ‘external market,’ that is, the reserves
of world economy. The uncontrollable expansion growing out of the
permanent internal crises of capitalism constitutes a progressive force
up to the time when it turns into a force fatal to capitalism.

Over and above the internal contradictions of capitalism, the October
Revolution inherited from old Russia the contradictions, no less
profound, between capitalism as a whole and the pre-capitalist forms of
production. These contradictions possessed, as they still do, a material
character, that is, they are embodied in the material relations between
town and country, they are lodged in the particular proportions or
disproportions between the various branches of industry and in the
national economy as a whole, etc. Some of the roots of these
contradictions lie directly in the geographical and demographical
conditions of the country, that is, they are nurtured by the abundance
or scarcity of one or another natural resource, the historically-created
distribution of the masses of the population, and so on. The strength of
Soviet economy lies in the nationalization of the means of production
and their planned direction. The weakness of Soviet economy, in addition
to the backwardness inherited from the past, lies in its present
post-revolutionary isolation, that is, in its inability to gain access
to the resources of world economy, not only on a socialist but even on a
capitalist basis, that is, in the shape of normal international credits
and ‘financing’ in general, which plays so decisive a role for backward
countries. Meanwhile, the contradictions of the Soviet Union’s
capitalist and pre-capitalist past not only do not disappear of
themselves, but on the contrary rise up from the recovery from the years
of decline and destruction; they revive and are aggravated with the
growth of Soviet economy, and in order to be overcome or even mitigated
they demand at every step that access to the resources of the world
market be achieved.

To understand what is happening now in the vast territory which the
October Revolution awakened to new life, it is necessary to take clearly
into account that to the old contradictions recently revived by the
economic successes there has been added a new and most powerful
contradiction between the concentrated character of Soviet industry,
which opens up the possibility of unexampled tempos of development, and
the isolation of Soviet economy, which excludes the possibility of a
normal utilization of the reserves of world economy. The new
contradiction, pressing down upon the old ones, leads to this, that
alongside of tremendous successes, painful difficulties arise. These
find their most immediate and onerous expression, felt daily by every
worker and peasant, in the fact that the conditions of the toiling
masses do not keep step with the general rise of the economy, but are
even growing worse at present as a result of the food difficulties. The
sharp crises of Soviet economy are a reminder that the productive forces
created by capitalism are not adapted to national markets, and can be
socialistically coordinated and harmonized only on an international
scale. To put it differently, the crises of Soviet economy are not
merely maladies of growth, a sort of infantile sickness, but something
far more significant – namely, they are the harsh curbings of the world
market, the very one ‘to which,’ in Lenin’s words, ‘we are subordinated,
with which we are bound up, and from which we cannot escape.’ (Speech at
the Eleventh Party Congress, March 27, 1922).

From the foregoing, however, there in no way follows a denial of the
historical ‘legitimacy’ of the October Revolution, a conclusion which
reeks of shameful philistinism. The seizure of power by the
international proletariat cannot be a single, simultaneous act. The
political superstructure – and a revolution is part of the
‘superstructure’ – has its own dialectic, which intervenes imperiously
in the process of world economy, but does not abolish its deep-going
laws. The October Revolution is ‘legitimate’ as the _first stage of the
world revolution_ which unavoidably extends over decades. The interval
between the first and the second stage has turned out to be considerably
longer than we had expected. Nevertheless it remains an interval, and it
is by no means converted into a self-sufficient epoch of the building of
a national socialist society.

Out of the two conceptions of the revolution there stem two guiding
lines on (Soviet) economic questions. The first swift economic
successes, which were completely unexpected by Stalin, inspired him in
the fall of 1924 with the theory of socialism in one country as the
culmination of the practical prospect of an isolated national economy.
It was precisely in this period that Bukharin advanced his famous
formula that by protecting ourselves from world economy by means of the
monopoly of foreign trade, we should be in a position to build socialism
‘although at a tortoise pace.’ This was the common formula of the bloc
of the Centrists (Stalin) with the Rights (Bukharin). Already at that
time, Stalin tirelessly propounded the idea that the tempo of our
industrialization is our ‘own affair,’ having no relation whatever to
world economy. Such a national smugness naturally could not last long,
for it reflected the first, very brief stage of economic revival, which
necessarily revived our dependence on the world market. The first shocks
of international dependence, unexpected by the national socialists,
created an alarm, which in the next stage turned into panic. We must
gain economic ‘independence’ as speedily as possible with the aid of the
speediest possible tempos of industrialization and collectivization! –
this is the transformation that has taken place in the economic policy
of national socialism in the past two years. Creeping and penny-pinching
was replaced all along the line by adventurism. The theoretical base
under both remains the same: the national socialist conception.

The basic difficulties, as has been shown above, derive from the
objective situation, primarily from the isolation of the Soviet Union.
We shall not pause here to consider to what extent this objective
situation is itself a product of the subjective mistakes of the
leadership (the false policy in Germany in 1923, in Bulgaria and Estonia
in 1924, in Britain and Poland in 1926, in China in 1925-27; the current
false strategy of the ‘Third Period,’ etc., etc.). But the sharpest
convulsions in the USSR are created by the fact that the incumbent
leadership tries to make a virtue out of necessity, and out of the
political isolation of the workers’ state constructs a program of an
economically-isolated socialist society. This has given rise to the
attempt at complete socialist collectivization of peasant holdings on
the basis of a pre-capitalist inventory – a most dangerous adventure
which threatens to undermine the very possibility of collaboration
between the proletariat and the peasantry.

Remarkably, just at the moment when this has become delineated in all
its sharpness, Bukharin, yesterday’s theoretician of the ‘tortoise
pace,’ has composed a pathetic hymn to the present-day ‘furious gallop’
of industrialization and collectivization. It is to be feared that this
hymn, too, will presently be declared the greatest heresy. For there are
already new melodies in the air. Under the influence of the resistance
of economic reality, Stalin has been compelled to beat a retreat. Now
the danger is that yesterday’s adventuristic offensive, dictated by
panic, may turn into a panic-stricken retreat. Such alternation of
stages results inexorably from the nature of national socialism.

A realistic program for an isolated workers’ state cannot set itself the
goal of achieving ‘independence’ from world economy, much less of
constructing a national socialist society ‘in the shortest time.’ The
task is not to attain the abstract maximum tempo, but the optimum tempo,
that is, the best, that which follows from both internal and world
economic conditions, strengthens the position of the proletariat,
prepares the national elements of the future international socialist
society, and at the same time, and above all, systematically improves
the living standards of the proletariat and strengthens its alliance
with the non-exploiting masses of the countryside. This prospect must
remain in force for the whole preparatory period, that is, until the
victorious revolution in the advanced countries liberates the Soviet
Union from its present isolated position.

Some of the thoughts expressed here are developed in greater detail in
other works by the author, particularly in the ‘Criticism of the Draft
Program of the Comintern.’ In the near future I hope to publish a
pamphlet specially devoted to an evaluation of the present stage of
economic development of the USSR. To these works I am obliged to direct
the reader who seeks a closer acquaintance with the way in which the
problem of the permanent revolution is posed _today_. But the
considerations brought out above are sufficient, let me hope, to reveal
the full significance of the struggle over principles which was carried
on in recent years, and is being carried on right now in the shape of
two contrasting theories: _socialism in one country_ versus _the
permanent revolution_. Only this topical significance of the question
justifies the fact that we present here to foreign readers a book that
is largely devoted to a critical reproduction of the pre-revolutionary
prognoses and theoretical disputes among the Russian Marxists. A
different form of exposition of the questions that interest us might, of
course, have been selected. But this form was never created by the
author, and was not selected by him of his own accord. It was imposed
upon him partly by the opponent’s will and partly by the very course of
political development. Even the truths of mathematics, the most abstract
of the sciences, can best be learned in connection with the history of
their discovery. This applies with even greater force to the more
concrete, i.e. historically-conditioned truths of Marxist politics. The
history of the origin and development of the prognoses of the revolution
under the conditions of pre-revolutionary Russia will, I think, bring
the reader much closer and far more concretely to the essence of the
revolutionary tasks of the world proletariat than a scholastic and
pedantic exposition of these political ideas, torn out of the conditions
of struggle which gave them birth.

March 29, 1930.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Stalin delivered this speech on May 6, 1929; it was first published
early in 1930, in circumstances that cause it to acquire a sort of
‘programmatic’ significance. – _L.T._

The Permanent Revolution



1. THE ENFORCED NATURE OF THIS WORK, AND ITS AIM


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

The demand for theory in the party under the leadership of the
Right-Centrist bloc has been met for six successive years by
anti-Trotskyism, this being the one and only product available in
unlimited quantities and for free distribution. Stalin engaged in theory
for the first time in 1924, with the immortal articles against the
permanent revolution. Even Molotov was baptized as a ‘leader’ in this
font. Falsification is in full swing. A few days ago I happened upon an
announcement of the publication in German of Lenin’s writings of 1917.
This is an invaluable gift to the advanced German working class. One
can, however, picture in advance what a lot of falsifications there will
be in the text and more especially in the notes. It is enough to point
out that first place in the table of contents is given to Lenin’s
letters to Kollontai in New York. Why? Merely because these letters
contain harsh remarks about me, based on _completely false_ information
from Kollontai, who had given her organic Menshevism an inoculation of
hysterical ultra-leftism in those days. In the Russian edition the
epigones were compelled to indicate, even if only ambiguously, that
Lenin had been misinformed. But it may be assumed that the German
edition will not present even this evasive reservation. We might also
add that in the same letters of Lenin to Kollontai there are furious
assaults upon Bukharin, with whom Kollontai was then in solidarity. This
aspect of the letters has been suppressed, however, for the time being.
It will be made public only when an open campaign against Bukharin is
launched. We shall not have to wait very long for that. [1] On the other
hand a number of very valuable documents, articles and speeches of
Lenin’s, as well as minutes, letters, etc., remain concealed only
because they are directed against Stalin and Co. and undermine the
legend of ‘Trotskyism.’ Of the history of the three Russian revolutions,
as well as the history of the party, literally not a single shred has
been left intact: theory, facts, traditions, the heritage of Lenin, all
these have been sacrificed to the struggle against ‘Trotskyism,’ which
was invented and organized, after Lenin was taken ill, as a personal
struggle against Trotsky, and which later developed into a struggle
against Marxism.

It has again been confirmed that what might appear as the most useless
raking up of long-extinct disputes usually satisfies some unconscious
social requirement of the day, a requirement which, in itself, does not
follow the line of old disputes. The campaign against ‘the old
Trotskyism’ was in a reality a campaign against the October traditions,
which had become more and more cramping and unbearable for the new
bureaucracy. They began to characterize as ‘Trotskyism’ everything they
wanted to get rid of. Thus the struggle against Trotskyism gradually
became the expression of the theoretical and political _reaction_ among
broad non-proletarian and partly also among proletarian circles, and the
reflection of this reaction inside the party. In particular, the
caricatured and historically distorted counterposition of the permanent
revolution to Lenin’s line of ‘alliance with the _muzhik_’ sprang
full-grown in 1923. It arose along with the period of social, political
and party reaction, as its most graphic expression, as the organic
antagonism of the bureaucrat and the property-owner to world revolution
with its ‘permanent’ disturbances, and the yearning of the
petty-bourgeoisie and officialdom for tranquillity and order. The
vicious baiting of the permanent revolution served, in turn, only to
clear the ground for the theory of socialism in one country, that is,
for the latest variety of national socialism. In themselves, of course,
these new social roots of the struggle against ‘Trotskyism’ do not prove
anything either for or against the correctness of the theory of the
permanent revolution. Yet, without an understanding of these hidden
roots, the controversy must inevitably bear a barren academic character.

In recent years I have not found it possible to tear myself away from
the new problems and return to old questions which are bound up with the
period of the 1905 Revolution, in so far as these questions are
primarily concerned with my past and have been artificially used against
it. To give an analysis of the old differences of opinion and
particularly of my old mistakes, against the background of the situation
in which they arose – an analysis so thorough that these controversies
and mistakes would become comprehensible to the young generation, not to
speak of the old-timers who have fallen into political second childhood
– this would require a whole volume to itself. It seemed monstrous to me
to waste my own and others’ time upon it, when constantly new questions
of enormous importance were being placed on the order of the day: the
tasks of the German Revolution, the question of the future fate of
Britain, the question of the interrelationship of America and Europe,
the problems broached by the strikes of the British proletariat, the
tasks of the Chinese Revolution and, lastly and mainly, our own internal
economic and socio-political contradictions and tasks – all this, I
believe, amply justified my continual putting-off of my
historico-polemical work on the permanent revolution. But social
consciousness abhors a vacuum. In recent years this theoretical vacuum
has been, as I have said, filled up with the rubbish of anti-Trotskyism.
The epigones, the philosophers and the brokers of party reaction slipped
down ever lower, went to school under the dull-witted Menshevik
Martynov, trampled Lenin underfoot, floundered around in the swamp, and
called all this the struggle against Trotskyism. In all these years they
have not managed to produce a single work serious or important enough to
be mentioned out loud without a feeling of shame; they did not bring
forth a single political appraisal that has retained its validity, not a
single prognosis that has been confirmed, not a single independent
slogan that has advanced us ideologically. Nothing but trash and
hack-work everywhere.

Stalin’s PROBLEMS OF LENINISM constitutes a codification of this
ideological garbage, an official manual of narrow-mindedness, an
anthology of enumerated banalities (I am doing my best to find the most
moderate designations possible). LENINISM by Zinoviev is ... Zinovievist
Leninism, and nothing more or less. Zinoviev acts almost on Luther’s
principle. But whereas Luther said, ‘Here I stand; I cannot do
otherwise.’ Zinoviev says, ‘Here I stand ... but I can do otherwise,
too.’ To occupy oneself in either case with these theoretical products
of epigonism is equally unbearable, with this difference: that in
reading Zinoviev’s LENINISM one experiences the sensation of choking on
loose cotton-wool, while Stalin’s Problems evokes the sensation of
finely-chopped bristles. These two books are, each in its own way, the
image and crown of the epoch of ideological reaction.

Fitting and adjusting all questions, whether from the right or the left,
from above or below, from before or behind – to Trotskyism, the epigones
have finally contrived to make every world event directly or indirectly
dependent upon how the permanent revolution looked to Trotsky in 1905.
The legend of Trotskyism, chock-full of falsifications, has become to a
certain extent a factor in contemporary history. And while the
right-centrist line of recent years has compromised itself in every
continent by bankruptcies of historic dimensions, the struggle against
the centrist ideology in the Comintern is today already unthinkable, or
at least made very difficult, without an evaluation of the old disputes
and prognosis that originated at the beginning of 1905.

The resurrection of Marxist, and consequently Leninist, thought in the
party is unthinkable without a polemical _auto-da-fé_ of the scribblings
of the epigones, without a merciless theoretical execution of the
Party-machine ushers. [2] It is really not difficult to write such a
book. All its ingredients are to hand. But it is also hard to write such
a book, precisely because in doing so one must, in the words of the
great satirist Saltykov, descend into the domain of ‘ABC effluvia’ and
dwell for a considerable time in this scarcely ambrosial atmosphere.
Nevertheless, the work has become absolutely unpostponable, for it is
precisely upon the struggle against the permanent revolution that the
defence of the opportunist line in the problems of the East, that is,
the larger half of humanity, is directly constructed.

I was already on the point of entering into this hardly alluring task of
theoretical polemic with Zinoviev and Stalin, putting aside our Russian
classics for my recreation hours (even divers must rise to the surface
now and then to breathe a draught of fresh air) when, quite unexpected
by me, an article by Radek appeared and began to circulate, devoted to
the ‘more profound’ counterposition of the theory of the permanent
revolution to Lenin’s views on this subject. At first I wanted to put
Radek’s work aside, lest I be distracted from the combination of loose
cotton-wool and finely chopped bristles intended for me by fate. But a
number of letters from friends induced me to read Radek’s work more
attentively, and I came to the following conclusion: for a smaller
circle of persons who are capable of thinking independently and not upon
command, and are conscientiously studying Marxism, Radek’s work is more
dangerous than the official literature – just as opportunism in politics
is all the more dangerous the more camouflaged it is and the greater the
personal reputation that covers it. Radek is one of my closest political
friends. This has been amply witnessed by the events of the latest
period. In recent months, however, various comrades have followed with
misgivings the evolution of Radek, who has moved all the way over from
the extreme Left Wing of the Opposition to its Right Wing. All of us who
are Radek’s intimate friends know that his brilliant political and
literary gifts, which are combined with an exceptional impulsiveness and
impressionability, are qualities which constitute a valuable source of
initiative and criticism under conditions of collective work, but which
can produce entirely different fruits under conditions of isolation.
Radek’s latest work – in connection with a number of his actions
preceding it – leads to the opinion that Radek has lost his compass, or
that his compass is under the influence of a steady magnetic
disturbance. Radek’s work is in no sense an episodic excursion into the
past. No, it is an insufficiently thought-out but no less harmful
contribution in support of the official course, with all its theoretical
mythology.

The above-characterized political function of the present struggle
against ‘Trotskyism’ naturally does not in any way signify that within
the Opposition, which took shape as the Marxist buttress against the
ideological and political reaction, internal criticism is inadmissable,
in particular criticism of my old differences of opinion with Lenin. On
the contrary such a work of self-clarification could only be fruitful.
But here, at all events, a scrupulous preservation of historical
perspective, a serious investigation of original sources and an
illumination of the past differences in the light of the present
struggle, would be absolutely necessary. There is not a trace of all
this in Radek. As if unaware of what he is doing, he simply falls into
step with the struggle against ‘Trotskyism,’ utilizing not only the
one-sidedly selected quotations, but also the utterly false official
interpretations of them. Where he seemingly separates himself from the
official campaign, he does it in so ambiguous a manner that he really
supplies it with the twofold support of an ‘important’ witness. As
always happens in a case of ideological backsliding, the latest work of
Radek does not contain a single trace of his political perspicacity and
his literary skill. It is a work without perspective, without depth, a
work solely on the plane of quotations, and precisely for this reason –
_flat_.

Out of what political needs was it born? Out of the differences of
opinion that arose between Radek and the overwhelming majority of the
Opposition on the questions of the Chinese Revolution. A few objections
are heard, it is true, to the effect that the differences of opinion on
China are ‘not relevant today’ (Preobrazhensky). But these objections do
not merit serious consideration. The whole of Bolshevism grew and
definitely took shape in the criticism and the assimilation of the
experiences of 1905, in all their freshness, while these experiences
were still an _immediate experience_ of the first generation of
Bolsheviks. How could it be otherwise? And what other event could the
new generation of proletarian revolutionists learn from today if not
from the fresh, still uncongealed experiences of the Chinese Revolution,
still reeking with blood? Only lifeless pedants are capable of
‘postponing’ the questions of the Chinese Revolution, in order to study
them later on at leisure and in ‘tranquillity’. It becomes
Bolshevik-Leninists all the less, since the revolutions in the countries
of the East have in no sense been removed from the order of the day and
their dates are not known to anybody.

Adopting a false position on the problems of the Chinese Revolution,
Radek attempts to justify this position retrospectively by a one-sided
and distorted presentation of my old differences of opinion with Lenin.
And this is where Radek is compelled to borrow weapons from another’s
arsenal and to navigate without a compass in another’s channel.

Radek is my friend, but the truth is dearer to me. I am compelled once
again to set aside the more extensive work on the problems of revolution
in order to refute Radek. Questions have been raised that are far too
important to ignore, and they have been raised point-blank. I have a
threefold difficulty to overcome here: the multiplicity and variety of
errors in Radek’s work; the profusion of literary and historical facts
over twenty-three years (1905-28) that refute Radek; and thirdly, the
short time that I can devote to this work, for the economic problems of
the USSR are pressing to the foreground.

All these circumstances determine the character of the present work.
This work does not exhaust the question. There is much that remains
unsaid – in part, incidentally, because it is a sequel to other works,
primarily the CRITICISM OF THE DRAFT PROGRAMME OF THE COMMUNIST
INTERNATIONAL. Mountains of factual material which I have assembled on
this question must remain unused – pending the writing of my
contemplated book against the epigones, that is, against the official
ideology of the era of reaction.

Radek’s work on the permanent revolution rests on the conclusion:

‘The new section of the party (The Opposition) is threatened with the
danger of the rise of tendencies which will tear the development of the
proletarian revolution away from its ally – the peasantry.’

One is first of all astonished by the fact that this conclusion
concerning a ‘new’ section of the party is adduced during the second
half of the year 1928 as a new conclusion. We have already heard it
reiterated constantly since the autumn of 1923. But how does Radek
justify his going-over to the main official thesis? Again, not in a new
way: He turns back to the theory of the permanent revolution. In
1924-25, Radek more than once intended to write a pamphlet dedicated to
proving the idea that the theory of the permanent revolution and Lenin’s
slogan of the democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and peasantry,
taken on an historical scale – that is, in the light of the experience
of our three revolutions – could in no case be counterposed to each
other but were, on the contrary, essentially the same. Now, after having
thoroughly examined the question ‘anew’ – as he writes to one of his
friends – Radek has reached the conclusion that the old theory of the
permanent revolution threatens the ‘new’ section of the party with
nothing more or less than the danger of a breach with the peasantry.

But how did Radek ‘thoroughly examine’ this question? He gives us some
information on this point:

‘We do not have at hand the formulations which Trotsky presented in 1904
in a preface to Marx’s CIVIL WAR IN FRANCE and in 1905 in OUR
REVOLUTION.’

The years are not correctly stated here, but it is not worthwhile to
dwell upon this. The whole point is that the only work in which I
presented my views more or less systematically on the development of the
revolution is a rather extensive article, RESULTS AND PROSPECTS (in OUR
REVOLUTION, Petersburg 1906, pp.224-86). The article in the Polish organ
of Rosa Luxemburg and Tyszko (1909), to which Radek refers, but
unfortunately interprets in Kamenev’s way, lays no claim to completeness
or comprehensiveness. Theoretically this work is based upon the
above-mentioned book OUR REVOLUTION. Nobody is obliged to read this book
now. Since that time such great events have taken place and we have
learned so much from these events that, to tell the truth, I feel an
aversion to the epigones’ present manner of considering new historical
problems not in the light of the living experience of the revolutions
already carried out by us, but mainly in the light of quotations that
relate only to our forecasts regarding what were then _future_
revolutions. Naturally, by this I do not want to deprive Radek of the
right to take up the question from the historico-literary side also. But
in that case, it must be done properly. Radek undertakes to illuminate
the fate of the theory of the permanent revolution in the course of
almost a quarter of a century, and remarks in passing that he ‘has not
at hand’ precisely those documents in which I set down this theory.

I want to point out right here that Lenin, as has become particularly
clear to me now in reading his old articles, never read my basic work
mentioned above. This is probably to be explained not only by the fact
that OUR REVOLUTION, which appeared in 1906, was soon confiscated and
that all of us shortly went into emigration, but also perhaps by the
fact that two-thirds of the book consisted of reprints of old articles.
I heard later from many comrades that they had not read this book
because they thought it consisted exclusively of reprints of old works.
In any case, the few scattered polemical remarks of Lenin against the
permanent revolution are based almost exclusively upon the foreword by
Parvus to my pamphlet BEFORE THE NINTH OF JANUARY; upon Parvus’s
proclamation _No Tsar!_ which remained completely unknown to me; and
upon internal disputes of Lenin’s with Bukharin and others. Never did
Lenin anywhere analyse or quote, even in passing, RESULTS AND PROSPECTS,
and certain objections of Lenin to the permanent revolution, which
obviously have no reference to me, directly prove that he did not read
this work. [3]

It would be rash to suppose, however, that this is just what Lenin’s
‘Leninism’ consists of. But this seems to be Radek’s opinion. In any
case, Radek’s article which I have to examine here shows not only that
he did ‘not have at hand’ my fundamental works, but also that he had
never even read them. If he did, then it was long ago, before the
October Revolution. In any case he did not retain much of it in his
memory.

But the matter does not end there. It was admissible and even
unavoidable in 1905 or 1909 to polemicize with each other over
individual articles that were topical then and even over single
sentences in isolated articles – especially under the conditions of the
split. But today it is impermissible for a revolutionary Marxist, should
he want to review retrospectively this tremendous historical period, not
to ask himself the question: How were the formulas under discussion
applied in practice? How were they interpreted and construed in action?
What tactics were applied? Had Radek taken the trouble to glance through
merely the two books of OUR FIRST REVOLUTION (volume II of my COLLECTED
WORKS), he would not have ventured to write his present work; at all
events, he would have struck out a whole series of his sweeping
contentions. At least, I should like to hope he would.

From these two books Radek would have learned, in the first place, that
in my political activity the permanent revolution in no case signified
for me a jumping-over of the democratic stage of the revolution or any
of its specific steps. He would have convinced himself that, though I
lived in Russia illegally throughout 1905 without any connection with
the emigrants, I formulated the tasks of the successive stages of the
revolution in exactly the same manner as Lenin; he would have learned
that the fundamental appeals to the peasants that were issued by the
central press of the Bolsheviks in 1905 were written by me; that the
NOVAYA ZHIZN (NEW LIFE), edited by Lenin, in an editorial note
resolutely defended my article on the permanent revolution which
appeared in NACHALO (THE BEGINNING); that Lenin’s NOVAYA ZHIZN, and on
occasion Lenin personally, supported and defended invariably those
political decisions of the Soviets of Deputies which were written by me
and on which I acted as reporter nine times out of ten; that, after the
December defeat, I wrote while in prison a pamphlet on tactics in which
I pointed out that the combination of the proletarian offensive with the
agrarian revolution of the peasants was the central strategical problem;
that Lenin had this pamphlet published by the Bolshevik publishing house
_Novaya Volna_ (_New Wave_) and informed me through Knunyants of his
hearty approval; that Lenin spoke at the London Congress in 1907 of my
‘solidarity’ with Bolshevism in my views on the peasantry and the
liberal bourgeoisie. None of this exists for Radek; evidently he did not
have this ‘at hand’ either.

How does the matter stand with Radek in relation to the works of Lenin?
No better, or not much better. Radek confines himself to those
quotations which Lenin did direct against me but quite often intended
for others (for example, Bukharin and Radek; an open reference to this
is found in Radek himself). Radek was unable to adduce a single new
quotation against me; he simply made use of the ready-made quotation
material that almost every citizen of the USSR has ‘at hand’ nowadays.
Radek only added a few quotations in which Lenin elucidated elementary
truths to the anarchists and Socialist-Revolutionaries on the difference
between a bourgeois republic and socialism – and thereupon Radek depicts
matters as if these quotations too had been directed against me. Hardly
credible, but it is true!

Radek entirely avoids those old declarations in which Lenin, very
cautiously and very sparingly but with all the greater weight,
recognized my solidarity with Bolshevism on the basic questions of the
revolution. Here it must not be forgotten for an instant that Lenin did
this at a time when I did not belong to the Bolshevik faction and when
Lenin was attacking me mercilessly (and quite rightly so) for my
conciliationism – not for the permanent revolution, where he confined
himself to occasional objections, but for my conciliationism, for my
readiness to hope for an evolution of the Mensheviks to the left. Lenin
was much more concerned with the struggle against conciliationism than
with the ‘justice’ of isolated polemical blows against the ‘conciliator’
Trotsky.

In 1924, defending against me Zinoviev’s conduct in October 1917. Stalin
wrote:

‘Comrade Trotsky fails to understand Lenin’s letters (on Zinoviev –
_L.T._), their significance and their purpose. Lenin sometimes
deliberately ran ahead, pushing into the forefront mistakes that might
possibly be committed, and criticizing them in advance with the object
of warning the party and of safeguarding it against mistakes. Sometimes
he would even magnify a “trifle” and “make a mountain out of a molehill”
for the same pedagogical purpose.... But to infer from such letters of
Lenin’s (and he wrote quite a number of such letters) the existence of
“tragic” disagreements and to trumpet them forth means not to understand
Lenin’s letters, means not to know Lenin.’ (J. Stalin, TROTSKYISM OR
LENINISM, 1924 [4]).

The idea is here formulated crudely – ‘the style is the man’ – but the
essence of the idea is correct, even though it applies least of all to
the disputes during the October period, which bore no resemblance to
‘molehills.’ But if Lenin used to resort to ‘pedagogical’ exaggerations
and preventive polemics in relation to the closest members of his own
faction, then he did so all the more in relation to an individual who
was at the time outside the Bolshevik faction and preached
conciliationism. It never occurred to Radek to introduce this necessary
corrective coefficient into the old quotations.

In the 1922 foreword of my book THE YEAR 1905, I wrote that my forecast
of the possibility and probability of establishing the dictatorship of
the proletariat in Russia before it was achieved in the advanced
countries was verified in reality 12 years later. Radek, following not
very attractive examples, represents matters as though I had
_counterposed_ this prognosis to Lenin’s strategical line. From the
foreword, however, it can be clearly seen that I dealt with the
prognosis of the permanent revolution from the standpoint of those basic
features which _coincide_ with the _strategic_ line of Bolshevism. When
I speak in a footnote of the ‘rearming’ of the party at the beginning of
1917, then it is certainly not in the sense that Lenin recognized the
previous road of the party as ‘erroneous’ but rather that Lenin came to
Russia – even though delayed, yet opportunely enough for the success of
the revolution – to teach the party to _reject the outlived slogan_ of
the ‘democratic dictatorship’ to which the Stalins, Kamenevs, Rykovs,
Molotovs and others were still clinging. When the Kamenevs grow
indignant at the mention of the ‘rearming,’ this is comprehensible, for
it was undertaken against them. But Radek? He first began to grow
indignant only in 1928, that is, only after he himself had begun to
fight against the necessary ‘rearming’ of the Chinese Communist Party.

Let me remind Radek that my books THE YEAR 1905 (with the criminal
foreword) and THE OCTOBER REVOLUTION played the role, while Lenin was
alive, of fundamental historical textbooks on both revolutions. At that
time, they went through innumerable editions in Russian as well as in
foreign languages. Never did anybody tell me that my books contained a
counterposing of two lines, because at that time, before the revisionist
volte-face by the epigones, no sound-thinking party member subordinated
the October experience to old quotations, but instead viewed old
quotations in the light of the October Revolution.

In connection with this there is one other subject which Radek misuses
in an impermissible manner: Trotsky did acknowledge – he says – that
Lenin was right against him. Of course I did. And in this acknowledgment
there was not one iota of diplomacy. I had in mind the whole historical
road of Lenin, his whole theoretical position, his strategy, his
building of the party. This acknowledgment certainly does not, however,
apply to every single one of the polemical quotations – which are,
moreover, misused today for purposes hostile to Leninism. In 1926, in
the period of the bloc with Zinoviev, Radek warned me that Zinoviev
needed my declaration that Lenin was right, as against me, in order to
screen somewhat the fact that he, Zinoviev, was wrong as against me.
Naturally, I understood this very well. And that is why I said at the
Seventh Plenum of the Executive Committee of the Communist International
that I meant the historical rightness of Lenin and his party, but in no
case the rightness of my present critics, who strive to cover themselves
with quotations plucked from Lenin. Today I am unfortunately compelled
to extend these words to Radek.

With regard to the permanent revolution, I spoke only of the _defects_
of the theory, which were inevitable insofar as it was a question of
_prediction_. At the Seventh Plenum of the ECCI, Bukharin rightly
emphasized that Trotsky did not renounce the conception as a whole. On
the ‘defects’ I shall speak in another, more extensive work, in which I
shall endeavour to present the experiences of the three revolutions and
their application to the further course of the Comintern, especially in
the East. But in order to leave no room for misunderstandings, I wish to
say here briefly: Despite all its defects, the theory of the permanent
revolution, even as presented in my earliest works, primarily RESULTS
AND PROSPECTS (1906), is immeasurably more permeated with the spirit of
Marxism and consequently far closer to the historical line of Lenin and
the Bolshevik Party, than not only the present Stalinist and Bukharinist
retrospective wisdom but also the latest work of Radek.

By this I do not at all want to say that my conception of the revolution
follows, in all my writings, one and the same unswerving line. I did not
occupy myself with collecting old quotations – I am forced to do so now
only by the period of party reaction and epigonism – but I tried, for
better or for worse, to analyse the real processes of life. In the 12
years (1905-17) of my revolutionary journalistic activity, there are
also articles in which the episodic circumstances and even the episodic
polemical exaggerations inevitable in struggle protrude into the
foreground in violation of the strategic line. Thus, for example,
articles can be found in which I expressed doubts about the future
revolutionary role of the peasantry _as a whole, as an estate_, and in
connection with this refused to designate, especially during the
imperialist war, the future Russian revolution as ‘national,’ for I felt
this designation to be ambiguous. But it must not be forgotten here that
the historical processes that interest us, including the processes in
the peasantry, are far more obvious now that they have been accomplished
than they were in those days when they were only developing. Let me also
remark that Lenin – who never for a moment lost sight of the peasant
question in all its gigantic historical magnitude and from whom we all
learned this – considered it uncertain even after the February
Revolution whether we should succeed in tearing the peasantry away from
the bourgeoisie and drawing it after the proletariat. I will say quite
in general to my harsh critics that it is far easier to dig out in one
hour the formal contradictions of another person’s newspaper articles
over a quarter of a century, than it is to preserve, oneself, if only
for a year, unity of fundamental line.

There remains only to mention in these introductory lines one other
completely ritualistic consideration: had the theory of the permanent
revolution been incorrect – says Radek – Trotsky would have assembled a
large faction on that basis. But that did not happen. Therefore it
follows ... that the theory was false.

This argument of Radek’s, _taken as a general proposition_, does not
contain a trace of dialectics. One could conclude from it that the
standpoint of the Opposition on the Chinese Revolution or the position
of Marx on British affairs, was false; that the position of the
Comintern with regard to the reformists in America, in Austria and – if
you wish – in all countries, is false.

If Radek’s argument is taken not in its general
‘historico-philosophical’ form, but only as applied to the question
under discussion, then it hits Radek himself. The argument might have a
shade of sense had I been of the opinion or, what is still more
important, had events shown, that the line of the permanent revolution
_contradicts_ the strategic line of Bolshevism, _stands in conflict_
with it, and _diverges_ from it more and more. Only then would there
have been grounds for two factions. But that is just what Radek wants to
prove. I show, on the contrary, that in spite of all the factional
polemical exaggerations and conjectural accentuations of the question,
the basic strategical line was one and the same. Where, then, should a
second faction have come from? In reality, it turned out that I worked
hand in hand with the Bolsheviks in the first revolution and later
defended this joint work in the international press against the
Menshevik renegades’ criticism. In the 1917 Revolution I fought together
with Lenin against the democratic opportunism of those ‘old Bolsheviks’
who have today been elevated by the reactionary wave and whose sole
armament consists of their baiting of the permanent revolution.

Finally, I never endeavoured to create a grouping on the basis of the
ideas of the permanent revolution. My inner-party stand was a
_conciliationist_ one, and when at certain moments I strove for the
formation of groupings, then it was precisely on this basis. My
conciliationism flowed from a sort of social-revolutionary fatalism. I
believed that the logic of the class struggle would compel both factions
to pursue the same revolutionary line. The great historical significance
of Lenin’s policy was still unclear to me at that time, his policy of
irreconcilable ideological demarcation and, when necessary, split, for
the purpose of welding and tempering the core of the truly revolutionary
party. In 1911, Lenin wrote on this subject:

‘Conciliationism is the sum total of moods, strivings and views which
are indissolubly bound up with the very essence of the historical task
set before the Russian Social Democratic Party during the period of the
counter-revolution of 1908-11. That is why, during that period, a number
of Social Democrats, _starting from quite different premises_, fell into
conciliationism. Trotsky expressed conciliationism more consistently
than anyone else. He was probably the only one who attempted to give
this tendency a theoretical foundation.’ [5]

By striving for unity at all costs, I involuntarily and unavoidably
idealized centrist tendencies in Menshevism. Despite my thrice-repeated
episodic attempts, I arrived at no common task with the Mensheviks, and
I could not arrive at it. Simultaneously, however, the conciliationist
line brought me into still sharper conflict with Bolshevism, since
Lenin, in contrast to the Mensheviks, relentlessly rejected
conciliationism, and could not but do this. It is obvious that no
faction could be created on the platform of conciliationism.

Hence the lesson: It is impermissible and fatal to break or weaken a
political line for purposes of vulgar conciliationism; it is
impermissible to paint up centrism when it zig-zags to the left; it is
impermissible, in the hunt after the will-o’-the-wisps of centrism, to
exaggerate and inflate differences of opinion with genuine revolutionary
co-thinkers. These are the real lessons of Trotsky’s real mistakes.
These lessons are very important. They preserve their full force even
today, and it is precisely Radek who should meditate upon them.

With the ideological cynicism characteristic of him, Stalin once said:

‘Trotsky cannot but know that Lenin fought against the theory of the
permanent revolution to the end of his life. But that does not worry
Trotsky.’ (PRAVDA, No.262, November 12, 1926 [6])

This is a crude and disloyal, that is, a purely Stalinist caricature of
the reality. In one of his communications to foreign Communists, Lenin
explained that differences of opinion among Communists are something
quite different from differences of opinion with the Social Democrats.
Such differences of opinion, he wrote, Bolshevism had also gone through
in the past. But ‘... at the moment when it seized power and created the
Soviet Republic, Bolshevism proved united and _drew to itself all the
best of the currents of socialist thought that were nearest to it_ ...’
(XVI, p.333 [7])

What nearest currents of socialist thought did Lenin have in mind when
he wrote these lines? Martynov or Kuusinen? Or Cachin, Thälmann and
Smeral? Did they perhaps appear to him as the ‘best of the nearest
currents’? What other tendency was nearer to Bolshevism than the one
which I represented on all fundamental questions, including the peasant
question? Even Rosa Luxemburg shrank back at first from the agrarian
policy of the Bolshevik government. For me, however, there was no doubt
about this at all. I was together with Lenin at the table when, pencil
in hand, he drafted his agrarian law. And our interchange of opinions
hardly consisted of more than a dozen brief remarks, the sense of which
was about the following: The step is a contradictory one, but
historically it is absolutely unavoidable; under the regime of the
proletarian dictatorship and on the scale of world revolution, the
contradictions will be adjusted – we only need time. If a basic
antagonism existed on the peasant question between the theory of the
permanent revolution and Lenin’s dialectic how then does Radek explain
the fact that without renouncing my basic views on the course of
development of the revolution, I did not stumble in the slightest over
the peasant question in 1917, as did the majority of the Bolshevik
leadership of that time? How does Radek explain the fact that after the
February Revolution the present theoreticians and politicians of
anti-Trotskyism – Zinoviev, Kamenev, Stalin, Rykov, Molotov, etc., etc.
– adopted, to the last man, the vulgar-democratic and not the
proletarian position? And once again: Of what and of whom could Lenin
have spoken when he referred to the merging of Bolshevism and the best
elements of the Marxist currents nearest to it? And does not this
evaluation in which Lenin _drew the balance sheet_ of the past
differences of opinion show that in any case he saw no two
irreconcilable strategic lines?

Still more noteworthy in this respect is Lenin’s speech at the November
1 (14), 1917, session of the Petrograd Committee. [8] There the question
was discussed, whether to make an agreement with the Mensheviks and the
Socialist-Revolutionaries. The supporters of a coalition endeavoured
even there – very timidly, to be sure – to hint at ‘Trotskyism’. What
did Lenin reply?

‘Agreement? I cannot even speak seriously about that. Trotsky has long
ago said that unity is impossible. Trotsky understood this – and since
then there has been no better Bolshevik.’

Not the permanent revolution but conciliationism was what separated me,
in Lenin’s opinion, from Bolshevism. In order to become the ‘best
Bolshevik’, I only needed, as we see, to understand the impossibility of
an agreement with Menshevism.

But how is the abrupt character of Radek’s turn precisely on the
question of the permanent revolution to be explained? I believe I have
one element of explanation. In 1916, as we learn from his article, Radek
was in agreement with ‘permanent revolution’; but his agreement was with
Bukharin’s interpretation of it, according to which the bourgeois
revolution in Russia had been completed – not only the revolutionary
role of the bourgeoisie, and not even only the historical role of the
slogan of the democratic dictatorship, but the bourgeois revolution as
such – and the proletariat must therefore proceed to the capture of
power under a purely socialist banner. Radek manifestly interpreted my
position at that time also in the Bukharinist manner; otherwise he could
not have declared his solidarity with Bukharin and me at one and the
same time. This also explains why Lenin polemized against Bukharin and
Radek, with whom he collaborated, having them appear under the pseudonym
of Trotsky. (Radek admits this also in his article.) I remember also
that M.N. Pokrovsky, a co-thinker of Bukharin’s and a tireless
constructor of historical schemas which he very skillfully painted up as
Marxism, alarmed me in conversations I had with him in Paris with his
dubious ‘solidarity’ on this question. In politics, Pokrovsky was and
remains an anti-Cadet, which he honestly believes to constitute
Bolshevism.

In 1924-25, Radek apparently still lived upon ideological recollections
of the Bukharinist position of 1916, which he continued to identify with
mine. Rightly disillusioned with this hopeless position, Radek – on the
basis of a fleeting study of Lenin’s writings – as frequently happens in
such cases, described an arc of 180 degrees right over my head. This is
quite probable, because it is typical. Thus, Bukharin, who in 1923-25
turned himself inside out, that is, transformed himself from an
ultra-left into an opportunist, constantly attributes to me his own
ideological past, which he palms off as ‘Trotskyism’. In the first
period of the campaign against me, when I still forced myself
occasionally to read Bukharin’s articles, I would frequently ask myself:
Where did he get this from? – but I soon guessed that he had glanced
into his diary of yesterday. And now I wonder if the same psychological
foundation does not lie at the bottom of Radek’s conversion from a Paul
of the permanent revolution into its Saul. I do not presume to insist
upon this hypothesis. But I can find no other explanation.

Anyway, as the French saying goes: the wine is drawn, it must be drunk.
We are compelled to undertake a lengthy excursion into the realm of old
quotations. I have reduced their number as much as was feasible. Yet
there are still many of them. Let it serve as my justification, that I
strive throughout to find in my enforced rummaging among these old
quotations the threads that connect up with the burning questions of the
present time.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. This prediction has in the meantime been fulfilled. – _L.T._

2. In 1909 Lenin did indeed quote my RESULTS AND PROSPECTS in an article
polemicizing against Martov. It would not, however, be difficult to
prove that Lenin took over the quotations at second-hand, that is, from
Martov himself. This is the only way that certain of his objections
directed at me, which are based upon obvious misunderstandings, can be
explained.

In 1919, the State Publishing House issued my RESULTS AND PROSPECTS as a
pamphlet. The annotation to the complete edition of Lenin’s works, to
the effect that the theory of the permanent revolution is especially
noteworthy ‘now’, after the October Revolution, dates back to
approximately the same time. Did Lenin read my RESULTS AND PROSPECTS in
1919 or merely glance through it? On this I cannot say anything
definite. I was then constantly traveling, came to Moscow only for short
stays, and during my meetings with Lenin in that period – at the height
of the civil war – factional theoretical reminiscences never entered our
minds. But A.A. Joffe did have a conversation with Lenin, just at that
time, on the theory of the permanent revolution. Joffe reported this
conversation in the farewell letter he wrote me before his death. (See
MY LIFE, New York, pp.535, 537. [3]) Can A.A. Joffe’s assertions be
construed meaning that Lenin in 1919 became acquainted _for the first
time_ with RESULTS AND PROSPECTS and recognized the correctness of the
historical prognosis contained in it? On this matter I can only express
psychological conjectures. The power of conviction of these conjectures
depends upon the evaluation of the kernel of the disputed question
itself. A.A. Joffe’s words, that Lenin had confirmed my prognosis as
correct, must appear incomprehensible to a man who has been raised upon
the theoretical margarine of the post-Leninist epoch. On the other hand,
whoever reflects upon the evolution of Lenin’s ideas in connection with
the development of the revolution itself will understand that Lenin, in
1919 had to make – could not have failed to make – a new evaluation of
the theory of the permanent revolution, different from the ones he had
pronounced desultorily, in passing, and often manifestly
self-contradictory, at various times before the October Revolution, on
the basis of isolated quotations, without even once examining my
position as a whole.

In order to confirm my prognosis as correct in 1919, Lenin did not need
to counterpose my position to his. It sufficed to consider both
positions in their historical development. It is not necessary to repeat
here that the concrete content which Lenin always gave to his formula of
‘democratic dictatorship’, and which flowed less from a hypothetical
formula than from the analysis of the actual changes in class
relationships – that this tactical and organizational content has passed
once and for all into the inventory of history as a classic model of
revolutionary realism. In almost all the cases, at any rate in all the
most important cases, where I placed myself in contradiction to Lenin
tactically or organizationally, right was on his side. That is just why
it did not interest me to come forward in favour of my old historical
prognosis, so long as it might appear that it was only a matter of
historical reminiscences. I found myself compelled to return to this
question only at the moment when the epigones criticism of the theory of
the permanent revolution not only began to nurture theoretical reaction
in the whole International, but also became converted into a means of
direct sabotage of the Chinese Revolution. – _L.T._

3. London edition, pp.456, 458.

4. Stalin, WORKS, English edition, VI, 355.

5. _The New Faction of Conciliators or the Virtuous_, 4th edition, XVI,
227; SELECTED WORKS, English edition, IV, 93.

6. Stalin, WORKS, English edition, VIII, 350.

7. _Greetings to the Italian, French and German Communists_, 4th
edition, XXX, 37.

8. As is known, the voluminous minutes of this historic session were
torn out of the JUBILEE BOOK by special command of Stalin and to this
day are kept concealed from the party. – _L.T._

The Permanent Revolution



2. THE PERMANENT REVOLUTION IS NOT A ‘LEAP’ BY THE PROLETARIAT, BUT THE RECONSTRUCTION OF THE NATION UNDER THE LEADERSHIP OF THE PROLETARIAT


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

Radek writes:

‘The essential feature that distinguishes the train of thought which is
called the theory and tactic (observe: _tactic_, too. – _L.T._) of the
“permanent revolution” from Lenin’s theory lies in _mixing up the stage
of the bourgeois revolution with the stage of the socialist
revolution.’_

Connected with this fundamental accusation, or resulting from it, there
are other no less serious accusations: Trotsky did not understand that
‘under Russian conditions, a socialist revolution which does not grow
out of the democratic revolution is impossible’; and from this followed
‘skipping the stage of the democratic dictatorship’. Trotsky ‘denied’
the role of the peasantry, which is where ‘the community of views of
Trotsky and the Mensheviks’ lay. As already said, all this is intended
to prove, by means of circumstantial evidence, the incorrectness of my
position on the fundamental questions of the Chinese Revolution.

To be sure, so far as the formal literary side is concerned, Radek can
refer here and there to Lenin. And he does that; everybody has ‘at hand’
_this_ section of the quotations. But as I shall presently demonstrate,
these contentions of Lenin in regard to me had a purely episodic
character and were incorrect, that is, in no sense did they characterize
what my real position was, even in 1905. In Lenin’s own writings there
are quite different, directly contrary and far better grounded remarks
on my attitude on the basic questions of the revolution. Radek did not
even make the attempt to unite the various and directly contradictory
remarks of Lenin, and to elucidate these polemical contradictions by a
comparison with my actual views.[1]

In 1906, Lenin published, with his own foreword, an article by Kautsky
on the driving forces of the Russian Revolution. Without knowing
anything about this, I also translated Kautsky’s article in prison,
provided it with a foreword and included it in my book IN DEFENCE OF THE
PARTY. Both Lenin and I expressed our thorough accord with Kautsky’s
analysis. To Plekhanov’s question: Is our revolution bourgeois or
socialist? Kautsky had answered that it is no longer bourgeois, but not
yet socialist, that is, it represents the transitional form from the one
to the other. In this connection, Lenin wrote in his foreword:

‘Is our revolution bourgeois or socialist in its general character? That
is the old schema, says Kautsky. That is not how the question should be
put, that is not the Marxist way. The revolution in Russia is not
bourgeois, for the bourgeoisie is not one of the driving forces of the
present revolutionary movement in Russia. But neither is the revolution
in Russia socialist.’ [2]

Yet not a few passages can be found in Lenin, written both before and
after this foreword, where he categorically calls the Russian Revolution
bourgeois. Is this a contradiction? If Lenin is approached with the
methods of the present critics of ‘Trotskyism’, then dozens and hundreds
of such contradictions can be found without difficulty, which are
clarified for the serious and conscientious reader by the difference in
the approach to the question at different times, which in no way
violates the fundamental unity of Lenin’s conception.

On the other hand, I never denied the _bourgeois_ character of the
revolution in the sense of its immediate historical tasks, but only in
the sense of its driving forces and its perspectives. My fundamental
work of those days (1905-06) on the permanent revolution begins with the
following sentences:

‘The Russian Revolution came unexpectedly to everybody but the Social
Democrats. Marxism long ago predicted the inevitability of the Russian
Revolution, which was bound to break out as a result of the conflict
between capitalist development and the forces of ossified absolutism ...
In calling it a bourgeois revolution, Marxism thereby pointed out that
the _immediate objective_ tasks of the revolution consisted in the
creation of “normal conditions for the development of bourgeois society
as a whole”. Marxism has proved to be right, and this is now past the
need for discussion or proof. The Marxists are now confronted by a task
of quite another kind: to discover the “possibilities” of the developing
revolution by means of an analysis of its internal mechanism ... The
Russian Revolution has a quite peculiar character, which is the result
of the peculiar trend of our whole social and historical development,
and which in its turn opens before us quite new historical prospects.’
(OUR REVOLUTION, 1906, article _Results and Prospects_, p.224 [3])

‘The general sociological term _bourgeois revolution_ by no means solves
the politico-tactical problems, contradictions and difficulties which
the mechanics of a _given_ bourgeois revolution throw up.’ (IBID., p.249
[4]

Thus I did not deny the bourgeois character of the revolution that stood
on the order of the day, and I did not mix up democracy and socialism.
But I endeavoured to show that in our country the class dialectics of
the bourgeois revolution would bring the proletariat to power and that
without its dictatorship not even democratic tasks could be solved.

In the same article (1905-06) I wrote:

‘The proletariat grows and becomes stronger with the growth of
capitalism. In this sense, the development of capitalism is also the
development of the proletariat toward dictatorship. But the day and the
hour when power will pass into the hands of the working class depends
_directly_ not upon the level attained by the productive forces but upon
the relations in the class struggle, upon the international situation
and finally, upon a number of subjective factors: the traditions, the
initiative, readiness to fight of the workers.

‘It is possible for the workers to come to power in an economically
backward country sooner than in an advanced country ... To imagine that
the dictatorship of the proletariat is in some way dependent upon the
technical development and resources of a country is a prejudice of
“economic” materialism simplified to absurdity. This point of view has
nothing in common with Marxism.

‘In our view, the Russian Revolution will create conditions in which
power can pass into the hands of the workers – and in the event of the
victory of the revolution it must do so – _before_ the politicians of
bourgeois liberalism get the chance to display to the full their ability
to govern.’ [5]

These lines contain a polemic against the vulgar ‘Marxism’ which not
only prevailed in 1905-06, but also set the tone of the March 1917
conference of the Bolsheviks before Lenin’s arrival, and found its
crassest expression in Rykov’s speech at the April conference. At the
Sixth Congress of the Comintern, this pseudo-Marxism, that is,
philistine ‘common sense’ debauched by scholasticism, constituted the
‘scientific’ basis of the speeches of Kuusinen and many, many others.
And this, ten years after the October Revolution!

Since I have not the possibility of setting out here the whole train of
thought of _Results and Prospects_, I should like to adduce one more
summary quotation from my article in NACHALO (1905):

‘Our liberal bourgeoisie comes forward as a counter-revolutionary force
even before the revolutionary climax. At each critical moment, our
intellectual democrats only demonstrate their impotence. The peasantry
as a whole represents an elemental force in rebellion. It can be put at
the service of the revolution only by a force that takes state power
into its hands. The vanguard position of the working class in the
revolution, the direct connection established between it and the
revolutionary countryside, the attraction by which it brings the army
under its influence – all this impels it inevitably to power. The
complete victory of the revolution means the victory of the proletariat.
This in turn means the further uninterrupted character of the
revolution.’ (OUR REVOLUTION, p.172)

The prospect of the dictatorship of the proletariat consequently grows
here precisely out of the bourgeois-democratic revolution – in
contradiction to all that Radek writes. That is just why the revolution
is called permanent (uninterrupted). But the dictatorship of the
proletariat does not come _after_ the completion of the democratic
revolution, as Radek would have it. If that were the case it would
simply be impossible in Russia, for in a backward country the
numerically weak proletariat could not attain power if the tasks of the
peasantry had been solved during the preceding stage. No, the
dictatorship of the proletariat appeared probable and even inevitable on
the basis of the bourgeois revolution precisely because there was no
other power and no other way to solve the tasks of the agrarian
revolution. But exactly this opens up the prospect of a democratic
revolution growing over into the socialist revolution.

‘The very fact of the proletariat’s representatives entering the
government, not as powerless hostages, but as the leading force,
destroys the border line between maximum and minimum programme; that is
to say, it _places collectivism on the order of the day_. The point at
which the proletariat will be held up in its advance in this direction
depends upon the relation of forces, but in no way upon the original
intentions of the proletarian party.

‘For this reason there can be no talk of any sort of _special_ form of
proletarian dictatorship in the bourgeois revolution, of _democratic_
proletarian dictatorship (or dictatorship of proletariat and peasantry).
The working class cannot preserve the democratic character of its
dictatorship without overstepping the limits of its democratic programme
...

‘The proletariat, once having taken power, will fight for it to the very
end. While one of the weapons in this struggle for the maintenance and
the consolidation of power will be agitation and organization,
especially in the countryside, another will be a policy of collectivism.
Collectivism will become not only the inevitable way forward from the
position in which the party in power will find itself, but will also be
a means of preserving this position with the support of the
proletariat.’ (_Results and Prospects_, p.258 [6])

Let us go further:

‘We know a classic example (I wrote in 1908 against the Menshevik
Cherevanin) of a revolution in which the conditions for the rule of the
capitalist bourgeoisie were prepared by the terrorist dictatorship of
the victorious _sans-culottes_. That was in an epoch when the bulk of
the urban population was composed of petty-bourgeoisie of the artisan
and tradesman type. It followed the leadership of the Jacobins. The bulk
of the urban population in Russia is composed today of the industrial
proletariat. This analogy alone points to the possibility of a
historical situation in which the victory of the “bourgeois” revolution
will prove possible only through the conquest of revolutionary power by
the proletariat. Does the revolution thereby cease to be bourgeois? Yes
and no. This does not depend upon the formal designation but upon the
further development of events. If the proletariat is overthrown by a
coalition of bourgeois classes, among them also the peasantry it has
liberated, then the revolution will retain its limited bourgeois
character. Should the proletariat, however, prove able and find it
possible to set in motion all the means of its political rule in order
to break through the national framework of the Russian revolution, then
the latter can become the prologue to the world socialist cataclysm. The
question: what _stage_ will the Russian Revolution attain? permits
naturally only a conditional reply. Only one thing is absolutely and
indubitably correct: the mere characterization of the Russian revolution
as bourgeois tells us nothing about the type of its internal development
and in no case signifies that the proletariat must adapt its tactics to
the conduct of bourgeois democracy as the sole legal claimant to state
power.’ (L. Trotsky, THE YEAR 1905, p.263)

From the same article:

‘Our revolution, which is a bourgeois revolution with regard to the
immediate tasks it grew out of, knows, as a consequence of the extreme
class differentiation of the industrial population, of no bourgeois
class capable of placing itself at the head of the popular masses by
combining its own social weight and political experience with their
revolutionary energy. The oppressed worker and peasant masses, left to
their own resources, must take it upon themselves to create, in the hard
school of implacable conflicts and cruel defeats, the necessary
political and organizational preconditions for their triumph. No other
road is open to them.’ (IBID., pp.257-268)

One more quotation from RESULTS AND PROSPECTS must be adduced on the
most violently assailed point – on the peasantry. In a special chapter,
_The Proletariat in Power and the Peasantry_’, the following is said:

‘The proletariat, in order to consolidate its power, cannot but widen
the base of the revolution. Many sections of the working masses,
particularly in the countryside, will be drawn into the revolution and
become politically organized only after the advance-guard of the
revolution, the urban proletariat, stands at the helm of state.
Revolutionary agitation and organization will then be conducted with the
help of state resources. The legislative power itself will become a
powerful instrument for revolutionizing the masses ...

‘The fate of the most elementary revolutionary interests of the
peasantry – even the peasantry as a whole, as an _estate_, is bound up
with the fate of the revolution, i.e., with the fate of the proletariat.

_’The proletariat in power will stand before tire peasantry as the class
which has emancipated it_. The domination of the proletariat will mean
not only democratic equality, free self-government, the transference of
the whole burden of taxation to the rich classes, the dissolution of the
standing army in the armed people, and the abolition of compulsory
church imposts, but also recognition of all revolutionary changes
(expropriations) in land relationships carried out by the peasants. The
proletariat will make these changes the starting point for further state
measures in agriculture. Under such conditions, the Russian peasantry in
the first and most difficult period of the revolution, will be
interested in the maintenance of a proletarian regime ("workers’
democracy") at all events not less than was the French peasantry in the
maintenance of the military regime of Napoleon Bonaparte, which
guaranteed to the new property owners, by the force of its bayonets, the
inviolability of their holdings ...

‘But is it not possible that the peasantry may push the proletariat
aside and take its place? This is impossible. All historical experience
protests against this assumption. Historical experience shows that the
peasantry are absolutely incapable of taking up an _independent_
political role.’ (IBID., p.251 [7])

All this was written not in 1929, nor yet in 1924, but in 1905. Does
this look like ‘ignoring the peasantry’, I should like to know? Where is
the ‘jumping over’ of the agrarian question here? Is it not time,
friends, to be somewhat more scrupulous?

Now let us see how ‘scrupulous’ Stalin is on this question. Referring to
my New York articles on the February 1917 Revolution, which agree in
every essential with Lenin’s Geneva articles, this theoretician of party
reaction writes:

‘... Trotsky’s letters “do not in the least resemble” Lenin’s letters
either in spirit or in conclusions, for they wholly and entirely reflect
Trotsky’s anti-Bolshevik slogan of “no Tsar, but a workers’ government”,
a slogan which implies a revolution _without_ the peasantry.’ (Speech to
the Party fraction in the All-Union Central Committee of the Trade
Unions, November 19, 1924.)

Remarkable is the sound of these words on the ‘anti-Bolshevik slogan’
(allegedly Trotsky’s): ‘No Tsar – but a workers’ government.’ According
to Stalin, the Bolshevik slogan should have read: ‘No workers’
government, but a Tsar.’ We will speak later of this alleged ‘slogan’ of
Trotsky’s. But first let us hear from another would-be master of
contemporary thought, less illiterate perhaps, but one who has taken
leave forever of any theoretical scruples – I speak of Lunacharsky:

‘In 1905, Lev Davidovich Trotsky inclined to the idea: _the proletariat
must remain isolated_ (!) and must not support the bourgeoisie, for that
would be opportunism; for the proletariat alone, however, it would be
very difficult to carry through the revolution, because the proletariat
at that time amounted to only seven to eight per cent of the total
population and victory could not be won with so small a cadre. Thus, Lev
Davidovich decided that the proletariat must maintain a permanent
revolution in Russia that is, fight for the greatest possible results
until the fiery sparks of this conflagration should blow up the entire
world powder-magazine.’ (VLAST SOVYETOV [THE POWER OF THE SOVIETS],
No.7, 1927, _On the Characterisation of the October Revolution_, by A.
Lunacharsky, p.10)

The proletariat ‘must remain isolated’ until the fiery sparks blow up
the powder magazines ... How well many People’s Commissars write who are
for the moment not yet ‘isolated’ in spite of the threatened position of
their own little heads. [8] But we do not want to be too hard on
Lunacharsky; from each according to his abilities. In the last analysis,
his slovenly absurdities are no more senseless than those of many
others.

But how, according to Trotsky, must ‘the proletariat remain isolated’?
Let us adduce one quotation from my pamphlet against Struve (1906). At
that time, by the way, Lunarcharsky praised this work immoderately. In
the chapter that deals with the Soviet of Deputies, it is stated that
while the bourgeois parties ‘remained completely on the sidelines’, away
from the awakening masses, ‘political life became concentrated around
the workers’ Soviet. The attitude of the petty-bourgeois city masses
toward the Soviet (in 1905) was manifestly sympathetic, even if not very
conscious. All the oppressed and aggrieved sought its protection. The
popularity of the Soviet spread far beyond the confines of the city. It
received “petitions” from peasants who suffered injustices, peasants’
resolutions poured into the Soviet, delegations from village communities
came to it. Here, right here, is where were concentrated the thoughts
and sympathies of the nation, of the real and not the falsified
democratic nations’.

In all these quotations – their number can easily be increased two-,
three-, and tenfold – the permanent revolution is described as a
revolution which welds together the oppressed masses of town and country
around the proletariat organized in soviets; as a national revolution
that raises the proletariat to power and thereby opens up the
possibility of a democratic revolution growing over into the socialist
revolution.

The permanent revolution is no isolated leap of the proletariat; rather
it is the rebuilding of the whole nation under the leadership of the
proletariat. That is how I conceived and interpreted the prospect of the
permanent revolution, beginning with 1905.

Radek is also wrong with regard to Parvus[9] – whose views on the
Russian Revolution in 1905 bordered closely on mine, without however
being identical with them – when he repeats the stereotyped phrase about
Parvus’s ‘leap’ from a Tsarist Government to a Social Democratic one.
Radek actually refutes himself when, in another part of his article, he
indicates, in passing but quite correctly, wherein my views on the
revolution actually differed from those of Parvus. Parvus was not of the
opinion that a workers’ Government in Russia could move in the direction
of the socialist revolution, that is, that in the process of fulfilling
the democratic tasks it could grow over into the socialist dictatorship.
As is proved by the 1905 quotation adduced by Radek himself, Parvus
confined the tasks of the workers’ government to the _democratic_ tasks.
Then where, in that case, is the leap to _socialism_? What Parvus had in
mind even at that time was the establishment of a workers’ regime after
the ‘Australian’ model, as a consequence of the revolution. Parvus also
juxtaposed Russia and Australia after the October Revolution, by which
time he himself had already long since taken his stand at the extreme
right of social reformism. Bukharin asserted in this connection that
Parvus had ‘thought up’ Australia after the fact, in order to cover up
his old aims with regard to the permanent revolution. But that is not
so. In 1905, too, Parvus saw in the conquest of power by the proletariat
the road to democracy and not to socialism, that is, he assigned to the
proletariat only that role which it actually played in Russia in the
first eight to ten months of the October Revolution. In further
perspective, Parvus even then pointed to the Australian democracy of
that time, that is, to a regime in which the workers’ party does indeed
govern but does not rule, and carries out its reformist demands only as
a supplement to the programme of the bourgeoisie. By an irony of fate
the fundamental tendency of the Right-Centrist bloc of 1923-28 consisted
precisely in drawing the dictatorship of the proletariat closer to a
workers’ democracy of the Australian model, that is, in drawing closer
to the prognosis of Parvus. This becomes all the clearer when it is
recalled that the Russian petty-bourgeois ‘socialists’ of two or three
decades ago continually depicted Australia in the Russian press as a
workers’ and peasants’ country which, shut off from the outer world by
high tariffs, was developing ‘socialist’ legislation and in that way was
building socialism in one country. Radek would have acted correctly had
he pushed _this_ side of the question to the foreground instead of
repeating fairy tales about my fantastic leap over democracy.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. I recollect that when Bukharin at the Eighth Plenum of the Executive
Committee of the Communist International cited the same quotations, I
called to him: ‘But there are also directly contrary quotations in
Lenin.’ After a brief moment of perplexity, Bukharin retorted: ‘I know
that, I know that, but I am taking what I need, not what you need.’
There is the presence of mind of this theoretician for you! – _L.T._

2. Preface to Kautsky’s pamphlet THE DRIVING FORCES AND PROSPECTS OF THE
RUSSIAN REVOLUTION, Dec. 1906; 4th edition, XI, 372.

3. See RESULTS AND PROSPECTS, _[Introduction]_.

4. See RESULTS AND PROSPECTS, _Revolution and the Proletariat_.

5. See RESULTS AND PROSPECTS, _Revolution and the Proletariat_.

6. See RESULTS AND PROSPECTS, _The Proletarian Regime_.

7. See RESULTS AND PROSPECTS, _The Proletariat in Power and the
Peasantry_.

8. The russian word rendered in the preceding passage as ‘sparks’ also
means ‘little heads’.

9. It should be remembered that at that time Parvus stood at the extreme
left of international Marxism. – _L.T._

The Permanent Revolution



3. THREE ELEMENTS OF THE ‘DEMOCRATIC DICTATORSHIP’: CLASSES, TASKS AND POLITICAL MECHANICS


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

The difference between the ‘permanent’ and the Leninist standpoints
expressed itself politically in the counterposing of the slogan of the
dictatorship of the _proletariat_ relying on the peasantry to the slogan
of the _democratic_ dictatorship of the proletariat and the peasantry.
The dispute was not concerned with whether the bourgeois-democratic
stage could be skipped and whether an alliance between the workers and
the peasants was necessary – it concerned the _political mechanics_ of
the collaboration of the proletariat and the peasantry in the democratic
revolution.

Far too presumptuous, not to say light-minded, is Radek’s contention
that only people ‘who have not thought through to the end the complex
method of Marxism and Leninism’ could raise the question of the
_party-political expression_ of the democratic dictatorship, whereas
Lenin allegedly reduced the whole question to the collaboration of the
two classes in the objective historical tasks. No, that is not so.

If in the given question we abstract ourselves from the subjective
factor of the revolution: parties and their programmes – the political
and organizational form of the collaboration of proletariat and
peasantry – then there will also vanish all the differences of opinion,
not only between Lenin and me, which marked two shades of the same
revolutionary wing, but what is much worse, also the differences of
opinion between Bolshevism and Menshevism, and finally, the differences
between the Russian Revolution of 1905 and the Revolutions of 1848 and
even of 1789, insofar as the proletariat can at all be spoken of in
relation to the latter. _All_ bourgeois revolutions were based on the
collaboration of the oppressed masses of town and country. That is just
what invested the revolutions to a lesser or greater degree with a
national character, that is, one embracing the whole people.

The theoretical as well as the political dispute among us was not over
the collaboration of the workers and peasants as such, but over the
programme of this collaboration, its party forms and political methods.
In the old revolutions, workers and peasants ‘collaborated’ under the
leadership of the liberal bourgeoisie or its petty-bourgeois democratic
wing. The Communist International repeated the experience of the _old_
revolutions in a new historical situation by doing everything it could
to subject the Chinese workers and peasants to the political leadership
of the national liberal Chiang Kai-shek and later of the ‘democrat’ Wang
Ching-wei. Lenin raised the question of an alliance of the workers and
peasants irreconcilably opposed to the liberal bourgeoisie. Such an
alliance had never before existed in history. It was a matter, so far as
its method went, of a new experiment in the collaboration of the
oppressed classes of town and country. Thereby the question of the
political forms of collaboration was posed anew. Radek has simply
overlooked this. That is why he leads us not only back from the formula
of the permanent revolution, but also back from Lenin’s ‘democratic
dictatorship’ – into an empty historical abstraction.

Yes, Lenin refused for a number of years _to prejudge_ the question of
what the party-political and state organization of the democratic
dictatorship of the proletariat and the peasantry would look like, and
he pushed into the foreground the collaboration of these two classes as
against a coalition with the liberal bourgeoisie. Lenin said: At a
certain historical stage, there inevitably results from the whole
objective situation the revolutionary alliance of the working class with
the peasantry for the solution of the tasks of the democratic
revolution. Will the peasantry be able to create an independent party
and will it succeed in doing this? Will this party be in the majority or
the minority in the government of the dictatorship? What will be the
specific weight of the proletarian representatives in the revolutionary
government? None of these questions permits of an _a priori_ answer.
‘Experience will show!’ Insofar as the formula of the democratic
dictatorship left half-open the question of the political mechanics of
the alliance of workers and peasants, it thereby remained up to a
certain point – without in any way becoming transformed into Radek’s
barren abstraction – an algebraic formula, allowing of extremely
divergent political interpretations in the future.

In addition, Lenin himself was in no way of the opinion that the
question would be exhausted by the class basis of the dictatorship and
its objective historical aims. The significance of the subjective factor
– the aims, the conscious method, the party – Lenin well understood and
taught this to all of us. And that is why Lenin in his commentaries on
his slogan did not renounce at all an approximate, hypothetical
prejudgment of the question of what political forms might be assumed by
the first independent alliance of workers and peasants in history.
However, Lenin’s approach to this question at different times was far
from being one and the same. Lenin’s thought must not be taken
dogmatically but historically. Lenin brought no finished commandments
from Mt Sinai, but hammered out ideas and slogans to fit reality, making
them concrete and precise, and at different times filled them with
different content. But _this side_ of the question, which later gained a
decisive character and brought the Bolshevik Party to the verge of a
split at the beginning of 1917, has not been studied by Radek at all. He
has simply ignored it.

It is, however, a fact that Lenin did not always characterize the
possible party-political expression and governmental form of the
alliance of the two classes in the same way, refraining, however, from
binding the party by these hypothetical interpretations. What are the
reasons for this caution? The reasons are to be sought in the fact that
this algebraic formula contains a quantity, gigantic in significance,
but politically extremely indeterminate: _the peasantry_.

I want to quote only a few examples of Lenin s interpretation of the
democratic dictatorship, with the reservation that a rounded
presentation of the _evolution_ of Lenin’s thought on this question
would require a separate work.

Developing the idea that the proletariat and the peasantry would be the
basis of the dictatorship, Lenin wrote in March, 1905:

‘And such a composition of the social basis of the probable and
desirable revolutionary-democratic dictatorship will, of course, find
its reflection in the composition of the revolutionary government. _With
such a composition the participation or even the predominance of the
most diversified representatives of revolutionary democracy in such a
government will be inevitable._’ (VI, 132. My emphasis [1])

In these words, Lenin indicates not only the class basis of, but also
sketches out a specific governmental form of the dictatorship with a
possible predominance of the representatives of petty-bourgeois
democracy.

In 1907, Lenin wrote:

‘In order to be victorious, the “peasant agrarian revolution” of which
you gentlemen speak must, as such, as a peasant revolution, take over
the central power throughout the whole state.’ (IX, 539 [2])

This formula goes even further. It can be understood in the sense that
the revolutionary power must be directly concentrated in the hands of
the peasantry. But this formula also embraces, in the more far-reaching
interpretation introduced into it by the very course of development, the
October Revolution which brought the proletariat to power as the ‘agent’
of the peasant revolution. Such is the amplitude of the possible
interpretations of the formula of the democratic dictatorship of the
proletariat and the peasantry. We may grant that, up to a certain point,
its strong side lay in this algebraic character, but its dangers also
lay there, manifesting themselves among us graphically enough after
February, and in China leading to catastrophe.

In July 1905, Lenin wrote:

‘Nobody speaks of the seizure of power by the party – we speak only of
participation, _as far as possible_ a leading participation in the
revolution ...’ (VI, 228 [3])

In December, 1906, Lenin considered it possible to agree with Kautsky on
the question of seizure of power by the party:

‘Kautsky considers it not only “as very probable” that “victory will
fall to the Social Democratic Party in the course of the revolution,”
but declares it the duty of the Social Democrats “to instil in their
adherents the certainty of victory, for one cannot fight successfully if
victory is renounced beforehand”.’ (VIII, 58 [4])

The distance between these two interpretations given by Lenin himself is
no smaller than between Lenin’s formulations and mine. We shall see this
even more plainly later on. Here we want to raise the question: What is
the meaning of these contradictions in Lenin? They reflect the one and
the same ‘great unknown’ in the political formula of the revolution:
_the peasantry_. Not for nothing did the radical thinkers occasionally
refer to the peasant as the Sphinx of Russian history. The question of
the nature of the revolutionary dictatorship – whether Radek wishes it
or not -- is inseparably bound up with the question of the possibility
of a revolutionary peasant party hostile to the liberal bourgeoisie and
independent of the proletariat. The decisive meaning of the latter
question is not hard to grasp. Were the peasantry capable of creating
their own independent party in the epoch of the democratic revolution,
then the democratic dictatorship could be realized in its truest and
most direct sense, and the question of the participation of the
proletarian minority in the revolutionary government would have an
important, it is true, but subordinate significance. The case is
entirely otherwise if we proceed from the fact that the peasantry,
because of its intermediate position and the heterogeneity of its social
composition, can have neither an independent policy nor an independent
party, but is compelled, in the revolutionary epoch, to choose between
the policy of the bourgeoisie and the policy of the proletariat. Only
this evaluation of the political nature of the peasantry opens up the
prospect of the dictatorship of the proletariat growing directly out of
the democratic revolution. In this, naturally, there lies no ‘denial’,
‘ignoring’ or ‘underestimation’ of the peasantry. Without the decisive
significance of the agrarian question for the life of the whole of
society and without the great depth and gigantic sweep of the peasant
revolution there could not even be any talk of the proletarian
dictatorship in Russia. But the fact that the _agrarian_ revolution
created the conditions for the dictatorship _of the proletariat_ grew
out of the inability of the peasantry to solve its own historical
problem with its own forces and under its own leadership. Under present
conditions in bourgeois countries, even in the backward ones, insofar as
they have already entered the epoch of capitalist industry and are bound
into a unit by railroads and telegraphs – this applies not only to
Russia but to China and India as well – the peasantry is even less
capable of a leading or even only an independent political role than in
the epoch of the old bourgeois revolutions. The fact that I invariably
and persistently stressed this idea, which forms one of the most
important features of the theory of the permanent revolution, also
provided a quite inadequate and, in essence, absolutely unfounded
pretext for accusing me of underestimating the peasantry.

What were Lenin’s views on the question of a peasant party? To reply to
this question, a comprehensive review would be required of the evolution
of Lenin’s views on the Russian revolution in the period of 1905-17. I
shall confine myself here to two quotations:

In 1907, Lenin wrote:

‘It is possible ... that the objective difficulties of a political
unification of the petty bourgeoisie will check the formation of such a
party and leave the peasant democracy for a long time in the present
state of a spongy, shapeless, pulpy, Trudoviki-like [5] mass.’ (VIII,
484 [6])

In 1909, Lenin expressed himself on the same theme in a different way:

‘There is not the slightest doubt that a revolution which reaches ... so
high a degree of development as the revolutionary dictatorship will
create a more firmly-formed and more powerful revolutionary peasant
party. To judge the matter otherwise would mean to assume that in a
grown-up man, the size, form and degree of development of certain
essential organs could remain in a childish state.’ (XI, Part 1, 230
[7])

Was this assumption confirmed? No, it was not. But that is just what
Induced Lenin, _up to the moment of the complete verification by
history_, to give an algebraic answer to the question of the
revolutionary government. Naturally, Lenin never put his hypothetical
formula above the reality. The struggle for the independent political
party of the proletariat constituted the main content of his life. The
woeful epigones, however, in their hunt after a peasant party, ended up
with the subordination of the Chinese workers to the Kuomintang, the
strangulation of communism in India in the name of the ‘Workers’ and
Peasants’ Party’, the dangerous fiction of the Peasants’ International,
the masquerade of the League Against Imperialism, and so on.

Prevailing official thought makes no effort to dwell on the
contradictions in Lenin adduced above, which are in part external and
apparent, in part real, but which always stem from the problem itself.
Now that there have arisen among us a special species of ‘Red’
professors who are frequently distinguished from the old reactionary
professors not by a firmer backbone but only by a profounder ignorance,
Lenin is professorially trimmed and purged of all contradictions, that
is, of the dynamics of his thought; standard quotations are threaded on
separate threads, and then one ‘series’ or another set in circulation,
according to the requirements of the ‘current moment’.

It must not be forgotten for a moment that the problems of the
revolution in a politically ‘virgin’ country became acute after a great
historical interval, after a lengthy reactionary epoch in Europe and in
the whole world, and for that reason alone contained many unknowns.
Through the formula of the democratic dictatorship of the workers and
peasants, Lenin expressed the peculiarity of Russian social conditions.
He gave different interpretations to this formula, but did not reject it
until he had probed to the end the peculiar conditions of the Russian
revolution. Wherein lay this peculiarity?

The gigantic role of the agrarian question and the peasant question in
general, as the soil or the subsoil of all other problems, and the great
number of the peasant intellectuals and those who sympathized with the
peasants, with their Narodnik ideology, with their ‘anti-capitalist’
traditions and their revolutionary tempering – all this in its entirety
signified that _if an anti-bourgeois revolutionary peasant party was at
all possible anywhere, then it was possible precisely and primarily in
Russia._

And as a matter of fact, in the endeavours to create a peasant party, or
a workers’ and peasants’ party – as distinct from a liberal or a
proletarian party – every possible political variant was attempted in
Russia, illegal and parliamentary as well as a combination of the two:
_Zemlya i Volya_ (Land and Freedom), _Narodnaya Volya_ (People’s Will),
_Cherny Peredel_ (Black Redistribution), the legal _Narodnichestvo_
(Populists), ‘Socialist-Revolutionaries’, ‘People’s Socialists’,
‘Trudoviks’, ‘Left Socialist-Revolutionaries’, etc., etc. For half a
century we had, as it were, a huge laboratory for the creation of an
‘anti-capitalist’ peasant party with an independent position toward the
proletarian party. The largest scope was attained, as is well known, by
the experiment of the SR Party which, for a time in 1917, actually
constituted the party of the overwhelming majority of the peasantry. But
what happened? This party used its position only to betray the peasants
completely to the liberal bourgeoisie. The SRs entered into a coalition
with the imperialists of the Entente and together with them conducted an
armed struggle against the Russian proletariat.

This truly classic experiment shows that petty-bourgeois parties based
on the peasantry are still able to retain a semblance of independent
policy during the humdrum periods of history when secondary questions
are on the agenda; but when the revolutionary crisis of society puts the
fundamental questions of property on the order of the day, the
petty-bourgeois ‘peasant’ party automatically becomes a tool in the
hands of the bourgeoisie against the proletariat.

If my old differences of opinion with Lenin are analysed not on the
plane of quotations indiscriminately torn out of this and that year,
month and day, but in their correct historical perspective, then it
becomes quite clear that the dispute, at least on my part, was not over
whether an alliance of the proletariat with the peasants was required
for the solution of the democratic tasks, but over what party-political
and state form the revolutionary cooperation of the proletariat and the
peasantry could assume, and what consequences could result from it for
the further development of the revolution. I speak of course of my
position in this dispute, not of the position of Bukharin and Radek at
that time, for which they themselves must answer.

How close the formula of the ‘permanent revolution’ approximated to
Lenin’s formula is graphically illustrated by the following comparison.
In the summer of 1905, that is, before the October general strike and
before the December uprising in Moscow, I wrote in the foreword to one
of Lassalle’s speeches:

‘It is self-evident that the proletariat, as in its time the
bourgeoisie, fulfills its mission supported by the peasantry and the
urban petty bourgeoisie. The proletariat leads the countryside, draws it
into the movement, gives it an interest in the success of its plans. The
proletariat, however, unavoidably remains the leader. This is not “the
dictatorship of the peasantry and proletariat” but _the dictatorship of
the proletariat supported by the peasantry_.’ [8] (L. Trotsky, THE YEAR
1905, p.281)

Now compare these words, written in 1905 and quoted by me in the Polish
article of 1909, with the following words of Lenin written likewise in
1909, just after the party conference, under the pressure of Rosa
Luxemburg, had adopted the formula ‘dictatorship of the proletariat
supported by the peasantry’ instead of the old Bolshevik formula. To the
Mensheviks, who spoke of the radical change of Lenin’s position, the
latter replied:

‘... The formula which the Bolsheviks have here chosen for themselves
reads: _the proletariat which leads the peasantry behind it._’[9]

‘... Isn’t it obvious that the idea of all these formulations is one and
the same? Isn’t it obvious that this idea expresses precisely the
dictatorship of the proletariat and peasantry – that the _“formula” of
the proletariat supported by the peasantry, remains entirely within the
bounds of that very same dictatorship of the proletariat and
peasantry_?’ (XI, Part 1, pp,219 and 224. My emphasis[10])

Thus Lenin puts a construction on the ‘algebraic’ formula here which
excludes the idea of an _independent_ peasant party and even more its
dominant role in the revolutionary government: the proletariat leads the
peasantry, the proletariat is _supported_ by the peasantry, consequently
the revolutionary power is concentrated in the hands of the party of the
proletariat. But this is precisely the central point of the theory of
the permanent revolution.

Today, that is, _after_ the historical test has taken place, the utmost
that can be said about the old differences of opinion on the question of
the dictatorship is the following:

While Lenin, always proceeding from the leading role of the proletariat,
emphasized and developed in every way the necessity of the revolutionary
democratic collaboration of the workers and peasants – teaching this to
all of us – I, invariably proceeding from this collaboration, emphasized
in every way the necessity of proletarian leadership, not only in the
bloc but also in the government which would be called upon to head this
bloc. No other differences can be read into the matter.

In connexion with the foregoing, let us take two quotations: one out of
RESULTS AND PROSPECTS, which Stalin and Zinoviev utilized to prove the
antagonism between my views and Lenin’s, the other out of a polemical
article by Lenin against me, which Radek employs for the same purpose.

Here is the first quotation:

‘The participation of the proletariat in a government is also
objectively most probable, and permissible on principle, only as a
_dominating and leading participation_. One may, of course, describe
such a government as the dictatorship of the proletariat and peasantry,
a dictatorship of the proletariat, peasantry and intelligentsia, or even
a coalition government of the working class and the petty bourgeoisie,
but the question nevertheless remains: who is to wield the hegemony in
the government itself, and through it, in the country? And when we speak
of a workers’ government, by this we reply that the hegemony should
belong to the working class.’ (OUR REVOLUTION, 1906, p.250.[11])

Zinoviev (in 1925!) raised a hue and cry because I (in 1905!) had placed
the peasantry and the intelligentsia on the same plane. He got nothing
else from the above-cited lines. The reference to the intelligentsia
resulted from the conditions of that period, during which the
intelligentsia played politically an entirely different role from that
which it plays today. Only exclusively intellectual organizations spoke
at that time in the name of the peasantry; the Socialist-Revolutionaries
officially built their party on the ‘triad’: proletariat, peasantry,
intelligentsia; the Mensheviks, as I wrote at that time, clutched at the
heels of every radical intellectual in order to prove the blossoming of
bourgeois democracy. I expressed myself hundreds of times in those days
on the impotence of the intellectuals as an ‘independent’ social group
and on the decisive significance of the revolutionary peasantry.

But after all, we are certainly not discussing here a single polemical
phrase, which I have no intention at all of defending. The essence of
the quotation is this: that I completely accept the Leninist content of
the democratic dictatorship and only demand a more precise definition of
its political mechanism, that is, the exclusion of the sort of coalition
in which the proletariat would only be a hostage amid a petty-bourgeois
majority.

Now let us examine Lenin’s 1916 article which, as Radek himself points
out, was directed ‘_formally_ against Trotsky, but _in reality_ against
Bukharin, Pyatakov, the writer of these lines (that is, Radek) and a
number of other comrades’. This is a very valuable admission, which
entirely confirms my impression of that time that Lenin was directing
the polemic against me only in appearance, for the content, as I shall
demonstrate forthwith, did not in reality at all refer to me. This
article contains (in two lines) that very accusation concerning my
alleged ‘denial of the peasantry’ which later became the main capital of
the epigones and their disciples. The ‘nub’ of this article – as Radek
puts it – is the following passage:

‘Trotsky has not taken into consideration,’ says Lenin, quoting my own
words, ‘that if the proletariat draws behind it the non-proletarian
masses of the village to confiscate the landlords’ estates and overthrow
the monarchy, then this will constitute the consummation of the
“national bourgeois revolution”, and that in Russia this is just what
the _revolutionary democratic dictatorship of rite proletariat and the
peasantry will be_.’ (XIII, 214[12]

That Lenin did not direct to the ‘right address’ this reproach of my
‘denial’ of the peasantry, but really meant Bukharin and Radek, who
actually did skip over the democratic stage of the revolution is clear
not only from everything that has been said above, but also from the
quotation adduced by Radek himself, which he rightly calls the ‘nub’ of
Lenin’s article. In point of fact, _Lenin directly quotes the words of
my article to the effect that only an independent and bold policy of the
proletariat can ‘draw behind it the non-proletarian masses of the
village to confiscates the landlords’ estates and overthrow the
monarchy’_, etc. and then Lenin adds: ‘Trotsky has not taken into
consideration that ... this is just what the revolutionary democratic
dictatorship will be.’ In other words, Lenin confirms here and, so to
speak, certifies that Trotsky in reality accepts the whole actual
content of the Bolshevik formula (the collaboration of the workers and
peasants and the democratic tasks of this collaboration), but refuses to
recognize that this is just what the democratic dictatorship, the
consummation of the national revolution, will be. It therefore follows
that the dispute in this apparently ‘sharp’ polemical article involves
not the programme of the next stage of the revolution and its driving
class forces, but precisely the _political correlation of these forces,
the political and party character of the dictatorship_. While, as a
result in part of the unclarity at that time of the processes themselves
and in part of factional exaggerations, polemical misunderstandings were
comprehensible and unavoidable in _those_ days, it is completely
incomprehensible how Radek contrived to introduce such confusion into
the question after the event.

My polemic with Lenin was waged in essence over the possibility of the
independence (and the degree of the independence) of the peasantry in
the revolution, particularly over the possibility of an independent
peasants’ party. In this polemic, I accused Lenin of overestimating the
_independent_ role of the peasantry. Lenin accused me of underestimating
the _revolutionary_ role of the peasantry. This flowed from the logic of
the polemic itself. But is it not contemptible for anyone today, two
decades later, to use these old quotations, tearing them out of the
context of the party relationships of that time and investing each
polemical exaggeration or episodic error with an absolute meaning,
instead of laying bare in the light of the very great revolutionary
experience we have had what the actual axis of the differences was and
what was the real and not verbal scope of these differences?

Compelled to limit myself in the selection of quotations, I shall refer
here only to the summary theses of Lenin on the stages of the
revolution, which were written at the end of 1905 but only published for
the first time in 1926 in the fifth volume of LENIN MISCELLANIES. (p.451
[13]) I recall that all the Oppositionists, Radek included, regarded the
publication of these theses as the handsomest of gifts to the
Opposition, for Lenin turned out in these theses to be guilty of
‘Trotskyism’ in accordance with all the articles of the Stalinist code.
The most important points of the resolution of the Seventh Plenum of the
ECCI which condemns Trotskyism seem to be avowedly and deliberately
directed against the fundamental theses of Lenin. The Stalinists gnashed
their teeth in rage at their publication. The Editor of this volume of
the MISCELLANIES, Kamenev, told me flatly with the not very bashful
‘good nature’ that is characteristic of him that if a bloc between us
were not being prepared he would never under any circumstances have
allowed the publication of this document. Finally, in an article by
Kostrzewa in BOLSHEVIK, these theses were fraudulently falsified
precisely to spare Lenin from being charged with Trotskyism in his
attitude toward the peasantry as a whole and the middle peasant in
particular.

In addition I quote here Lenin’s own evaluation of his differences of
opinion with me, which he made in 1909:

‘Comrade Trotsky himself, in this instance, grants “the participation of
the representatives of the democratic population” in the “workers’
government,” that is, _he grants a government of representatives of the
proletariat and the peasantry_. Under what conditions the participation
of the proletariat in the revolutionary government is permissible is a
separate question, and on this question, the Bolsheviks will most likely
fail to see eye to eye not only with Trotsky but also with the Polish
Social Democrats. The question of the dictatorship of the revolutionary
classes, however, is in no case reducible to the question of the
“majority” in this or that revolutionary government, or to the
conditions under which the participation of the Social Democrats in this
or that government is permissible.’ (XI, Part 1, p.229. My emphasis[14])

In this quotation from Lenin, it is again confirmed that Trotsky accepts
a government of representatives of the proletariat and the peasantry,
and therefore does not ‘skip over’ the latter. Lenin furthermore
emphasizes that the question of the dictatorship is not reducible to the
question of the majority of the government. This is altogether beyond
dispute. What is involved here, first and foremost, is the joint
struggle of the proletariat and peasantry and consequently the struggle
of the proletarian vanguard against the liberal or national bourgeoisie
for influence over the peasants. But while the question of the
revolutionary dictatorship of the workers and peasants is _not
reducible_ to the question of this or that majority in the government,
nevertheless, upon the victory of the revolution, this question
inescapably _arises_ as the decisive one. As we have seen, Lenin makes a
cautious reservation (against all eventualities) to the effect that
should matters reach the point of participation by the party in the
revolutionary govern ment, then perhaps differences might arise with
Trotsky and the Polish comrades _over the conditions_ of this
participation. It was a matter therefore of _possible_ difference of
opinion, insofar as Lenin considered theoretically permissible the
participation of the representatives of the proletariat as a minority in
a democratic government. Events, however, showed that no differences
arose between us. In November, 1917, a bitter struggle flared up in the
top leadership of the party over the question of the coalition
government with the Socialist-Revolutionaries and the Mensheviks. Lenin,
without objecting in principle to a coalition on the basis of the
soviets, categorically demanded that the Bolshevik majority be firmly
safeguarded. I stood shoulder to shoulder with Lenin.

Now let us hear from Radek. To just what does he reduce the whole
question of the democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the
peasantry?

‘Wherein,’ he asks, ‘did the old Bolshevik theory of 1905 prove to be
fundamentally correct? In the fact that the joint action of the
Petrograd workers and peasants (the soldiers of the Petrograd garrison)
overthrew Tsarism (in 1917 – _L.T._). After all, the 1905 formula
foresees in its fundamentals only the correlation of classes, and not a
concrete political institution.’

Just a minute, please! By designating the old Leninist formula as
‘algebraic,’ I do not imply that it is permissible to reduce it to an
empty commonplace, as Radek does so thoughtlessly. ‘The fundamental
thing was realized: the proletariat and the peasantry jointly overthrew
Tsarism.’ But this ‘fundamental thing’ was realized without exception in
all victorious or semi-victorious revolutions. Tsars, feudal lords, and
priests were always and everywhere beaten with the fists of the
proletarians or the precursors of the proletarians, the plebeians and
peasants. This happened as early as the 16th century in Germany and even
earlier. In China it was also workers and peasants who beat down the
‘militarists.’ What has this to do with the democratic dictatorship?
Such a dictatorship never arose in the old revolutions, nor did it arise
in the Chinese revolution. Why not? Because astride the backs of the
workers and peasants, who did the rough work of the revolution, sat the
bourgeoisie. Radek has abstracted himself so violently from ‘political
institutions’ that he has forgotten the ‘most fundamental thing’ in a
revolution, namely, who leads it and who seizes power. A revolution,
however, is a struggle for power. It is a political struggle which the
classes wage _not_ with bare hands but through the medium of ‘political
institutions’ (parties, etc.).

‘People who have not thought out to the end the complexity of the method
of Marxism and Leninism’, Radek thunders against us sinners, entertain
the following conception: ‘The whole thing must invariably end in a
joint government of workers and peasants; and some even think that this
must invariably be a coalition government of workers’ and peasants’
parties.’

What blockheads these ‘some’ are! And what does Radek himself think?
Does he think that a victorious revolution is not bound to reflect and
set its seal upon a specific correlation of revolutionary classes? Radek
has deepened the ‘sociological’ problem to the point where nothing
remains of it but a verbalistic shell.

How impermissible it is to abstract oneself from the question of the
political forms of the collaboration of the workers and peasants will
best be shown to us by the following words from an address by the same
Radek to the Communist Academy in March 1927:

‘A year ago, I wrote an article in PRAVDA on this (Canton) government
designating it as a _peasants’ and workers’ government_. A comrade of
the editorial board assumed that it was an oversight on my part and
changed it to _workers’ and peasants’ government_. I did not protest
against this and let it stand: workers’ and peasants’ government.’

Thus, in March 1927 (not in 1905) Radek was of the opinion that there
could be a peasants’ and workers’ government in contradistinction to a
workers’ and peasants’ government. This was beyond the editor of PRAVDA.
I confess that for the life of me I can’t understand it either. We know
well what a workers’ and peasants’ government is. But what is a
peasants’ and workers’ government, in contrast and as opposed to a
workers’ and peasants’ government? Please be so kind as to explain this
mysterious transposition of adjectives. Here we touch the very heart of
the question. In 1926, Radek believed the Canton government of Chiang
Kai-shek was a peasants’ and workers’ government. In 1927 he repeated
this formula. In reality, however, it proved to be a _bourgeois_
government, exploiting the revolutionary struggle of the workers and
peasants and then drowning them in blood. How is this error to be
explained? Did Radek simply misjudge? From far away it is easy to
misjudge. Then why not say it: I did not understand, could not see, I
made a mistake. But no, this is no factual error due to lack of
information, but rather, as is now clear, a profound mistake in
principle. The peasants’ and workers’ government, as opposed to the
workers’ and peasants’ government, is nothing else but the Kuomintang.
It can mean nothing else. If the peasantry does not follow the
proletariat, it follows the bourgeoisie. I believe that this question
has been sufficiently clarified in my criticism of the factional
Stalinist idea of a ‘two-class, worker-peasant party’ (see THE DRAFT
PROGRAMME OF THE COMMUNIST INTERNATIONAL; A CRITICISM OF FUNDAMENTALS).
The Canton ‘peasants’ and workers’ government’, in contrast to a
workers’ and peasants’ government, is also the only conceivable
expression, in the language of present-day Chinese politics, of the
‘democratic dictatorship’ as opposed to the proletarian dictatorship; in
other words, the embodiment of the Stalinist Kuomintang policy as
opposed to the Bolshevik policy which the Communist International labels
‘Trotskyist’.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. _Social Democracy and the Revolutionary Provisional Government_, 4th
edition, VIII, 262-263; SELECTED WORKS, English edition, III, 35.

2. _Political and Tactical Considerations in Questions of the Agrarian
Programme_ (Chapter 4 of THE AGRARIAN PROGRAMME OF THE SOCIAL-DEMOCRATS
IN THE RUSSIAN REVOLUTION OF 1905-1907), 4th edition XIII, 262-263;
Selectd Works, English edition, III, p.243.

3. _The Paris Commune and the Tasks of the Democratic Dictatorship_, 4th
edition, IX, 120, gives only the concluding section of this article,
which does not include the passage quoted, on the grounds that the
manuscript is not in Lenin’s handwriting, though extensively corrected
by him.

4. _The Proletariat and Its Ally in the Russian Revolution_, 4th
edition, XI, 337.

5. The Trudoviks were representatives of the peasants in the four Dumas,
constantly vacillating between the Cadets (Liberals) and the Social
Democrats. – _L.T._

6. _Revolution and Counter-Revolution_, 4th edition, XIII, 104.

7. _The Aim of the Struggle of the Proletariat in Our Revolution_, 4th
edition, XV, 3.

8. This quotation, among a hundred others, shows in passing that I did
have an inkling of the existence of the peasantry and the importance of
the agrarian question as far back as the eve of the 1905 Revolution,
that is, some time before the significance of the peasantry was
explained to me by Maslov, Thalheimer, Thälmann, Remmele, Cachin,
Monmousseau, Bela Kun, Pepper, Kuusinen and the other Marxist
sociologists. – _L.T._

9. At the 1909 Conference, Lenin proposed the formula of ‘the
proletariat which leads the peasantry behind it,’ but in the end he
associated himself with the formula of the Polish Social Democrats,
which won the majority at the conference against the Mensheviks. –
_L.T._

10. _The Aim of the Struggle of the Proletariat in Our Revolution_, 4th
edition, XV, 333 and 339.

11. See RESULTS AND PROSPECTS, _The Proletariat in Power and the
Peasantry_.

12. _About the Two Lines of the Revolution_, 4th edition, XXI, 382.

13. The Stages, Direction and Prospects of the Revolution, 4th edition,
X, 73-74; LITTLE LENIN LIBRARY, English edition, Vol.VI, _The Revolution
of 1905_ (1931), pp.54-55.

14. _The Aim of the Struggle of the Proletariat in Our Revolution_, 4th
edition, XV, 344.

The Permanent Revolution



4. WHAT DID THE THEORY OF THE PERMANENT REVOLUTION LOOK LIKE IN PRACTICE?


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

In his criticism of our theory, Radek adds to it, as we have seen, also
the ‘_tactic derived from it_’. This is a very important addition. The
official Stalinist criticism of ‘Trotskyism’ on this question prudently
limited itself to theory ... For Radek, however, this does not suffice.
He is conducting a struggle against a definite (Bolshevik) tactical line
in China. He seeks to discredit this line by the theory of the permanent
revolution, and to do this he must show, or pretend that somebody else
has already shown, that a false tactical line has in the past flowed
from this theory. Here Radek is directly misleading his readers. It is
possible that he himself in unfamiliar with the history of the
revolution, in which he never took a direct part. But apparently he has
not made the slightest effort to examine the question through documents.
Yet the most important of these are contained in the second volume of my
COLLECTED WORKS. They can be checked by anyone who can read. And so, let
me inform Radek that virtually throughout all the stages of the first
revolution I was in complete solidarity with Lenin in evaluating the
forces of the revolution and its successive tasks, in spite of the fact
that I spent the whole of 1905 living illegally in Russia, and 1906 in
prison. I am compelled to confine myself here to a minimum of proofs and
documentation.

In an article written in February and printed in March, 1905, that is,
two or three months before the first Bolshevik Congress (which is
recorded in history as the Third Party Congress), I wrote:

‘The bitter struggle between the people and the Tsar, which knows no
other thought than victory; the all-national insurrection as the
culminating point of this struggle; the provisional government as the
revolutionary culmination of the victory of the people over their
age-old foe; the disarming of the Tsarist reaction and the arming of the
people by the provisional government; the convocation of the constituent
assembly on the basis of universal, I equal, direct and secret suffrage
– these are the objectively indicated stages of the revolution.’
(COLLECTED WORKS, Volume II, Part I.)

It is enough to compare these words with the resolutions of the
Bolshevik Congress of May, 1905, in order to recognize in the
formulation my complete solidarity with the Bolsheviks on the
fundamental problems.

Nor is this all. In harmony with this article, I formulated in
Petersburg, in agreement with Krassin, the theses on the provisional
government which appeared illegally at that time. Krassin defended them
at the Bolshevik Congress. The following words of Lenin show how much he
approved of them:

‘I share entirely the views of Comrade Krassin. It is natural that, as a
writer, I gave attention to the literary formulation of the
question._The importance of the aim_ of the struggle has been shown very
correctly by Comrade Krassin, and _I am with him completely_. One cannot
engage in struggle without reckoning on capturing the position for which
one is fighting ...’ (VI, p.180 [1])

The major part of Krassin’s extensive amendment, to which I refer the
reader, was embodied in the Congress resolution. That I was the author
of this amendment is proved by a note from Krassin, which I still
possess. This whole episode in the history of the Party is well known to
Kamenev and others.

The problem of the peasantry, the problem of drawing the peasantry close
to the workers’ soviets, of co-ordinating work with the Peasants’
League, engaged the attention of the Petersburg Soviet more and more
every day. Is Radek perhaps aware that the leadership of the Soviet
devolved upon me? Here is one of the hundreds of formulations I wrote at
that time on the tactical tasks of the revolution:

‘The proletariat creates city-wide “soviets” which direct the fighting
actions of the urban masses, and puts upon the order of the day the
fighting alliance with the army and the peasantry.’ (NACHALO, No.4,
November 17 [new style, November 30], 1905.)

It is boring, and even embarrassing, let me confess, to cite quotations
proving that I never even talked of a ‘leap’ from autocracy into
Socialism. But it can’t be helped. I wrote the following, for example,
in February, 1906, on the tasks of the Constituent Assembly, without in
any way counterposing the latter to the soviets, as Radek, following
Stalin, now hastens to do in regard to China in order to sweep away with
an ultra-leftist broom all traces of yesterday’s opportunist policy:

‘The liberated people will convoke the Constituent Assembly by its own
power. The tasks of the Constituent Assembly will be gigantic. It will
have to reconstruct the State upon democratic principles, that is, upon
the principles of the absolute sovereignty of the people. Its duty will
be to organize a people’s militia, carry through a vast agrarian (land)
reform, and introduce the eight-hour day and a graduated income tax.
(COLLECTED WORKS, Volume II, Part I, p.349)

And here is what I wrote, in 1905, in an agitational leaflet,
specifically on the question of the ‘immediate’ introduction of
socialism:

‘Is it thinkable to introduce socialism in Russia immediately? No, our
countryside is far too benighted and unconscious. There are still too
few real socialists among the peasants. We must first overthrow the
autocracy, which keeps the masses of the people in darkness. The rural
poor must be freed of all taxation; the graduated progressive income
tax, universal compulsory education, must be introduced; finally, the
rural proletariat and semi-proletariat must be fused with the town
proletariat into a single social democratic army. Only this army can
accomplish the great socialist revolution.’ (COLLECTED WORKS, Volume II,
Part 1.)

It therefore follows that I did differentiate somewhat between the
democratic and socialist stages of the revolution, long before Radek,
tailing after Stalin and Thaelmann, began lecturing me on this subject.
Twenty-two years ago, I wrote:

‘When the idea of uninterrupted revolution was formulated in the
socialist press – an idea which connected the liquidation of absolutism
and feudalism with a socialist revolution, along with growing social
conflicts, uprisings of new sections of the masses, unceasing attacks by
the proletariat upon economic and political privileges of the ruling
classes – our “progressive” press raised a unanimous howl of
indignation.’ (OUR REVOLUTION, 1906 [2])

First of all, I should like to call attention to the definition of the
uninterrupted revolution contained in these words: it connects the
liquidation of medievalism with the socialist revolution through a
number of sharpening social clashes. Where then is the leap? Where is
the ignoring of the democratic stage? And after all, isn’t this what
actually happened in 1917?

It is noteworthy, by the way, that the howl raised by the ‘progressive’
press in 1905 over the uninterrupted revolution can in no wise be
compared with the hardly progressive howling of the present-day hacks
who have intervened in the affair after a brief delay of a quarter of a
century.

What was the attitude of the then leading organ of the Bolshevik
faction, NOVAYA ZHIZN, published under the vigilant editorship of Lenin,
when I raised the question of the permanent revolution in the press?
Surely, this point is not devoid of interest. To an article of the
‘radical’ bourgeois newspaper NASHA ZHIZN (OUR LIFE), which endeavoured
to set up the ‘more rational’ views of Lenin against the ‘permanent
revolution’ of Trotsky, the Bolshevik NOVAYA ZHIZN replied (on November
27, 1905) as follows:

‘This gratuitous assumption is of course sheer nonsense. Comrade Trotsky
said that the proletarian revolution can, without halting at the first
stage, continue on its road, elbowing the exploiters aside; Lenin, on
the other hand, pointed out that the political revolution is only the
first step. The publicist of NASHA ZHIZN would like to see a
contradiction here ... The whole misunderstanding comes, first, from the
fear with which the name alone of the social revolution fills NASHA
ZHIZN; secondly, out of the desire of this paper to discover some sort
of sharp and piquant difference of opinion among the Social Democrats;
and thirdly, in the figure of speech used by Comrade Trotsky: “at a
single blow.” In No.10 of NACHALO, Comrade Trotsky explains his idea
quite unambiguously:

  ‘“The complete victory of the revolution signifies the victory of the
  proletariat”, writes Comrade Trotsky. “But this victory in turn
  implies the uninterruptedness of the revolution in the future. The
  proletariat realizes in life the fundamental democratic tasks, and the
  very logic of its immediate struggle to consolidate its political rule
  poses before the proletariat, at a certain moment, purely socialist
  problems. Between the minimum and the maximum programme (of the Social
  Democrats) a revolutionary continuity is established. It is not a
  question of a single ‘blow’, or of a single day or month, but of a
  whole historical epoch. It would be absurd to try to fix its duration
  in advance.”’

This one reference in a way exhausts the subject of the present
pamphlet. What refutation of the entire subsequent criticism by the
epigones could be more clear, precise and incontrovertible than this
refutation contained in my newspaper article so approvingly quoted by
Lenin’s NOVAYA ZHIZN? My article explained that the victorious
proletariat, in the process of carrying out the democratic tasks, would
by the logic of its position inevitably be confronted at a certain stage
by purely socialist problems. That is just where the _continuity_ lies
between the minimum and the maximum programmes, which grows inevitably
out of the dictatorship of the proletariat. This is not a single blow,
it is not a leap – I explained to my critics in the camp of the petty
bourgeoisie of that time – it is a whole historical epoch. And Lenin’s
NOVAYA ZHIZN associated itself completely with this prospect. Even more
important, I hope, is the fact that it was verified by the actual course
of development and in 1917 was decisively confirmed as correct.

Apart from the petty-bourgeois democrats of NASHA ZHIZN, it was mainly
the Mensheviks who in 1905, and particularly in 1906 after the defeat of
the revolution had begun, spoke of the fantastic ‘leap’ over democracy
to socialism. Among the Mensheviks it was especially Martynov and the
late Yordansky who distinguished themselves in this held. Both of them,
be it said in passing later became stalwart Stalinists. To the Menshevik
writers who sought to hang the ‘leap to socialism’ on me, I expounded,
in a special article written in 1906, in detail and in popular style,
not only the error but also the stupidity of such a contention. I could
reprint this article today, almost unabridged, against the criticism of
the epigones. But it will perhaps suffice to say that the conclusion of
this article was summed up in the following words:

‘I understand perfectly – let me assure my reviewer (Yordansky) – that
to leap, in a newspaper article, over a political obstacle is far from
the same as surmounting it in practice.’ (COLLECTED WORKS, Volume II,
Part 1, p.454.)

Perhaps this will suffice? If not, I can continue, so that critics like
Radek will not be able to say that they did not have ‘at hand’ the
material on which they pass judgment so cavalierly.

OUR TACTICS, a small pamphlet which I wrote in prison in 1906, and which
was immediately published by Lenin, contains the following
characteristic conclusion:

‘The proletariat will be able to support itself upon the uprising of the
village, and in the towns, the centres of political life, it will be
able to carry through to a victorious conclusion the cause which it has
been able to initiate. Supporting itself upon the elemental forces of
the peasantry, and leading the latter, the proletariat will not only
deal reaction the final triumphant blow, but it will also know how to
secure the victory of the revolution.’ (COLLECTED WORKS, Volume II, Part
1, p.448)

Does this smack of ignoring the peasantry? In the same pamphlet, by the
way, the following idea also is developed:

‘Our tactics, calculated upon the irresistible development of the
revolution, must not of course ignore the inevitable or the possible or
even only the probable phases and stages of the revolutionary movement.’
(_Collected Works_, Volume II, Part 1, p.436)

Does this look like a fantastic leap?

In my article, _The Lessons of the First Soviet_ (1906), I depict the
prospects for the further development of the revolution (or, as it
turned out in reality, for the new revolution) in the following manner:

‘History does not repeat itself – and the new Soviet will not have once
more to go through the events of the fifty days (October to December
1905); instead, it will be able to borrow its programme of action
completely from this period. This programme is perfectly clear.
Revolutionary co-operation with the army, the peasantry, and the lowest
plebeian strata of the urban petty bourgeoisie. Abolition of the
autocracy. Destruction of its material organization: in part through
reorganization and in part through the immediate dissolution of the
army; destruction of the bureaucratic police apparatus. Eight-hour day.
Arming of the population, above all of the proletariat. Transformation
of the soviets into organs of revolutionary urban self-administration.
Creation of soviets of peasants’ deputies (peasant committees) as organs
of the agrarian revolution in the localities. Organization of elections
to the Constituent Assembly, and electoral struggle on the basis of a
definite programme of action for the people’s representatives.’
(COLLECTED WORKS, Volume II Part 2, p.206)

Does this look like skipping over the agrarian revolution, or
underestimation of the peasant question as a whole? Does this look as
though I was blind to the democratic tasks of the revolution? No, it
does not. But what then does the political picture drawn by Radek look
like? Nothing at all.

Magnanimously, but very ambiguously, Radek draws a line between my 1905
position, which he distorts, and the position of the Mensheviks, without
suspecting that he is himself repeating three-fourths of the Menshevik
criticism; even though Trotsky, to be sure, employed the same methods as
the Mensheviks, Radek explains jesuitically, his aim was nevertheless
different. By this subjective formula, Radek completely discredits his
own approach to the question. Even Lassalle knew that the end depends
upon the means and in the final analysis is conditioned by it. He even
wrote a play on this subject (_Franz Von Sickingen_). But what is it
that renders my means and that of the Mensheviks one and the same? The
attitude towards the peasantry. As evidence, Radek adduces three
polemical lines from the above-cited 1916 article by Lenin, observing in
passing, however, that here Lenin, although he names Trotsky, was in
reality polemicizing against Bukharin and against Radek himself. Besides
this quotation from Lenin which, as we have already seen, is refuted by
the whole content of Lenin’s article, Radek makes reference to Trotsky
himself. Exposing the emptiness Of the Menshevik conception, I asked in
my 1916 article: If it is not the liberal bourgeoisie that will lead,
then who will? After all, you Mensheviks do not in any case believe in
the _independent_ political role of the peasantry. So then, Radek has
caught me red-handed: Trotsky ‘agreed’ with the Mensheviks about the
role of the peasantry. The Mensheviks held it impermissible to ‘repulse’
the liberal bourgeoisie for the sake of a dubious and unreliable
alliance with the peasantry. This was the ‘method’ of the Mensheviks;
while mine consisted of brushing aside the liberal bourgeoisie and
fighting for the leadership of the revolutionary peasantry. On this
fundamental question I had no differences with Lenin. And when I said to
the Mensheviks in the course of the struggle against them: ‘You are in
any case not inclined to assign a _leading_ role to the peasantry, then
this was not an agreement with the method of the Mensheviks as Radek
tries to insinuate, but only the clear posing of an alternative:
_either_ the dictatorship of the liberal plutocracy _or_ the
dictatorship of the proletariat.

The same completely correct argument put forward by me in 1916 against
the Mensheviks, which Radek now disloyally tries to utilize against me
also, had been used by me nine years earlier, at the London Congress of
1907, when I defended the theses of the Bolsheviks on the attitude
toward non-proletarian parties. I quote here the essential part of my
London speech which, in the first years of the revolution, was often
reprinted in anthologies and textbooks as the expression of the
Bolshevik attitude toward classes and parties in the revolution. Here is
what I said in this speech, which contains a succinct formulation of the
theory of the permanent revolution.

‘To the Menshevik comrades, their own views appear extremely complex. I
have repeatedly heard accusations from them that my conception of the
course of the Russian revolution is oversimplified. And yet, despite
their extreme amorphousness, which is one of the forms of complexity, –
and perhaps just because of this amorphousness – the views of the
Mensheviks fall into a very simple pattern comprehensible even to Mr.
Milyukov.

‘In a postscript to the recent published book, HOW DID THE ELECTIONS TO
THE SECOND STATE DUMA TURN OUT? the ideological leader of the Cadet
Party writes: “As to the left groups in the narrower sense of the word,
that is, the socialist and revolutionary groups, an agreement with them
will be more difficult. But even here again, there are, if no definite
positive reasons, then at least some very weighty negative ones which
can to a certain extent facilitate an agreement between us. Their aim is
to criticize and to discredit us; for that reason alone it is necessary
that we be present and act. As we know, to the socialists, not only in
Russia but throughout the world, the revolution now taking place is a
bourgeois and not a socialist revolution. It is a revolution which is to
be accomplished by bourgeois democracy. To supersede this democracy ...
is something no socialists in the whole world are ready to do, and if
the country has sent them into the Duma in such great numbers, then it
was certainly not for the purpose of realizing socialism now or in order
to carry through the preparatory ‘bourgeois’ reforms with their own
hands ... It will be far more advantageous for them to leave the role of
parliamentarians to us than to compromise themselves in this role.”

‘As we see, Milyukov brings us straight to the heart of the question.
The quotation cited gives all the most important elements of the
Menshevik attitude toward the revolution and the relationship between
bourgeois and socialist democracy.

‘“The revolution that is taking place is a bourgeois and not a socialist
revolution” – that’s the first and most important point. The bourgeois
revolution “must be accomplished by the bourgeois democracy” – that’s
the second point. The socialist democracy cannot carry through bourgeois
reforms with its own hands, its role remains purely oppositional:
“Criticize and discredit.” This is the third point. And finally – as the
fourth point – in order to enable the socialists to remain in the
opposition, “it is necessary that we (that is, the bourgeois democracy)
be present and act.”

‘But what if “we” are not present? And what if there is no bourgeois
democracy capable of marching at the head of the bourgeois revolution?
Then it must be invented. This is just the conclusion to which
Menshevism arrives. It produces bourgeois democracy, its attributes and
history, out of its own imagination.

‘As materialists, we must first of all pose the question of the social
bases of bourgeois democracy: upon what strata or classes can it rest?

‘As a revolutionary force the big bourgeoisie can be dismissed – we all
agree on this. Even at the time of the Great French Revolution, which
was a national revolution in the broadest sense, certain Lyons
industrialists played a counter-revolutionary role. But we are told of
the middle bourgeoisie, and also and primarily of the petty bourgeoisie,
as being the leading force of the bourgeois revolution. But what does
this petty bourgeoisie represent?

‘The Jacobins based themselves upon the urban democracy, which had grown
out of the craft guilds. Small masters, journeymen, and the town
population closely bound up with them, constituted the army of the
revolutionary _sansculottes_, the prop of the leading party of the
Montagnards. It was precisely this compact mass of the city population,
which had gone through the long historical school of the craft guilds,
that bore upon its shoulders the whole burden of the revolution. The
objective result of the revolution was the creation of “normal”
conditions of capitalist exploitation. The social mechanics of the
historical process, however, produced this result, that the conditions
for bourgeois domination were created by the “mob”, the democracy of the
streets, the _sansculottes_. Their terrorist dictatorship purged
bourgeois society of the old rubbish and then, after it had overthrown
the dictatorship of the petty-bourgeois democracy, the bourgeoisie came
to power.

‘Now I ask – alas, not for the first time! – what social class in our
country will raise up revolutionary bourgeois democracy, put it in
power, and make it possible – for it to carry out gigantic tasks, if the
proletariat remains in opposition? This is the central question, and I
again put it to the Mensheviks.

‘It is true, in our country there are huge masses of the revolutionary
peasantry. But the Menshevik comrades know just as well as I do that the
peasantry, regardless of how revolutionary it may be, is incapable of
playing an _independent_, much less a _leading_ political role. The
peasantry can undoubtedly prove to be a tremendous force in the service
of the revolution; but it would be unworthy of a Marxist to believe that
a peasant party is capable of placing itself at the head of a bourgeois
revolution and, upon its own initiative, liberating the nation’s
productive forces from the archaic fetters that weigh upon them. The
town is the hegemon in modern society and only the town is capable of
assuming the role of hegemon in the bourgeois revolution. [3]

‘Now, where is the urban democracy in our country capable of leading the
nation behind it? Comrade Martynov has already sought it repeatedly,
magnifying-glass in hand. He discovered Saratov teachers, Petersburg
lawyers, and Moscow statisticians. Like all his co-thinkers, the only
thing that he refused to notice was that in the Russian revolution the
industrial proletariat has conquered the very same ground as was
occupied by the semi-proletarian artisan democracy of the _sansculottes_
at the end of the eighteenth century. I call your attention, Comrades,
to this fundamental fact.

‘Our large-scale industry did not grow organically out of the crafts.
The economic history of our towns knows absolutely nothing of any period
of guilds. Capitalist industry arose in our country under the direct and
immediate pressure of European capital. It took possession of a soil
essentially virginal, primitive, without encountering any resistance
from craft culture. Foreign capital flowed into our country through the
channels of state loans and through the pipelines of private initiative.
It gathered around itself the army of the industrial proletariat and
prevented the rise and development of crafts. As a result of this
process there appeared among us as the main force in the towns, at the
moment of the bourgeois revolution, an industrial proletariat of an
extremely highly developed social type. This is a fact. It cannot be
disputed, and must be taken as the basis of our revolutionary tactical
conclusions.

‘If the Menshevik comrades believe in the victory of the revolution, or
even if they only recognize the possibility of such a victory, they
cannot dispute the fact that in our country there is no historical
claimant to revolutionary power other than the proletariat. As the petty
bourgeois urban democracy in the Great French Revolution placed itself
at the head of the revolutionary nation, in just the same way the
proletariat, which is the one and only revolutionary democracy of our
cities, must find a support in the peasant masses and place itself in
power – if the revolution has any prospect of victory at all.

‗_A government resting directly upon the proletariat, and through it
upon the revolutionary peasantry, does not yet signify the socialist
dictatorship_. I shall not here deal with the further prospects before a
proletarian government. It may be that the proletariat is destined to
fall, as did the Jacobin democracy, in order to clear the road for the
rule of the bourgeoisie. I want to establish only one point: if the
revolutionary movement in our country, as Plekhanov foretold, triumphs
as a workers’ movement, then the victory of the revolution is possible
only as the revolutionary victory of the proletariat – otherwise it is
altogether impossible.

‘I insist upon this conclusion, most emphatically. If it is assumed that
the social antagonisms between the proletariat and the peasant masses
will prevent the proletariat from placing itself at the head of the
latter, and that the proletariat by itself is not strong enough to gain
victory – then one must necessarily draw the conclusion that there is no
victory at all in store for our revolution. Under such circumstances, an
agreement between the liberal bourgeoisie and the old authorities is
bound to be the natural outcome of the revolution. This is a variant the
possibility of which can by no means be denied. But clearly this variant
lies along the path of the revolution’s defeat, and is conditioned by
its internal weakness. In essence _the entire analysis of the Mensheviks
– above all, their evaluation, of the proletariat and its possible
relations with the peasantry – leads them inexorably to the path of
revolutionary pessimism_.

‘But they persistently turn aside from this path and generate
revolutionary optimism on the basis of – bourgeois democracy.

‘From this is derived their attitude to the Cadets. For them the Cadets
are the symbol of bourgeois democracy, while bourgeois democracy is the
natural claimant to revolutionary power ...

‘Upon what then do you base your belief that the Cadets will still rise
and stand erect? Upon facts of political development? No, upon your own
schema. In order “to early the revolution through to the end” you need
the bourgeois urban democracy, you search for it eagerly, and find
nothing but Cadets. And you generate in relation to them amazing
optimism, you dress them up, you want to force them to play a creative
role, a role which they do not want to play, cannot play and will not
play. To my basic question – I have put it repeatedly – I have heard no
response. You have no prognosis of the revolution. Your policy lacks any
large prospects.

‘And in connection with this, your attitude to bourgeois parties is
formulated in words which the congress should keep in its memory: “as
the occasion may require.” The proletariat is not supposed to carry on a
systematic struggle for influence over the masses of the people, it is
not supposed to determine its tactical steps in accordance with a single
guiding idea, namely, to unite around itself all the toilers and the
downtrodden and to become their herald and leader. (MINUTES AND
RESOLUTIONS OF THE FIFTH PARTY CONGRESS, pp.180-185)

This speech, which succinctly sums up all my articles, speeches and acts
of 1905 and 1906, was completely approved by the Bolsheviks, not to
mention Rosa Luxemburg and Tyszko (on the basis of this speech, we
entered upon more intimate relations which led to my collaboration in
the Polish journal). Lenin, who did not forgive me my conciliatory
attitude toward the Mensheviks – and he was right – expressed himself
upon my speech with a deliberately emphasized reserve. Here is what he
said:

‘I merely wish to observe that Trotsky, in his little book IN DEFENCE OF
THE PARTY publicly expressed his solidarity with Kautsky, who wrote of
the economic community of interests of the proletariat and the peasantry
in the present revolution in Russia. Trotsky recognized the
admissibility and expediency of a left bloc against the liberal
bourgeoisie. These facts are enough for me to recognize that Trotsky is
drawing closer to our conceptions. _Independently of the question of the
“uninterrupted revolution”_, there is solidarity here between us on the
fundamental points of the question concerning the relationship to the
bourgeois parties.’ (VIII, p.400 [4])

Lenin did not devote himself in his speech to a general evaluation of
the theory of the permanent revolution, since I too, in my speech, did
not develop the further prospects for the dictatorship of the
proletariat. He had obviously not read my fundamental work on this
question, otherwise he would not have spoken of my ‘drawing closer’ to
the conceptions of the Bolsheviks as of something new, for my London
speech was only a condensed restatement of my works of 1905-06. Lenin
expressed himself very reservedly, because I did stand outside the
Bolshevik faction. In spite of that, or more correctly, precisely
because of that, his words leave no room for false interpretations.
Lenin established ‘solidarity between us on the fundamental points of
the question’ concerning the attitude toward the peasantry and the
liberal bourgeoisie. This solidarity applies not to my _aims_, as Radek
preposterously represents it, but precisely to _method_. As to the
prospect of the democratic revolution growing into the socialist
revolution, it is right here that Lenin makes the reservation,
‘independently of the question of the “uninterrupted revolution”.’ What
is the meaning of this reservation? It is clear that Lenin in no way
identified the permanent revolution with ignoring the peasantry or
skipping over the agrarian revolution, as is the rule with the ignorant
and unscrupulous epigones. Lenin’s idea is as follows: How far our
revolution will go, whether the proletariat can come to power in our
country sooner than in Europe and what prospects this opens up for
socialism – this question I do not touch upon; however, on the
fundamental question of the attitude of the proletariat toward the
peasantry and the liberal bourgeoisie ‘there is solidarity here between
us.’

We have seen above how the Bolshevik NOVAYA ZHIZN responded to the
theory of the permanent revolution virtually at its birth, that is, as
far back as in 1905. Let us also recall how the editors of Lenin’s
COLLECTED WORKS expressed themselves on this theory after 1917. In the
notes [5] to Volume XIV, Part 2, it is stated:

‘Even before the 1905 Revolution he (Trotsky) advanced the original and
_now especially noteworthy_ theory of the permanent revolution, in which
he asserted that _the bourgeois revolution of 1905 would pass directly
over into a socialist revolution_, constituting the first in a series of
national revolutions.’

I grant that this is not at all an acknowledgement of the correctness of
all that I have written on the permanent revolution. But in any case it
is an acknowledgement of the incorrectness of what Radek writes about
it. ‘The _bourgeois_ revolution will pass directly over into a socialist
revolution’ – but this is precisely the theory of _growing into_ and not
of _skipping over_; from this flows a realistic, and not an
adventuristic tactic. And what is the meaning of the words ‘_now
especially noteworthy_ theory of the permanent revolution’? They mean
that the October revolution has shed a new light on those aspects of the
theory which had formerly remained in obscurity for many or had simply
appeared ‘improbable’. The second part of Volume XIV of Lenin’s
COLLECTED WORKS appeared while the author was alive. Thousands and tens
of thousands of party members read this note. And nobody declared it to
be false until the year 1924. And it occurred to Radek to do this only
in the year 1928.

But insofar as Radek speaks not only of theory but also of tactics, the
most important argument against him still remains the character of my
practical participation in the revolutions of 1905 and 1917. My work in
the Petersburg Soviet of 1905 coincided with the definitive elaboration
of those of my views on the nature of the revolution which the epigones
now subject to uninterrupted fire. How could such allegedly erroneous
views fail to be reflected in any way in my political activity, which
was carried on before the eyes of everyone and recorded daily in the
press? But if it is assumed that such a false theory was mirrored in my
politics, then why did those who are now the consuls remain silent at
that time? And what is rather more important, why did Lenin at that time
most energetically defend the line of the Petersburg Soviet, at the
highest point of the revolution as well as after its defeat?

The very same questions, only in a perhaps sharper form, apply to the
1917 revolution. In a number of articles which I wrote in New York, I
evaluated the February Revolution from the point of view of the theory
of the permanent revolution. Ah these articles have now been reprinted.
My tactical conclusions coincided completely with the conclusions which
Lenin drew at the same time in Geneva, and consequently were in the same
irreconcilable contradiction to the conclusions of Kamenev, Stalin and
the other epigones. When I arrived in Petrograd, nobody asked me if I
renounced my ‘errors’ of the permanent revolution. Nor was there anyone
to ask. Stalin slunk around in embarrassment from one corner to another
and had only one desire, that the party should forget as quickly as
possible the policy which he had advocated up to Lenin’s arrival.
Yaroslavsky was not yet the inspirer of the Control Commission; together
with Mensheviks, together with Ordzhonikidze and others, he was
publishing a trivial semi-liberal sheet in Yakutsk. Kamenev accused
Lenin of Trotskyism and declared when he met me: ‘Now you have the laugh
on us.’ On the eve of the October Revolution, I wrote in the central
organ of the Bolsheviks on the prospect of the permanent revolution. It
never occurred to anyone to come out against me. My solidarity with
Lenin turned out to be complete and unconditional. What then, do my
critics, among them Radek, wish to say? That I myself completely failed
to understand the theory which I advocated, and that in the most
critical historical periods I acted directly counter to this theory, and
quite correctly? Is it not simpler to assume that my critics failed to
understand the permanent revolution, like so many other things? For if
it is assumed that these belated critics are so well able to analyse not
only their own ideas but those of others, then how explain that all of
them without exception adopted such a wretched position in the 1917
Revolution, and forever covered themselves with shame in the Chinese
Revolution?

But after all, some reader may suddenly recall: What about your most
important tactical slogan; ‘No Tsar – but a workers’ government’?

In certain circles this argument is deemed decisive. Trotsky’s horrid
slogan, ‘No Tsar!’ runs through all the writings of all the critics of
the permanent revolution; with some it emerges as the final, most
important and decisive argument; with others, as the ready harbour for
weary minds.

This criticism naturally reaches its greatest profundity in the ‘Master’
of ignorance and disloyalty, when he says in his incomparable PROBLEMS
OF LENINISM:

‘We shall not dwell at length (No indeed! – _L.T._) on Comrade Trotsky’s
attitude in 1905, when he ‘simply’ forgot all about the peasantry as a
revolutionary force, and advanced the slogan of “No Tsar, but a workers’
government”, that is, the slogan of revolution without the peasantry.’
(Stalin, PROBLEMS OF LENINISM, pp.174-175 [6])

Despite my almost hopeless position in face of this annihilating
criticism, which does not want to ‘dwell’, I should nevertheless like to
refer to some mitigating circumstances. There are some. I beg a hearing.

Even if one of my 1905 articles contained an isolated, ambiguous or
inappropriate slogan which might be open to misunderstanding, then
today, i.e., 23 years later, it should not be taken by itself but rather
placed in context with my other writings on the same subject, and, what
is most important, in context with my political participation in the
events. It is impermissible merely to provide readers with the bare
title of a work unknown to them (as well as to the critics) and then to
invest this title with a meaning which is diametrically opposed to
everything I wrote and did.

But it may not be superfluous to add – O my critics! – that at no time
and in no place did I ever write or utter or propose such a slogan as
‘No Tsar – but a workers’ government! At the basis of the main argument
of my judges there lies, aside from everything else, a shameful factual
error. The fact of the matter is that a proclamation entitled ‘No Tsar –
but a workers’ government’ was written and published abroad in the
summer of 1905 by Parvus. I had already been living illegally for a long
time in Petersburg at that period, and had nothing at all to do with
this leaflet either in ideas or in actions. I learned of it much later
from polemical articles. I never had the occasion or opportunity to
express myself on it. As for the proclamation I (as also, moreover, all
my critics) neither saw it nor read it. This is the factual side of this
extraordinary affair. I am sorry that I must deprive all the Thälmanns
and Semards of this easily portable and convincing argument. But facts
are stronger than my humane feelings.

Nor is this all. Accident providentially brought events together, so
that, at the same time that Parvus was publishing abroad the circular,
unknown to me, ‘No Tsar – but a workers’ government’, a proclamation
written by me appeared illegally in Petersburg with the title: _Neither
Tsar nor Zemtsi [7], but the People!_ This title, which is frequently
repeated in the text of the leaflet as a slogan embracing the workers
and peasants, might have been conceived in order to refute in a popular
form the later contentions about skipping the democratic stage of the
revolution. The appeal is reprinted in my COLLECTED WORKS (Volume II,
Part 1, p.256). There also are my proclamations, published by the
Bolshevik Central Committee, to that peasantry, which, in the ingenious
expression of Stalin, I ‘simply forgot’.

But even this is not yet all. Only a short time ago, the worthy Rafes, a
theoretician and leader of the Chinese Revolution, wrote in the
theoretical organ of the Central Committee of the Communist Party of the
Soviet Union about the same horrid slogan which Trotsky raised _in the
year_ 1917. Not in 1905, but in 1917! For the Menshevik Rafes, at any
rate, there is some excuse – almost up till 1920 he was a ‘minister’ of
Petlyura’s, and how could he, weighed down by the cares of state of the
struggle against the Bolsheviks, pay any heed there to what was going on
in the camp of the October Revolution! Well, but the editorial board of
the organ of the Central Committee? Here’s a wonder. One idiocy more or
less ...

‘But how is that possible?’ a conscientious reader raised on the trash
of recent years exclaims. ‘Weren’t we taught in hundreds and thousands
of books and articles ...? ’

‘Yes, friends, taught: and that is just why you will have to learn anew.
These are the overhead expenses of the period of reaction. nothing can
be done about it. history does not proceed in a straight line. It has
temporarily run into Stalin’s blind alleys.’

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Speech at Third Congress of the RSDLP, _On Amendments to Resolution
on Revolutionary Government_, 4th edition, VIII, 366; Lenin actually
used Krassin’s party name, Zimin.

2. See _The Proletarian Regime_.

3. Do the belated critics of the permanent revolution agree with this?
Are they prepared to extend this elementary proposition to the countries
of the East, China, India, etc.? Yes or no? – _L.T._

4. _London Congress of the RSDLP: Concluding Remarks on the Question of
attitude to Bourgeois Parties_, 4th edition, XII, p.423.

5. Note 79.

6. Stalin, Works, English edition, VI, 382.

7. i.e. members of the local self-governing authorities, the zemstva,
set up in the last period of Tsarist rule, with restricted powers and
dominated by the liberal nobility.

The Permanent Revolution



5. WAS THE ‘DEMOCRATIC DICTATORSHIP’ REALIZED IN OUR COUNTRY? IF SO, WHEN?


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

Appealing to Lenin, Radek contends that the democratic dictatorship was
realized in the form of the dual power. Yes, _occasionally_ – and
furthermore, conditionally – Lenin did put the question this way; that I
admit. ‘Occasionally?’ Radek becomes indignant and accuses me of
assailing one of the most fundamental ideas of Lenin. But Radek is angry
only because he is wrong. In LESSONS OF OCTOBER, which Radek likewise
submits to criticism after a delay of about four years, I interpreted
Lenin’s words on the ‘realization’ of the democratic dictatorship in the
following manner:

‘A democratic workers’ and peasants’ coalition could only take shape as
an immature form of power incapable of attaining real power – it could
take shape only as a tendency and not as a concrete fact.’ (_Collected
Works,_ Vol. III, part 1, p.XXI [1])

With regard to this interpretation, Radek writes: ‘Such an
interpretation of the content of one of the most outstanding theoretical
chapters in the work of Lenin _is worth absolutely nothing_.’ These
words are followed by a pathetic appeal to the traditions of Bolshevism,
and finally, the conclusion: ‘These questions are too important for it
to be possible to reply to them with a reference to what Lenin
_occasionally_ said.’

By this, Radek wants to evoke the image of my treating carelessly ‘one
of the most outstanding’ of Lenin’s ideas. But Radek is wasting
indignation and pathos for nothing. A little understanding would be more
in place here. My presentation in LESSONS OF OCTOBER, even though very
condensed, does not rest upon a sudden inspiration on the basis of
quotations taken at second hand, but upon a genuine thorough study of
Lenin’s writings. It reproduces the essence of Lenin’s idea on this
question, while the verbose presentation of Radek, despite the abundance
of quotations, does not retain a single living passage of Lenin’s
thought.

Why did I make use of the qualifying word ‘occasionally’? Because that
is how the matter really stood. References to the fact that the
democratic dictatorship was ‘realized’ in the form of the dual power
(’in a certain form and up to a certain point’) were made by Lenin only
in the period between April and October 1917, that is, _before the
actual carrying out of the democratic revolution_. Radek neither
noticed, understood, nor evaluated this. In the struggle against the
present epigones, Lenin spoke extremely conditionally of the
‘realization’ of the democratic dictatorship. He did so not to give a
historical characterization of the period of the dual power – in this
form it would be plain nonsense – but to argue against those who
expected a second, improved edition of the independent democratic
dictatorship. Lenin’s words only meant that there is not and will not be
any democratic dictatorship outside of the miserable miscarriage of the
dual power, and that for this reason it was necessary to ‘rearm’ the
party, i.e., change the slogan. To contend that the coalition of the
Mensheviks and the Socialist-Revolutionaries with the bourgeoisie, which
refused the peasants the land and hounded the Bolsheviks, constituted
the ‘realization’ of the Bolshevik slogan – this means either
deliberately to pass off black as white or else to have lost one’s head
entirely.

With regard to the Mensheviks, an argument could be presented which
would to a certain point be analogous to Lenin’s argument against
Kamenev: ‘You are citing for the bourgeoisie to fulfil a “progressive”
mission in the revolution? This mission has already been realized: the
political role of Rodzianko, Guchkov and Milyukov is the maximum that
the bourgeoisie is able to give, just as Kerenskyism is the maximum of
democratic revolution that could be realized as an independent stage.’

Unmistakable anatomical features – rudiments – show that our ancestors
had a tail. These features suffice to confirm the genetic unity of the
animal world. But, to put it quite candidly, man has no tail. Lenin
demonstrated to Kamenev the rudiments of the democratic dictatorship in
the regime of the dual power, warning him that no new organ should be
hoped for out of these rudiments. And we did not have an independent
democratic dictatorship, even though we completed the democratic
revolution more deeply, more resolutely, more purely than had ever been
done anywhere else.

Radek should reflect upon the fact that if in the period from February
to April the democratic dictatorship had _actually_ been realized, even
Molotov would have recognized it. The party and the class understood the
democratic dictatorship as a regime which would mercilessly destroy the
old state apparatus of the monarchy and completely liquidate manorial
landed property. But there was not a trace of this in the Kerensky
period. For the Bolshevik Party, however, it was a question of the
_actual realization of the revolutionary tasks_, and not of the
revelation of certain sociological and historical ‘rudiments’. Lenin, in
order to enlighten his adversaries theoretically, illuminated splendidly
these features which did not attain development – and that is all he did
in this connexion. Radek, however, endeavours in all seriousness to
convince us that in the period of the dual power, that is, of
powerlessness, the ‘dictatorship’ did exist and the democratic
revolution was realized. Only, you see, it was such a ‘democratic
revolution’ that all Lenin’s genius was required to recognize it. But
this is just the thing that signifies that it was not realized. The real
democratic revolution is something that every illiterate peasant in
Russia or in China would easily recognize. But so far as the
morphological features are concerned, it is a more difficult thing. For
example, despite the lesson provided by Kamenev in Russia, it is
impossible to get Radek to finally take note of the fact that in China
too the democratic dictatorship was likewise ‘realized’ in Lenin’s sense
(through the Kuomintang); and that it was realized more completely and
in a more finished form than was the case in our country through the
institution of dual power. Only hopeless simpletons can expect a second
and improved edition of ‘democracy’ in China.

If the democratic dictatorship had only been realized in our country in
the form of Kerenskyism, which played the role of errand boy to Lloyd
George and Clemenceau, then we would have to say that history indulged
in cruel mockery of the strategic slogan of Bolshevism. Fortunately, it
is not so. The Bolshevik slogan was realized in fact – not as a
morphological trait but as a very great historical reality. Only, it was
realized _not before, but after October_. The peasant war, in the words
of Marx, supported the dictatorship of the proletariat. The
collaboration of the two classes was realized through October on a
gigantic scale. At that time every ignorant peasant grasped and felt,
even without Lenin’s commentaries, that the Bolshevik slogan had been
given life. And Lenin himself estimated the October Revolution – its
first stage – as the _true_ realization of the democratic revolution,
and by that also as the true, even if changed, embodiment of the
strategic slogan of the Bolsheviks. The _whole_ of Lenin must be
considered. And above all, the Lenin of after October, when he surveyed
and evaluated events from a higher vantage point. Finally, Lenin must be
considered in a Leninist way, and not in that of the epigones.

The question of the class character of the revolution and its ‘growing
over’ was submitted by Lenin (after October) to an analysis in his book
against Kautsky. Here is one of the passages over which Radek should
reflect a bit.

‘Yes, our revolution (the October Revolution – L.T.) is a bourgeois
revolution _so long_ as we march with the peasantry _as a whole_. This
has been clear as clear can be to us; we have said it hundreds and
thousands of times since 1905, and we have never attempted to skip this
necessary stage of the historical process or abolish it by decrees.’

And further on:

‘Things have turned out just as we said they would. The course taken by
the revolution has confirmed the correctness of our reasoning. _First_,
with the “whole” of the peasantry against the monarchy, the landlords,
the mediaeval regime (and to that extent, the revolution remains
bourgeois, bourgeois-democratic). Then with the poorest peasants, with
the semi-proletarians, with all the exploited, _against capitalism_,
including the rural rich, the kulaks, the profiteers, and to that extent
the revolution becomes a _socialist_ one.’ (XV, p.508 [2])

That is how Lenin spoke – not ‘occasionally’ but always, or, more
accurately _invariably_ – when he gave a finished and generalized and
perfected evaluation of the revolution, including October. ‘Things have
turned out just as we said they would.’ The bourgeois-democratic
revolution was realized as a coalition of the workers and peasants.
During the Kerensky period? No, _during the first period after October_.
Is that right? It is. But, as we now know, it was not realized in the
form of a democratic dictatorship, but in the form of the dictatorship
of the proletariat. With that there also disappeared the necessity for
the old algebraic formula.

If the conditional argument of Lenin against Kamenev in 1917 and the
rounded-out Leninist characterization of the October Revolution in the
subsequent years are uncritically juxtaposed, then it follows that two
democratic revolutions were ‘realized’ in Russia. This is too much, all
the more since the second is separated from the first by an armed
uprising of the proletariat.

Now contrast the quotation just made from Lenin’s book, THE PROLETARIAN
REVOLUTION AND THE RENEGADE KAUTSKY, with the passage from my RESULTS
AND PROSPECTS where, in the chapter on _The Proletarian Regime_, the
first stage of the dictatorship and the prospects of its further
development are outlined:

‘The abolition of feudalism will meet with support from the _entire_
peasantry as the burden-bearing estate. A progressive income tax will
also be supported by the great majority of the peasantry. But any
legislation carried through for the purpose of protecting the
agricultural proletariat will not only not receive the active sympathy
of the majority, but will even meet with the active opposition of a
minority of the peasantry.

‘The proletariat will find itself compelled to carry the class struggle
into the villages and in this manner destroy the community of interest
which is undoubtedly to be found among all peasants, although within
comparatively narrow limits. From the very first moment after its taking
power, the proletariat will have to find support in the antagonisms
between the village poor and the village rich, between the agricultural
proletariat and the agricultural bourgeoisie.’ (OUR REVOLUTION, 1906,
p.255 [3])

How little all this resembles an ‘ignoring’ of the peasantry on my part,
and the complete ‘antagonism’ between the two lines, Lenin’s and mine!

The quotation from Lenin adduced above does not stand alone in his
works. On the contrary, as is always the case with Lenin, the new
formula, which illuminates events more penetratingly, becomes for him
the axis of his speeches and his articles for a whole period. In March
1919, Lenin said:

‘In October 1917 we seized power _together with the peasantry as a
whole_. This was a bourgeois revolution, inasmuch as the class struggle
in the rural districts had not yet developed.’ (XVI, 143 [4])

The following was said by Lenin at the party congress in March 1919:

‘In a country where the proletariat was obliged to assume power with the
aid of the peasantry, where it fell to the lot of the proletariat to
serve as the agent of a petty-bourgeois revolution, until the
organization of the Committees of Poor Peasants, i.e., down to the
summer and even the autumn of 1918, our revolution was to a large extent
a _bourgeois_ revolution.’ (XVI, p.105 [5])

These words were frequently repeated by Lenin in different variations
and on divers occasions. Radek, however, simply avoids this cardinal
idea of Lenin’s, which is decisive in the controversy.

The proletariat took power together with the peasantry in October, says
Lenin. By that alone, the revolution was a bourgeois revolution. Is that
right? In a certain sense, yes. But this means that the _true_
democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the peasantry, that is,
the one which actually destroyed the regime of autocracy and serfdom and
snatched the land from the feudalists, was accomplished not _before_
October but only _after_October; it was accomplished, to use Marx’s
words, in the form of the _dictatorship of the proletariat supported by
the peasant war_ – and then, a few months later, began growing into a
socialist dictatorship. Is _this_ really hard to understand? Can
differences of opinion prevail on this point _today_?

According to Radek, the ‘permanent’ theory sins by mixing up the
bourgeois stage with the socialist. In reality, however, the class
dynamics so thoroughly ‘mixed up’, that is, _combined_ these two stages,
that our unfortunate metaphysician is no longer in a position even to
find the threads.

Certainly, many gaps and many incorrect contentions can be found in
RESULTS AND PROSPECTS. But after all, this work was written not in 1928,
but considerably before October – before the October of 1905. The
question of the gaps in the theory of the permanent revolution, or, more
correctly, in my basic arguments for this theory at that time, is not
even touched upon by Radek; for, following his teachers – the epigones –
he attacks not the gaps but the strong sides of the theory, those which
the course of historical development confirmed, attacks them in the name
of the utterly false conclusions which he deduces from Lenin’s
formulation – which Radek has not thoroughly studied or thought out to
the very end.

Juggling with old quotations is in general practiced by the whole school
of epigones on a quite special plane which nowhere intersects the real
historical process. But when the opponents of ‘Trotskyism’ have to
occupy themselves with the analysis of the real development of the
October Revolution, and occupy themselves with it seriously and
conscientiously – which happens to some of them from time to time – then
they inevitably arrive at formulations in the spirit of the theory which
they reject. We find the dearest proof of this in the works of A.
Yakovlev which are devoted to the history of the October Revolution. The
class relationships of old Russia are formulated by this author, today a
prop of the ruling faction [6] and undoubtedly more literate than the
other Stalinists, and particularly than Stalin himself, as follows :

‘We see a twofold limitedness in the peasants’ uprising (March to
October 1917). Raising itself to the level of a peasant war, the
uprising did not overcome its limitedness, did not burst asunder the
confines of its immediate task of destroying the neighbouring landowner;
did not transform itself into an organized revolutionary movement; did
not surmount the character of an elemental outbreak that distinguishes a
peasant movement.

‘The peasant uprising taken by itself – an elemental uprising, limited
in its aim to the extermination of the neighbouring landowner – could
not triumph, could not destroy the state power hostile to the peasantry,
which supported the landowner. That is why the agrarian movement is
capable of winning only if it is led by the corresponding urban class
... This is the reason why the fate of the agrarian revolution, in the
final analysis, was decided not in the tens of thousands of villages,
but in the hundreds of towns. Only the working class, which was dealing
the bourgeoisie a mortal blow in the centres of the country, could bring
the peasant uprising to victory; only the victory of the working class
in the city could tear the peasant movement out of the confines of an
elemental clash of tens of millions of peasants with tens of thousands
of landowners; only the victory of the working class, finally, could lay
the foundations for a new type of peasant organization which united the
poor and middle peasantry not with the bourgeoisie but with the working
class. The problem of the victory of the peasant uprising was a problem
of the victory of the working class in the towns.

‘When the workers dealt the government of the bourgeoisie a decisive
blow in October, they thereby solved in passing the problem of the
victory of the peasant uprising.’

And further on:

‘... The whole essence of the matter is this, that by virtue of the
historically given conditions, bourgeois Russia in 1917 entered into an
alliance with the landowners. Even the most left factions of the
bourgeoisie, like the Mensheviks and the Socialist-Revolutionaries, did
not go beyond arranging a deal favourable to the landowners. Therein
lies the most important difference between the conditions of the Russian
Revolution and the French Revolution which took place more than a
hundred years earlier ... The peasant revolution could not triumph as a
bourgeois revolution in 1917. (Exactly ! – _L.T._) Two roads were open
to it. _Either defeat under the blows of the bourgeoisie and the
landowners or – victory as movement accompanying and auxiliary to the
proletarian revolution. By taking over the mission of the bourgeoisie in
the Great French Revolution, by taking over the task of leading the
agrarian democratic revoIution, the working class of Russia obtained the
possibility of carrying out a victorious proletarian revolution._’ (THE
PEASANT MOVEMENT IN 1917, State Publishing House, 1927, pp.x-xi, xi-xii)

What are the fundamental elements of Yakovlev’s arguments? The
incapacity of the peasantry to play an _independent_ political role: the
resultant inevitability of the leading role of an urban class; the
inaccessibility for the Russian bourgeoisie of the role of leader in the
agrarian revolution; the resultant inevitability of the leading role of
the proletariat; its seizure of power as leader of the agrarian
revolution; finally, the dictatorship of the proletariat which supports
itself upon the peasant war and opens up the epoch of socialist
revolution. This destroys to the roots the metaphysical posing of the
question concerning the ‘bourgeois’ or the ‘socialist’ character of the
revolution. The gist of the matter lay in the fact that the agrarian
question, which constituted the basis of the bourgeois revolution, could
not be solved under the rule of the bourgeoisie. The dictatorship of the
proletariat appeared on the scene not _after_ the completion of the
agrarian democratic revolution but as the necessary _prerequisite_ for
its accomplishment. In a word, in this retrospective schema of
Yakovlev’s, we have all the fundamental elements of the theory of the
permanent revolution as formulated by me in 1905. With me, it was a
question of a historical prognosis; Yakovlev, relying upon the
preliminary studies of a whole staff of young research workers, draws
the balance sheet of the events of the three revolutions twenty-two
years after the first revolution and ten years after the October
Revolution. And then? Yakovlev repeats almost literally my formulations
of 1905.

What is Yakovlev’s attitude, however, to the theory of the permanent
revolution ? It is an attitude that befits every Stalinist functionary
who wants to retain his post and even to climb to a higher one. But how
does Yakovlev, in this case, reconcile his appraisal of the driving
forces of the October Revolution with the struggle against ‘Trotskyism’?
Very simply: he does not give a thought to such a reconciliation. Like
some liberal Tsarist officials, who acknowledged Darwin’s theory but at
the same time appeared regularly at communion, Yakovlev too buys the
right to express Marxist ideas from time to time at the price of
participating in the ritualistic baiting of the permanent revolution.
Similar examples can be adduced by the dozen.

It still remains to add that Yakovlev did not execute the above-quoted
work on the history of the October Revolution on his own initiative, but
on the basis of a decision of the Central Committee, which at the same
time charged me with the editing of Yakovlev’s work. [7] At that time,
Lenin’s recovery was still expected, and it never occurred to any of the
epigones to kindle an artificial dispute around the permanent
revolution. At any rate, in my capacity as the former, or, more
correctly, as the proposed editor of the official history of the October
Revolution, I can establish with complete satisfaction that the author,
in all disputed questions, consciously or unconsciously employed the
literal formulations of my proscribed and heretical work on the
permanent revolution (RESULTS AND PROSPECTS).

The rounded-out evaluation of the historical fate of the Bolshevik
slogan which Lenin himself gave shows with certainty that the difference
of the two lines, the ‘permanent’ and Lenin’s, had a secondary and
subordinate significance; what united them, however, was most
fundamental. And this foundation of both lines, which were completely
fused by the October Revolution, is in irreconcilable antagonism not
only to the February-March line of Stalin and the April-October line of
Kamenev, Rykov and Zinoviev, not only to the whole China policy of
Stalin, Bukharin and Martynov, but also to the present ‘China’ line of
Radek.

And when Radek, who changed his judgment of values so radically between
1925 and the second half of 1928, seeks to convict me of not
understanding: ‘the complexity of Marxism and Leninism’, then I can
reply: The _fundamental_ train of thought which I developed twenty-three
years ago in RESULTS AND PROSPECTS, I consider confirmed by events as
completely correct, and, precisely because of that, in agreement with
the strategical line of Bolshevism.

In particular I fail to see the slightest reason for withdrawing
anything of what I said in 1922 on the permanent revolution in the
foreword to my book THE YEAR 1905, which the whole party read and
studied in innumerable editions and reprints while Lenin was alive, and
which ‘disturbed’ Kamenev only in the autumn of 1924 and Radek for the
first time in the autumn of 1928.

‘Precisely in the period between January 9 and the October strike’ (it
says in this foreword) ‘the author formed those opinions which later
received the name: “theory of the permanent revolution”. This somewhat
unusual name expressed the idea that the Russian revolution, directly
confronted by bourgeois tasks, could in no case halt at them. _The
revolution would not be able to solve its immediate bourgeois tasks
except by putting the proletariat in power ..._

‘This appraisal was confirmed as completely correct, though after a
lapse of twelve years. The Russian revolution could not terminate with a
bourgeois-democratic regime. It had to transfer power to the working
class. _If the working class was still too weak for the capture of power
in 1905, it had to mature and grow strong not in the
bourgeois-democratic republic but in the illegality of Third-of-June
Tsarism._’ [8] (L. Trotsky, THE YEAR 1905, Foreword).

I want to quote in addition one of the sharpest polemical judgments
which I passed on the slogan of the ‘democratic dictatorship’. In 1909,
I wrote in the Polish organ of Rosa Luxemburg:

‘While the Mensheviks, proceeding from the abstraction that “our
revolution is bourgeois” arrive at the idea of adapting the whole tactic
of the proletariat to the conduct of the liberal bourgeoisie, right up
to the capture of state power, the Bolsheviks, proceeding from the same
bare abstraction: “democratic, not socialist dictatorship”, arrive at
the idea of the bourgeois-democratic self-limitation of the proletariat
with power in its hands. The difference between them on this question is
certainly quite important: while the anti-revolutionary sides of
Menshevism are already expressed in full force today, the
anti-revolutionary features of Bolshevism threaten to become a great
danger only in the event of the victory of the revolution.’

To this passage in the article, which is reprinted in the Russian
edition of my book THE YEAR 1905, I made the following annotation in
January 1922:

‘As is known, this did not take place, for Bolshevism under the
leadership of Lenin (though not without internal struggle), accomplished
its ideological rearmament on this most important question in the spring
of 1917, that is, before the seizure of power.’

These two quotations have been subjected since 1924 to a furious barrage
of criticism. Now, after a delay of four years, Radek has also joined in
with this criticism. Yet, if one reflects conscientiously upon the
quoted lines, it must be admitted that they contained an important
prognosis and a no less important warning. The fact does remain that at
the moment of the February Revolution the whole so-called ‘old guard’ of
the Bolsheviks held the position of the bald counterposing of the
democratic dictatorship to the socialist dictatorship. Out of Lenin’s
‘algebraic’ formula his closest disciples made a purely metaphysical
construction and directed it against the real development of the
revolution. At a most important historical turning point, the top
leadership of the Bolsheviks in Russia adopted a reactionary position,
and had Lenin not arrived so opportunely they could have knifed the
October Revolution under the banner of the struggle against Trotskyism,
as they later knifed the Chinese Revolution. Very piously, Radek
describes the false position of the whole leading party stratum as a
sort of ‘accident’. But that has little value as a Marxist explanation
of the vulgar democratic position of Kamenev, Zinoviev, Stalin, Molotov,
Rykov, Kalinin, Nogin, Milyutin, Krestlusky, Frunze, Yaroslavsky,
Ordjonikidze, Preobrazhensky, Smilga and a dozen other ‘old Bolsheviks’.
Would it not be more correct to acknowledge that the old, algebraic
Bolshevik formula contained certain dangers within it? Political
development filled it – as always happens with an ambiguous
revolutionary formula – with a content hostile to the proletarian
revolution. It is self-evident that if Lenin had lived in Russia and had
observed the development of the party, day by day, especially during the
war, he would have given the necessary correctives and clarifications in
time. Luckily for the revolution, he arrived soon enough, even though
delayed, to undertake the necessary ideological rearmament. The class
instinct of the proletariat and the revolutionary pressure of the party
rank and file, prepared by the entire preceding work of Bolshevism, made
it possible for Lenin, in struggle with the top leadership and despite
their resistance, to switch tire policy of the party to a new track in
ample time.

Does it really follow from this that today we must accept for China,
India and other countries Lenin’s formula of 1905 in its algebraic form,
i.e., in all its ambiguity; and that we must leave it to the Chinese and
Indian Stalins and Rykovs (Tang Ping-shan, Roy and others) to fill the
formula with a petty-bourgeois national-democratic content – and then
wait for the timely appearance of a Lenin who will undertake the
necessary correctives of April 4? But is such a corrective assured for
China and India? Wouldn’t it be more appropriate to introduce into this
formula those specific corrections the necessity for which has been
demonstrated by historical experience both in Russia and in China?

Does the foregoing mean that the slogan of the democratic dictatorship
of the proletariat and peasantry should be understood simply as a
‘mistake’? Nowadays, as we know, all ideas and actions of man are
divided into two categories : absolutely correct ones, that is, those
that comprise the ‘general line’, and absolutely false ones, that is,
deviations from this line. This, of course, does not prevent what is
absolutely correct today from being declared absolutely false tomorrow.
But the real development of ideas knew also, before the emergence of the
‘general line’, the method of successive approximations to the truth.
Even in simple division in arithmetic it is necessary to experiment in
the selection of digits; one starts with larger or smaller digits, and
then rejects ah but one in the process of testing. In ranging the target
in artillery fire, the method of successive approximations is known as
‘bracketing’. There is absolutely no avoiding the method of
approximation in politics as well. The whole point is to understand in
time that a miss is a miss, and to introduce the necessary corrections
without delay.

The great historic significance of Lenin’s formula lay in the fact that,
under the conditions of a new historical epoch, it probed to the end one
of the most important theoretical and political questions, namely the
question of the degree of political independence attainable by the
various petty-bourgeois groupings, above all, the peasantry. Thanks to
its completeness, the Bolshevik experience of 1905-17 firmly bolted the
door against the ‘democratic dictatorship’. With his own hand, Lenin
wrote the inscription over this door: No Entrance – No Exit. He
formulated it in these words: The peasant must go either with the
bourgeois or with the worker. The epigones, however, completely ignore
this conclusion to which the old formula of Bolshevism led, and contrary
to this conclusion they canonize a provisional hypothesis by inserting
it into the programme. It is really in this, generally speaking, that
the essence of epigonism lies.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. LESSONS OF OCTOBER, US edition, 1937, p.37. The version given in the
English edition of LESSONS OF OCTOBER, 1925, p.35, is inadequate.

2. The Proletarian Revolution and the Renegade Kautsky, 1918, 4th
edition, XXVIII, 276. Selected Works, English edition, VII, pp.190 and
191.

3. See RESULTS AND PROSPECTS, _The Proletarian Regime_.

4. _8th Congress of the RCP: Report on Work in the Countryside_, 4th
edition, XXIX, 180. SELECTED WORKS, English edition, VIII, 171.

5. _8th Congress of the RCP: Report of the Central Committee_, 4th
edition, XXIX, 137. SELECTED WORKS, English edition, VIII, 37.

6. Yakovlev was recedntly appointed People’s Commissar of Agriculture of
the USSR. – _L.T._

1. Excerpt from the minutes of the session of the Organization Bureau of
the Central Committee of May 22, 1922, No.21: ‘To instruct Comrade
Yakovlev ... to compile a textbook on the history of the October
Revolution under the editorial supervision of Comrade Trotsky.’ – _L.T._

8. On June 3 (16), 1907 the _coup d’état_ which formally inaugurated the
triumphant counter-revolution.

The Permanent Revolution



6. ON THE SKIPPING OF HISTORICAL STAGES


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

Radek does not simply repeat a few of the official critical exercises of
recent years, he also sometimes simplifies them, if that be possible.
From what he writes, it follows that I make no distinction at all
between the bourgeois and the socialist revolutions, between the East
and the West, either in 1905 or today. Following Stalin, Radek too
enlightens me on the impermissibility of skipping historical stages.

The question must be put first and foremost: If in 1905 it was for me
simply a matter of the ‘socialist revolution’ then why did I believe
that it could begin in backward Russia sooner than in advanced Europe?
Out of patriotism? Out of national pride? And yet, somehow, that is what
did happen. Does Radek understand that if the democratic revolution had
been realized in Russia as an _independent_ stage, we should not have
had today the dictatorship of the proletariat? If this came earlier here
than in the West, then it was precisely and only because history
combined the main content of the bourgeois revolution with the first
stage of the proletarian revolution – did not mix them up but combined
them organically.

To distinguish between the bourgeois and the proletarian revolution is
political ABC. But after the ABC come syllables, that is, combinations
of letters. History accomplished just such a combination of the most
important letters of the bourgeois alphabet with the first letters of
the socialist alphabet. Radek, however, would like to drag us back from
the already accomplished syllables to the alphabet. This is sad, but
true.

It is nonsense to say that stages cannot in general be skipped. The
living historical process always makes leaps over isolated ‘stages’
which derive from theoretical breakdown into its component parts of the
process of development in its entirety, that is, taken in its fullest
scope. The same is demanded of revolutionary policy at critical moments.
It may be said that the first distinction between a revolutionist and a
vulgar evolutionist lies in the capacity to recognize and exploit such
moments.

Marx’s breakdown of the development of industry into handicraft,
manufacture and factory is part of the ABC of political economy, or more
precisely, of historico-economic theory. In Russia, however, the factory
came by skipping over the epoch of manufacture and of urban handicrafts.
This is already among the syllables of history. An analogous process
took place in our country in class relationships and in politics. The
modern history of Russia cannot be comprehended unless the Marxist
schema of the three stages is known: handicraft, manufacture, factory.
But if one knows _only_ this, one still comprehends nothing. For the
fact is that the history of Russia – Stalin should not take this
personally – skipped a few stages. The theoretical distinction of the
stages, however, is necessary for Russia, too, otherwise one can
comprehend neither what this leap amounted to nor what its consequences
were.

The matter can also be approached from another side (just as Lenin
occasionally approached the dual power), and it can be said that Russia
went through all three of Marx’s stages – the first two, however, in an
extremely telescoped, embryonic form. These ‘rudiments’, the stages of
handicraft and manufacture – merely outlined in dots, so to speak –
suffice to confirm the genetic unity of the economic process.
Nevertheless, the quantitative contraction of the two stages was so
great that it engendered an entirely new quality in the whole social
structure of the nation. The most striking expression of this new
‘quality’ in politics is the October Revolution.

What is most unbearable in this discussion is the ‘theorising’ of
Stalin, with the two trinkets which constitute his entire theoretical
baggage: ‘the law of uneven development’ and the ‘non-skipping of
stages’. Stalin does not understand to this day that the _skipping of
stages_ (or remaining too long at one stage) _is just what uneven
development consists of_. Against the theory of the permanent
revolution, Stalin, with inimitable seriousness, sets up the law of
uneven development. Yet, the prediction that historically backward
Russia could arrive at the proletarian revolution sooner than advanced
Britain rests entirely upon the law of uneven development. However, to
make this prediction one had to understand the historical unevenness in
its whole dynamic concreteness, and not simply keep permanently chewing
upon a 1915 quotation from Lenin, which is turned upside down and
interpreted in the manner of an illiterate.

The dialectic of the historical ‘stages’ is relatively easy to
understand in periods of revolutionary ascent. Reactionary periods, on
the contrary, naturally become epochs of cheap evolutionism. Stalinism,
this gross ideological vulgarity, the worthy daughter of the party
reaction, has created a cult of its own of progress by stages, as a
cover for its political tailism and haggling over rags. This reactionary
ideology has now engulfed Radek too.

One stage or another of the historical process can prove to be
inevitable under certain conditions, although theoretically not
inevitable. And conversely, theoretically ‘inevitable’ stages can be
compressed to zero by the dynamics of development, especially during
revolutions, which have not for nothing been called the locomotives of
history.

For example, in our country the proletariat ‘skipped’ the stage of
democratic parliamentarianism, granting the Constituent Assembly only a
few hours, and even that much only in the back yard. But the
counter-revolutionary stage in China can in no way be skipped over, just
as in Russia the period of the four Dumas could not be skipped over. The
present counter-revolutionary stage in China, however, was historically
in no sense ‘unavoidable’. It is the direct result of the catastrophic
policy of Stalin and Bukharin, who will pass into history as the
organizers of defeats. But the fruits of opportunism have become an
objective factor which can check the revolutionary process for a long
time.

Every attempt to skip over real, that is, objectively conditioned stages
in the development of the masses, is political adventurism. So long as
the majority of the working masses have confidence in the Social
Democrats, or let us say, the Kuomintang, or the trade union leaders, we
cannot pose before them the task of the immediate overthrow of bourgeois
power. The masses must be prepared for that. The preparation can prove
to be a very long ‘stage’. But only a tailist can believe that,
‘together with the masses’, we must sit, first in the Right and then in
the Left Kuomintang, or maintain a bloc with the strike-breaker Purcell
‘until the masses become disillusioned with their leaders’ – whom we, in
the meantime, uphold with our friendship.

Radek will hardly have forgotten that many ‘dialecticians’ characterized
the demand for withdrawal from the Kuomintang and the break with the
Anglo-Russian Committee as nothing but a skipping over of stages, and
besides that, as a breach with the peasantry (in China) and with the
working masses (in Britain). Radek ought to remember this all the better
since he himself was one of the ‘dialecticians’ of this sorry type. Now
he is merely deepening and generalizing his opportunist errors.

In April 1919, Lenin wrote in a programmatic article, _The Third
International and Its Place in History_:

‘We should not be mistaken if we say that it is precisely this
contradiction between the backwardness of Russia and its ‘leap’ to the
higher form of democracy, its leap across bourgeois democracy to Soviet,
or proletarian democracy, that it was precisely this contradiction that
was one of the reasons. . . which, in the West, particularly hindered,
or retarded, the understanding of the role of the Soviets’. (XVI, p.183
[1])

Lenin says here directly that Russia made a ‘leap across bourgeois
democracy’. To be sure, implicit in Lenin’s statement are all the
necessary qualifications: after all, the dialectic does not consist of
each time repeating all the concrete conditions; the writer takes it for
granted that the reader himself also has something in his head. The leap
across bourgeois democracy remains in spite of that, and makes
difficult, according to Lenin’s correct observation, the understanding
of the role of the Soviets by all dogmatists and schematists – not only
‘in the West’, but also in the East.

And here is how this question is dealt with in the foreword to THE YEAR
1905, which now suddenly causes Radek such disquiet:

‘Already in 1905, the Petersburg workers called their Soviet a
proletariat government. This designation passed into the everyday
language of that time and was completely embodied in the programme of
the struggle of the working class for power. At the same time, however,
_we set up against Tsarism an elaborated programme of political
democracy_ (universal suffrage, republic, militia, etc.). We could act
in no other way. Political _democracy is a necessary stage in the
development of the working masses_ – with the highly important
reservation that in one case this stage lasts for decades, while in
another, the revolutionary situation permits the masses to emancipate
themselves from the prejudices of political democracy even before its
institutions have been converted into reality.’ (Trotsky, THE YEAR 1905,
Foreword.)

These words, which, by the way, are in complete accord with the ideas of
Lenin quoted by me above, sufficiently explain, I think, the necessity
of setting up against the dictatorship of the Kuomintang an ‘elaborated
programme of political democracy’. But it is precisely at this point
that Radek swings to the left. In the epoch of the revolutionary ascent
he opposed the withdrawal of the Chinese Communist Party from the
Kuomintang. In the epoch of the counter-revolutionary dictatorship he
resists the mobilization of the Chinese workers under democratic
slogans. This amounts to wearing furs in summer and going naked in
winter.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. 4th edition, XXIX, 281-282. Selected Works, English edition, X,
p.31-32.

The Permanent Revolution



7. WHAT DOES THE SLOGAN OF THE DEMOCRATIC DICTATORSHIP MEAN TODAY FOR THE EAST?


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

Losing his way in the Stalinist – evolutionary, philistine, and not
revolutionary – conception of historical ‘stages’, Radek, too,
endeavours now to sanctify the slogan of the democratic dictatorship of
the proletariat and the peasantry for the whole East. Out of the
‘working hypothesis’ of Bolshevism, which Lenin adapted to the course of
development of a specific country; which he changed, concretized and at
a certain stage cast aside – Radek constructs a supra-historical schema.
On this point he persistently repeats the following in his articles:

‘This theory, as well as the tactic derived from it, is applicable to
all countries with a youthful capitalist development, in which the
bourgeoisie has not liquidated the problem that the preceding
social-political formations have left behind as a heritage.’

Just reflect upon this formula: Is it not a solemn justification of
Kamenev’s position in 1917? Did the Russian bourgeoisie ‘liquidate’ the
problems of the democratic revolution after the February Revolution? No,
they remained unsolved, including the most important of them, the
agrarian problem. How could Lenin fail to comprehend that the old slogan
was still ‘applicable’? Why did he withdraw it?

Radek answered us on this point before: because it had already ‘been
accomplished’. We have examined this answer. It is completely untenable,
and doubly untenable in the mouth of Radek, who holds the view that the
essence of the old Leninist slogan does not at all lie in the forms of
power but in the actual liquidation of serfdom by the collaboration of
the proletariat and the peasantry. But this is precisely what
Kerenskyism did not produce. From this it follows that Radek’s excursion
into our past for the purpose of solving the most acute question of the
day, the Chinese question, is altogether absurd. It is not what Trotsky
understood or failed to understand in 1905 that should have been
investigated, but rather what Stalin, Molotov and especially Rykov and
Kamenev did not grasp in February-March 1917 (what Radek’s position was
in those days I do not know). For if one believes that the democratic
dictatorship was ‘realized’ to such an extent in the dual power as to
require an immediate change of the central slogan, then one must
recognize that the ‘democratic dictatorship’ in China was realized much
more fully and completely through the rtgime of the Kuomintang, that is,
through the rule of Chiang Kai-shek and Wang Ching-wei, with Tang
Ping-shan as appendage. [1] It was all the more necessary, therefore, to
change the slogan in China.

But after all, is the ‘heritage of the preceding social-political
formations’ not yet liquidated in China? No, it is not yet liquidated.
But was it liquidated in Russia on April 4, 1917, when Lenin declared
war upon the whole upper stratum of the ‘old Bolsheviks’? Radek
contradicts himself hopelessly, gets muddled and reels from side to
side. Let us remark in this connection that it is not entirely
accidental that he uses so complicated an expression as ‘heritage of the
formations’, plays variations upon it, and obviously avoids the clearer
term,’remnants of feudalism, or of serfdom’, Why? Because Radek only
yesterday denied these remnants most decisively and thereby tore away
any basis for the slogan of the democratic dictatorship. In his report
in the Communist Academy, Radek said:

‘The sources of the Chinese Revolution are no less deep than were the
sources of our revolution in 1905. One can assert with certainty that
the alliance of the working class with the peasantry will be stronger
there than it was with us in 1905, _for the simple reason that it will
not be directed against two classes, but only against one, the
bourgeoisie._’

Yes, ‘for the simple reason’. What, when the proletariat, together with
the peasantry, directs its fight against one class, the bourgeoisie –
not against the remnants of feudalism, but against the bourgeoisie –
what, if you please, is such a revolution called ? Perhaps a democratic
revolution? Just notice that Radek said this not in 1905, and not even
in 1909, but in March 1927. How is this to be understood? Very simply.
In March 1927, Radek also deviated from the right road, only in another
direction. In its theses on the Chinese question, the Opposition
inserted a most important correction to Radek’s one-sidedness of that
time. But in the words just quoted there was nevertheless a kernel of
truth: there is almost no estate of landlords in China, the landowners
are much more intimately bound up with the capitalists than in Tsarist
Russia, and the specific weight of the agrarian question in China is
therefore much lighter than in Tsarist Russia; but on the other hand,
the question of national liberation bulks very large. Accordingly, the
capacity of the Chinese peasantry for _independent_ revolutionary
political struggle for the democratic renovation of the country
certainly cannot be greater than was the Russian peasantry’s. This found
its expression, among other things, in the bet that neither before 1925
nor during the three years of the revolution in China, did a Narodnik
(Populist) party arise, inscribing the agrarian revolution upon its
banner. All this taken together demonstrates that for China, which has
already left behind it the experience of 1925-27, the formula of the
democratic dictatorship presents a much more dangerous reactionary snare
than in Russia after the February Revolution.

Still another excursion by Radek, into an even further distant past,
turns just as mercilessly against him. This time, it is the matter of
the slogan of the permanent revolution which Marx raised in 1850:

‘With Marx.’ writes Radek, ‘there was no slogan of a democratic
dictatorship, while with Lenin, from 1905 to 1917, it was the political
axis, and formed a component part of his conception of the revolution
_in all_ [?!] _countries_ of incipient [?] capitalist development.’

Basing himself upon a few lines from Lenin, Radek explains this
difference of positions by the fact that the central task of the German
revolution was _national unification_, while in Russia it was the
_agrarian revolution_. If this contrast is not made mechanically, and a
sense of proportion is maintained, then it is correct up to a certain
point. But then how does the matter stand with China? The specific
weight of the national problem in China, a semi-colonial country, is
immeasurably greater in comparison with the agrarian problem than it was
even in Germany in 1848-50; for in China it is simultaneously a question
of unification and of liberation. Marx formulated his perspectives of
the permanent revolution when, in Germany, all the thrones still stood
firm, the Junkers held the land, and the leaders of the bourgeoisie were
tolerated only in the antechamber of the government. In China, there has
been no monarchy since 1911, there is no independent landlord class, the
national-bourgeois Kuomintang is in power, and the relationships of
serfdom are, so to speak, chemically fused with bourgeois exploitation.
The contrast between the positions of Marx and Lenin undertaken by Radek
thus tells entirely against the slogan of the democratic dictatorship in
China.

But Radek does not even take up the position of Marx seriously, but only
casually, episodically, confining himself to the circular of 1850, _in
which Marx still considered the peasantry the natural ally of the
petty-bourgeois urban democracy_. Marx at that time expected an
independent stage of democratic revolution in Germany, that is, a
temporary assumption of power by the urban petty-bourgeois radicals,
supported by the peasantry. There’s the nub of the question! That,
however, is just what did not happen. And not by chance, either. Already
in the middle of the last century, the petty-bourgeois democracy showed
itself to be powerless to carry out its own independent revolution. And
Marx took account of this lesson. On April 16, 1856 – that is, six years
after the circular mentioned – Marx wrote to Engels:

‘The whole thing in Germany will depend on the possibility of covering
the rear of the proletarian revolution by a second edition of the
Peasants’ War. Then the affair will be splendid.’

These remarkable words, completely forgotten by Radek, constitute a
truly precious key to the October Revolution as well as to the whole
problem that occupies us here, in its entirety. Did Marx skip over the
agrarian Revolution? No, as we see, he did not skip over it. Did he
consider the collaboration of the proletariat and the peasantry
necessary in the coming revolution? Yes, he did. Did he grant the
possibility of the leading, or even only an independent, role being
played by the peasantry in the revolution ? No, he did not grant this
possibility. He proceeded from the fact that the peasantry, which had
not succeeded in supporting the bourgeois democracy in the independent
democratic revolution (through the fault of the bourgeois democracy, not
of the peasantry), would be in a position to support the proletariat in
the proletarian revolution. ‘Then the affair will be splendid.’ Radek
apparently does not want to see that this is exactly what happened in
October, and did not happen badly at that.

With regard to China, the conclusions following from this are quite
clear. The dispute is not over the decisive role of the peasantry as an
ally, and not over the great significance of the agrarian revolution,
but over whether an independent agrarian democratic revolution is
possible in China or whether ‘a second edition of the Peasants’ War’
will give support to the proletarian dictatorship. That is the only way
the question stands. Whoever puts it differently has learned nothing and
understood nothing, but only confuses the Chinese Communist Party and
puts it off the right track.

In order that the proletariat of the Eastern countries may open the road
to victory, the pedantic reactionary theory of Stalin and Martynov on
‘stages’ and ‘steps’ must be eliminated at the very outset, must be cast
aside, broken up and swept away with a broom. Bolshevism grew to
maturity in the struggle against this vulgar evolutionism. It is not to
a line of march marked out _a priori_ that we must adapt ourselves, but
to the real course of the class struggle. It is necessary to reject the
idea of Stalin and Kuusinen – the idea of fixing an order of succession
for countries at various levels of development by assigning them in
advance cards for different rations of revolution. One must adapt
oneself to the real course of the class struggle. An inestimable guide
for this is Lenin; but the _whole_ of Lenin must be taken into
consideration.

When in 1919 Lenin, especially in connection with the organization of
the Communist International, unified the conclusions of the period that
had gone by, and gave them an ever more finished theoretical
formulation, he interpreted the experience of Kerenskyism and October as
follows: In a bourgeois society with already developed class antagonisms
there can only be either the dictatorship of the bourgeoisie, open or
disguised, or the dictatorship of the proletariat. There cannot be any
talk of an intermediate regime. Every democracy, every ‘dictatorship of
democracy’ (the ironical quotation marks are Lenin’s) is only a veil for
the rule of the bourgeoisie, as the experience of the most backward
European country, Russia, showed in the epoch of its bourgeois
revolution, i.e., the epoch most favourable to the ‘dictatorship of
democracy’. This conclusion was taken by Lenin as the basis for his
theses on democracy, which were produced only as the sum of the
experiences of the February and October Revolutions.

Like many others, Radek also separates mechanically the question of
democracy from the question of the democratic dictatorship. This is the
source of the greatest blunders. The ‘democratic dictatorship’ can only
be the masked rule of the bourgeoisie during the revolution. This is
taught us by the experience of our ‘dual power’ of 1917 as well as by
the experience of the Kuomintang in China.

The hopelessness of the epigones is most crassly expressed in the fact
that even now they still attempt to contrast the democratic dictatorship
to the dictatorship of the bourgeoisie, as well as to the dictatorship
of the proletariat. But this means that the democratic dictatorship must
be of an intermediate character, that is, have a petty-bourgeois
content. The participation of the proletariat in it does not alter
matters, for in nature there is no such thing as an arithmetical mean of
the various class lines. If it is neither the dictatorship of the
bourgeoisie nor the dictatorship of the proletariat, then it follows
that the petty-bourgeoisie must play the _determining_ and _decisive_
role. But this brings us back to the very same question which has been
answered in practice by the three Russian and the two Chinese
revolutions; is the petty-bourgeoisie today, under the conditions of the
world domination of imperialism, capable of playing a leading
revolutionary role in capitalist countries, even when it is a question
of backward countries which are still confronted with the solution of
their democratic tasks?

There have been epochs in which the lower strata of the
petty-bourgeoisie were able to set up their revolutionary dictatorship.
That we know. But those were epochs in which the proletariat, or
precursor of the proletariat, of the time had not yet become
differentiated from the petty-bourgeoisie, but on the contrary
constituted in its undeveloped condition the fighting core of the
latter. It is quite otherwise today. We cannot speak of the ability of
the petty-bourgeoisie to direct the life of present-day, even if
backward, bourgeois society, insofar as the proletariat has already
separated itself off from the petty-bourgeoisie and is pitted
antagonistically against the big bourgeoisie on the basis of capitalist
development, which condemns the petty-bourgeoisie to nullity and
confronts the peasantry with the inevitable political choice between the
bourgeoisie and the proletariat. Every time the peasantry decides for a
party which on the surface seems petty-bourgeois, it actually offers its
back as a support for finance capital. While in the period of the first
Russian Revolution, or in the period between the first two revolutions,
there could still exist differences of opinion over the _degree of
independence_ (but only the degree!) of the peasantry and the
petty-bourgeoisie in the democratic revolution, now this question has
been decided by the whole course of events of the last twelve years, and
decided irrevocably.

It was raised anew in practice after October in many countries and in
all possible forms and combinations, and everywhere it was settled the
same way. A fundamental experience, following that of Kerenskyism, has
been, as already mentioned, the Kuomintang experience. But no less
importance is to be attached to the experience of fascism in Italy,
where the petty-bourgeoisie, arms in hand, snatched the power from the
old bourgeois parties in order to surrender it immediately, through its
leaders, to the financial oligarchy. The same question arose in Poland,
where the Pilsudski movement was aimed directly against the reactionary
bourgeois-landlord government and mirrored the hopes of the
petty-bourgeois masses and even of wide circles of the proletariat. It
was no accident that the old Polish Social Democrat, Warski, out of fear
of ‘underestimating the peasantry’, identified the Pilsudski revolution
with the ‘democratic dictatorship of the workers and peasants’. It would
lead us too far afield, if I were to analyse here the Bulgarian
experience, that is, the disgracefully confused policy of the Kolarovs
and Kabakchievs towards tile party of Stambulisky, or the shameful
experiment with the Farmer-Labour Party in the United States, or
Zinoviev’s romance with Radic, or the experience of the Communist Party
of Rumania, and so on and so forth without end. Some of these facts are
analysed, in their essentials, in my CRITICISM OF THE DRAFT PROGRAMME OF
THE COMMUNIST INTERNATIONAL. The fundamental conclusion of all these
experiences fully confirms and strengthens the lessons of
October-namely, that the petty-bourgeoisie, including the peasantry, is
incapable of playing the role of leader in modern, even if backward,
bourgeois society, in revolutionary no less than in reactionary epochs.
The peasantry can either support the dictatorship of the bourgeoisie, or
serve as prop to the dictatorship of the proletariat. Intermediate forms
are only disguises for a dictatorship of the bourgeoisie, which has
begun to totter or which has not yet recovered its feet after
disturbances (Kerenskyism, Fascism, Pilsudski’s regime).

The peasantry can follow either the bourgeoisie or the proletariat: But
when the proletariat attempts to march at all costs with a peasantry
which is not following it, the proletariat proves in fact to be tailing
after finance capital: the workers as defenders of the fatherland in
Russia in 1917; the workers – including the Communists as well – in the
Kuomintang in China; the workers in the Polish Socialist Party, and also
the Communists to some extent, in Poland in 1926, etc.

Whoever has not thought this out to the end, and who has not understood
the events from the fresh trail they have left behind, had better not
get involved in revolutionary politics.

The fundamental conclusion which Lenin drew from the lessons of the
February and the October Revolutions, and drew exhaustively and
comprehensively, thoroughly rejects the idea of the ‘democratic
dictatorship’. The following was repeated by Lenin more than once after
1918:

‘The whole of political economy, if anybody has learned anything from
it, the whole history of revolution, the whole history of political
development throughout the nineteenth century, teaches us that the
peasant follows the worker or the bourgeois ... If you do not know why,
I would say to such citizens ... consider the development of any of the
great revolutions of the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries, the
political history of any country in the nineteenth century. It will tell
you why. The economic structure of capitalist society is such that the
ruling forces in it can only be capital or the proletariat which
overthrows it. There are no other forces in the economic structure of
that society.’ (XVI, 217 [2])

It is not a matter here of modern England or Germany. On the basis of
the lessons of any one of the great revolutions of the eighteenth or the
nineteenth centuries, that is, of the _bourgeois_ revolutions in
the_backward_ countries, Lenin comes to the conclusion that only the
dictatorship of the bourgeoisie or the dictatorship of the proletariat
is possible. There cannot be a ‘democratic’, that is, an intermediate
dictatorship.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

His theoretical and historical excursion is summed up by Radek, as we
see, in the rather thin aphorism that the bourgeois revolution must be
distinguished from the socialist. Having descended to this ‘step’, Radek
straightway stretches out a finger to Kuusinen who, proceeding from his
one lone resource, that is, ‘common sense’, considers it improbable that
the slogan of the proletarian dictatorship can be raised in both the
advanced and the backward countries. With the sincerity of a man who
understands nothing, Kuusinen convicts Trotsky of having ‘learned
nothing’ since 1905. Following Kuusinen, Radek also becomes ironical:
for Trotsky, ‘the peculiarity of the Chinese and Indian revolutions
consists precisely of the fact that they are in no way distinguished
from the western European revolutions and must, therefore, in their
first steps [? ! ] lead to the dictatorship of the proletariat.’

Radek forgets one trifle in this connection: The dictatorship of the
proletariat was not realized in a Western European country, but
precisely in a backward Eastern European country. Is it Trotsky’s fault
that the historical process overlooked the ‘peculiarity’ of Russia?
Radek forgets further that the bourgeoisie – more accurately, finance
capital – rules in _all_ the capitalist countries, with all their
diversity in level of development, social structure, traditions, etc.,
that is, all their ‘peculiarities’. Here again, the lack of respect for
this peculiarity proceeds from historical development and not at all
from Trotsky.

Then wherein lies the distinction between the advanced and the backward
countries ? The distinction is great, but it still remains within the
limits of the domination of capitalist relationships. The forms and
methods of the rule of the bourgeoisie differ greatly in different
countries. At one pole, the domination bears a stark and absolute
character: _The United States_. At the other pole finance capital adapts
itself to the outlived institutions of Asiatic mediaevalism by
subjecting them to itself and imposing its own methods upon them:
_India_. But the bourgeoisie rules in both places. From this it follows
that the dictatorship of the proletariat also will have a highly varied
character in terms of the social basis, the political forms, the
immediate tasks and the tempo of work in the various capitalist
countries. But to lead the masses of the people to victory over the bloc
of the imperialists, the feudalists and the national bourgeoisie – this
can be done only under the revolutionary hegemony of the proletariat,
which transforms itself after the seizure of power into the dictatorship
of the proletariat.

Radek fancies that when he has divided humanity into two groups – one
which has ‘matured’ for the socialist dictatorship, and another which
has ‘matured’ only for the democratic dictatorship – he has by this
alone, in contrast to me, taken into consideration the alleged
‘peculiarity’ of the individual countries. In reality he has turned out
a lifeless stereotype which can only divert the Communists from a
genuine study of the peculiarity of a given country, i.e., the living
interpenetration of the various steps and stages of historical
development in that country.

The peculiarities of a country which has not accomplished or completed
its democratic revolution are of such great significance that they must
be taken as the basis for the programme of the proletarian vanguard.
Only upon the basis of such a national programme can a Communist party
develop its real and successful struggle for the majority of the working
class and the toilers in general against the bourgeoisie and its
democratic agents.

The possibility of success in this struggle is of course determined to a
large extent by the role of the proletariat in the economy of the
country, and consequently by the level of its capitalist development.
This, however, is by no means the only criterion. No less important is
the question whether a far-reaching and burning problem ‘for the people’
exists in the country, in the solution of which the majority of the
nation is interested, and which demands for its solution the boldest
revolutionary measures. Among problems of this kind are the agrarian
question and the national question, in their varied combinations. With
the acute agrarian problem and the intolerable national oppression in
the colonial countries, the young and relatively small proletariat can
come to power on the basis of a _national democratic_ revolution sooner
than the proletariat of an advanced country on a purely _socialist_
basis. It might have seemed that since October there should be no
necessity to prove this any more. But through the years of ideological
reaction and through the theoretical depravity of the epigones, the
elementary conceptions of the revolution have become so rank, so putrid
and so ... Kuusinified, that one is compelled each time to begin all
over again.

Does it follow from what has been said that all the countries of the
world, in one way or another, are already today ripe for the socialist
revolution? No, this is a false, dead, scholastic, Stalinist-Bukharinist
way of putting the question. World economy in its entirety is
indubitably ripe for socialism. But this does not mean that every
country taken separately is ripe. Then what is to happen with the
dictatorship of the proletariat in the various backward countries, in
China, India, etc.? To this we answer: History is not made to order. A
country can become ‘ripe’ for the dictatorship of the proletariat not
only before it is ripe for the independent construction of socialism,
but even before it is ripe for far-reaching socialization measures. One
must not proceed from a preconceived harmony of social development. The
law of uneven development still lives, despite the tender theoretical
embraces of Stalin. The force of this law operates not only in the
relations of countries to each other, but also in the mutual
relationships of the various processes within one and the same country.
A reconciliation of the uneven processes of economics and politics can
be attained only on a world scale. In particular this means that the
question of the dictatorship of the proletariat in China cannot be
considered exclusively within the limits of Chinese economics and
Chinese politics.

It is precisely here that we come up against the two mutually exclusive
standpoints: the international revolutionary theory of the permanent
revolution and the national-reformist theory of socialism in one
country. Not only backward China, but in general no country in the world
can build socialism within its own national limits: the
‘highly-developed productive forces which have grown beyond national
boundaries resist this, just as do those forces which are insufficiently
developed for nationalization. The dictatorship of the proletariat in
Britain, for example, will encounter difficulties and contradictions,
different in character, it is true, but perhaps not slighter than those
that will confront the dictatorship of the proletariat in China.
Surmounting these contradictions is possible in both cases only by way
of the international revolution. This standpoint leaves no room for the
question of the ‘maturity’ or ‘immaturity’ of China for the socialist
transformation. What remains indisputable here is that the backwardness
of China makes the tasks of the proletarian dictatorship extremely
difficult. But we repeat: History is not made to order, and the Chinese
proletariat has no choice.

Does this at least mean that every country, including the most backward
colonial country, is ripe, if not for socialism, then for the
dictatorship of the proletariat ? No, this is not what it means. Then
what is to happen with the democratic revolution in general – and in the
colonies in particular? Where is it written – I answer the question with
another question – that every colonial country is ripe for the immediate
and thoroughgoing solution of its national democratic tasks? The
question must be approached from the other end. Under the conditions of
the imperialist epoch the national democratic revolution can be carried
through to a victorious end only when the social and political
relationships of the country are mature for putting the proletariat in
power as the leader of the masses of the people. And if this is not yet
the case? Then the struggle for national liberation will produce only
very partial results, results directed entirely against the working
masses. In 1905, the proletariat of Russia did not prove strong enough
to unite the peasant masses around it and to conquer power. For this
very reason, the revolution halted midway, and then sank lower and
lower. In China, where, in spite of the exceptionally favourable
situation, the leadership of the Communist International prevented the
Chinese proletariat from fighting for power, the national tasks found a
wretched, unstable and niggardly solution in the regime of the
Kuomintang.

When and under what conditions a colonial country will become ripe for
the real revolutionary solution of its agrarian and national problems
cannot be foretold. But in any case we can assert today with full
certainty that not only China but also India will attain genuine
people’s democracy, that is, workers’ and peasants’ democracy, only
through the dictatorship of the proletariat. On that road there may
still be many stages, steps and phases. Under the pressure of the masses
of the people the bourgeoisie will still take steps to the left, in
order then to fall all the more mercilessly upon the people. Periods of
dual power are possible and probable. But what there will not be, what
there cannot be, is a genuine democratic dictatorship that is not the
dictatorship of the proletariat. An ‘independent’ democratic
dictatorship can only be of the type of the Kuomintang, that is,
directed entirely against the workers and the peasants. We must
understand this at the outset and teach it to the masses, without hiding
the class realities behind abstract formulas.

Stalin and Bukharin preached that thanks to the yoke of imperialism the
bourgeoisie could carry out the national revolution in China. The
attempt was made. With what results? The proletariat was brought under
the headman’s axe. Then it was said: The democratic dictatorship will
come next. The petty-bourgeois dictatorship proved to be only a masked
dictatorship of capital. By accident? No. ‘The peasant follows either
the worker or the bourgeois.’ In the first case, the dictatorship of the
proletariat arises; in the other the dictatorship of the bourgeoisie. It
would seem that the lesson of China is clear enough, even if studied
from afar. ‘No,’ we are answered, ‘that was merely an unsuccessful
experiment. We will begin everything all over again and this time set up
the " genuine " democratic dictatorship.’ ‘By what means?’ ‘On the
social basis of the collaboration of the proletariat and the peasantry.’
It is Radek who presents us with this latest discovery. But, if you will
permit, the Kuomintang arose on that very same basis: workers and
peasants ‘collaborated’ – to pull the chestnuts out of the fire for the
bourgeoisie. Tell us what the political mechanics of this collaboration
will look like. With what will you replace the Kuomintang? What parties
will be in power? Indicate them at least approximately, at least
describe them! To this Radek answers (in 1928!) that only people who are
completely done for, who are incapable of understanding the complexity
of Marxism, can be interested in such a secondary technical question as
which class will be the horse and which the rider; whereas a Bolshevik
must ‘abstract’ himself from the political superstructure, focusing his
attention on the class foundation. No, permit me, you have already had
your joke. You have already ‘abstracted’ enough. More than enough! In
China, you ‘abstracted’ yourself from the question of how class
collaboration expressed itself in party matters, you dragged the
proletariat into the Kuomintang, you became infatuated with the
Kuomintang to the point of losing your senses, you furiously resisted
withdrawal from the Kuomintang; you shrank from political questions of
struggle by repeating abstract formulas. And after the bourgeoisie has
very concretely broken the skull of the proletariat, you propose to us:
Let us try all over again; and as a beginning let us once more
‘abstract’ ourselves from the question of the parties and the
revolutionary power. No! These are very poor jokes. We will not allow
ourselves to be dragged back!

All these acrobatics, as we have perceived, are presented in the
interest of an alliance of the workers and peasants. Radek warns the
Opposition against an underestimation of the peasantry and cites the
struggle of Lenin against the Mensheviks. Sometimes, when one observes
what is being done with quotations from Lenin, one resents bitterly such
offences against the dignity of human thought. Yes, Lenin said more than
once that denial of the revolutionary role of the peasantry was
characteristic of the Mensheviks. And that was right. But in addition to
these quotations, there also was the year 1917, in which the Mensheviks
spent the eight months which separated the February from the October
Revolution in an unbroken bloc with the Socialist Revolutionaries. In
that period the Socialist Revolutionaries represented the overwhelming
majority of the peasantry awakened by the revolution. Together with the
SRs, the Mensheviks called themselves the revolutionary democracy and
remonstrated with us that they were the very ones who based themselves
upon the alliance of the workers with the peasants (soldiers). Thus,
after the February Revolution the Mensheviks expropriated, so to speak,
the Bolshevik formula of the alliance of the workers and peasants. The
Bolsheviks were accused by them of wanting to split the proletarian
vanguard from the peasantry and thereby to ruin the revolution. In other
words, the Mensheviks accused Lenin of ignoring, or at least of
underestimating the peasantry.

The criticism of Kamenev, Zinoviev and others directed against Lenin was
only an echo of the criticism of the Mensheviks. The present criticism
of Radek in turn is only a belated echo of the criticism of Kamenev.

The policy of the epigones in China, including Radek’s policy, is the
continuation and the further development of the Menshevik masquerade of
1917. The fact that the Communist party remained in the Kuomintang was
defended not only by Stalin, but also by Radek, with the same reference
to the necessity of the alliance of the workers and peasants. But when
it was ‘accidentally’ revealed that the Kuomintang was a bourgeois
party, the attempt was repeated with the ‘Left’ Kuomintang. The results
were the same. Thereupon, the abstraction of the democratic
dictatorship, in distinction from the dictatorship of the proletariat,
was elevated above this sorry reality which had not fulfilled the high
hopes – a fresh repetition of what we had already had. In 1917, we heard
a hundred times from Tsereteli, Dan and the others: ‘We already have the
dictatorship of the revolutionary democracy, but you are driving toward
the dictatorship of the proletariat, that is, toward ruin.’ Truly,
people have short memories. The ‘revolutionary democratic dictatorship’
of Stalin and Radek is in no way distinguished from the ‘dictatorship of
the revolutionary democracy’ of Tsereteli and Dan. And in spite of that,
this formula not only runs through all the resolutions of the Comintern,
but it has also penetrated into its programme. It is hard to conceive a
more cunning masquerade and at the same time a more bitter revenge by
Menshevism for the affronts which Bolshevism heaped upon it in 1917.

The revolutionists of the East, however, still have the right to demand
a definite answer to the question of the character of the ‘democratic
dictatorship’, based not upon old, _a priori_ quotations, but upon facts
and upon political experience. To the question: What is a ‘democratic
dictatorship’? – Stalin has repeatedly given the truly classical reply:
For the East, it is approximately the same as ‘Lenin conceived it with
regard to the 1905 Revolution’. This has become the official formula to
a certain extent. It can be found in the books and resolutions devoted
to China, India or Polynesia. Revolutionists are referred to Lenin’s
‘conceptions’ concerning _future_ events, which in the meantime have
long ago become _past_ events, and in addition, the hypothetical
‘conceptions’ of Lenin are interpreted this way and that, but never in
the way that Lenin himself interpreted them _after_ the events.

‘All right,’ says the Communist of the East, hanging his head, ‘we will
try to conceive of it exactly as Lenin, according to your words,
conceived of it before the revolution. But won’t you please tell us what
this slogan looks like in actuality? How was it realized in your
country?’

‘In our country it was realized in the shape of Kerenskyism in the epoch
of dual power.’

‘Can we tell our workers that the slogan of the democratic dictatorship
will be realized in our country in the shape of in our own national
Kerenskyism?’

‘Come, come! Not at all! No worker will adopt such a slogan; Kerenskyism
is servility to the bourgeoisie and betrayal of the working people.’

‘But what, then, must we tell our workers?’ the Communist of the East
asks despondently.

‘You must tell them,’ impatiently answers Kuusinen, the man on duty,
‘that the democratic dictatorship is the one that Lenin conceived of
with regard to the future democratic revolution.’

If the Communist of the East is not lacking in sense, he will seek to
rejoin:

‘But didn’t Lenin explain in 1918 that the democratic dictatorship found
its genuine and true realization only in the October Revolution which
established the dictatorship of the proletariat? Would it not be better
to orient the party and the working class precisely toward this
prospect?’

‘Under no circumstances. Do not even dare to think about it. Why, that
is the per-r-r-manent r-r-r-evolution! That’s Tr-r-rotskyism!’

After this harsh reprimand the Communist of the East turns paler than
the snow on the highest peaks of the Himalayas and abandons any further
craving for knowledge. Let whatever will happen, happen!

And the consequences? We know them well: either contemptible grovelling
before Chiang Kai-shek, or heroic adventures.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Chiang Kai-shek is the leader of the Right Wing, and Wang Ching-wei
of the Left Wing of the Kuomintang. Tang Ping-shan served as a
Cornmunist Minister, carrying out the line of Stalin and Bukharin in
China. – _L.T._

2. _The Deception of the People by the Slogans of Freedom and Equality_,
May 1919, 4th edition, XXIX, 338. An English version was published in
pamphlet form in the LITTLE LENIN LIBRARY in 1934: see pp.34-35 of this
pamphlet.

The Permanent Revolution



8. FROM MARXISM TO PACIFISM


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

What is most alarming, as a symptom, is a passage in Radek’s article
which, to be sure, seems to stand apart from the central theme that
interests us, but which is intimately bound up with this theme by the
uniformity of Radek’s shift toward the present theoreticians of
centrism. I refer to the somewhat disguised advances he makes toward the
theory of socialism in one country. One must dwell on this, for this
‘side-line’ of Radek’s errors can surpass all the other differences of
opinion in its further development, revealing that their quantity has
definitively turned into quality.

Discussing the dangers that threaten the revolution from without, Radek
writes that Lenin ‘.... was conscious of the fact that _with the level
of economic development in Russia in 1905_ this [the proletarian]
dictatorship can maintain itself only if the Western European
proletariat comes to its aid’. (My emphasis – _L.T._)

One mistake after another; above all, a very crude violation of the
historical perspective. In reality Lenin said, and that more than once,
that the democratic dictatorship (and not at all the proletarian) in
Russia would be unable to maintain itself without the socialist
revolution in Europe. This idea runs like a red thread through all the
articles and speeches of Lenin in the days of the Stockholm party
congress in 1906 (polemic against Plekhanov, questions of
nationalization, etc.). In that period, Lenin did not even raise the
question of a proletarian dictatorship in Russia before the socialist
revolution in Western Europe. But it is not there that the most
important thing lies for the moment. What is the meaning of ‘with the
level of economic development of Russia in 1905’? And how do matters
stand with the level in 1917? It is on this difference in levels that
the theory of socialism in one country is erected. The programme of the
Comintern has divided the whole globe into squares which are ‘adequate’
in level for the independent construction of socialism and others which
are ‘inadequate’; and has thus created for revolutionary strategy a
series of hopeless blind alleys. Differences in economic levels can
undoubtedly be of decisive significance for the political power of the
working class. In 1905, we could not raise ourselves to the dictatorship
of the proletariat, just as, for that matter, we were unable to rise to
the democratic dictatorship. In 1917 we set up the dictatorship of the
proletariat, which swallowed up the democratic dictatorship. But with
the economic development of 1917 just as with the 1905 level the
dictatorship can maintain itself and develop to socialism only if the
Western European proletariat comes opportunely to its assistance
Naturally, this ‘opportuneness’ cannot be calculated _a priori_; it is
determined in the course of development and struggle. As against this
_fundamental_ question, determined by the _world_ relationship of
forces, which has the last and decisive word, the difference between
levels of development of Russia in 1905 and in 1917, however important
it is in itself, is a factor of the secondary order.

But Radek does not content himself with the ambiguous reference to this
difference of levels. After referring to the fact that Lenin saw the
connection between the internal problems of the revolution and its world
problems (well, now!) Radek adds:

‘But Lenin did not _sharpen_ only the concept of this connection between
the maintenance of the socialist dictatorship in Russia and aid from the
Western European proletariat, as it was _excessively sharpened by
Trotsky’s formulation_, namely, that it must be _state_ aid, that is,
the aid of the already victorious Western European proletariat.’ (My
emphasis – _L.T._)

Frankly, I did not trust my eyes when I read these lines. To what end
did Radek require this worthless weapon from the arsenal of the
epigones? This is simply a shamefaced rehash of the Stalinist banalities
which we always used to make such thorough game of. Apart from
everything else, the quotation shows that Radek has a very poor notion
of the fundamental landmarks of Lenin’s path. Lenin, unlike Stalin, not
only never contrasted the pressure of the European proletariat upon the
bourgeois power to the capture of power by the proletariat; on the
contrary, he formulated the question of revolutionary aid from without
much more sharply than I. In the epoch of the first revolution, he
repeated tirelessly that we should not retain democracy (not even
democracy!) without the socialist revolution in Europe. Generally
speaking, in 1917-18 and the years that followed, Lenin did not consider
and estimate the fate of our revolution in any way other than in
connection with the socialist revolution that had begun in Europe. He
asserted openly, for example: ‘Without the victory of the revolution in
Germany, we are doomed.’ He said this in 1918, that is, _not_ with the
‘economic level’ of 1905 ; and he had in mind not future decades, but
the period immediately ahead, which was a matter of a few years, if not
months.

Lenin dozens of times: If we have held out ‘the reason ... was that a
fortunate combination of circumstances protected us for a short time
from international imperialism’ (for a short time! – _L.T._). And
further: ‘International imperialism could not under any circumstances,
on any condition, live side by side with the Soviet Republic ... In this
sphere conflict is inevitable.’ And the conclusion? Isn’t it the
pacifist hope in the ‘pressure’ of the proletariat or in the
‘neutralization’ of the bourgeoisie? No, the conclusion reads: ‘Here
lies the greatest difficulty of the Russian Revolution ... the necessity
of calling forth an international revolution.’ (XV, 126 [1]) When was
this said and written? Not in 1905, when Nicholas II negotiated with
Wilhelm II on the suppression of the revolution and when I advanced my
‘sharpened’ formula, but in 1918, 1919 and the following years.

Here is what Lenin said, looking back, at the Third Congress of the
Comintern:

‘It was clear to us that without the support of the international world
revolution the victory of the proletarian revolution [in Russia –
_L.T._] was impossible. Before the revolution and even after it, we
thought: Either revolution breaks out in the other countries, in the
capitalistically more developed countries, immediately, or at least very
quickly, or we must perish. Notwithstanding this conviction, we did all
we possibly could to preserve the Soviet system under all circumstances,
come what may, because we knew that we were working not only for
ourselves but also for the international revolution. We knew this, we
repeatedly expressed this conviction before the October Revolution,
immediately afterward, and at the time we signed the Brest-Litovsk
Treaty. _And, speaking generally, this was correct_. In actual fact,
however, events did not proceed along as straight a line as we
expected.’ (_Minutes of the Third Congress of the Comintern_, Russian
edition, p.354 [2])

From 1921 onward, the movement began to proceed along a line that was
not so straight as I, together with Lenin, had expected in 1917-19 (and
not only in 1905). But it nevertheless did develop along the line of the
irreconcilable contradictions between the workers’ state and the
bourgeois world. One of the two must perish! The workers’ state can be
preserved from mortal dangers, not only military but also economic, only
by the victorious development of the proletarian revolution in the West.
The attempt to discover two positions, Lenin’s and mine, on this
question, is the height of theoretical slovenliness. At least re-read
Lenin, do not slander him, do not feed us with stale Stalinist mush!

But the plunge downward does not stop even here. After Radek inventing
the story that Lenin considered adequate the ‘simple’ (in essence,
reformist, Purcellian) aid of the world proletariat, while Trotsky
‘exaggeratedly demanded’ only state aid, that is, revolutionary aid,
Radek continues :

‘Experience showed that _on this point, too_, Lenin was right, The
European proletariat was not yet able to capture power, but it was
strong enough, during the intervention, to prevent the world bourgeoisie
from throwing substantial forces against us. Thereby it helped us
maintain the Soviet power. Fear of the labour movement, along with the
antagonisms in the capitalist world itself, was the main force that has
guaranteed the maintenance of peace during the eight years, since the
end of the intervention.’

This passage, while it does not sparkle with originality against the
background of the exercises written by the literary functionaries of our
time, is nevertheless noteworthy for its combination of historical
anachronisms, political confusion and the grossest errors of principle.

From Radek’s words it would follow that Lenin in 1905 foretold in his
pamphlet TWO TACTICS (this is the only work to which Radek refers) that
the relationship of forces between states and classes after 1917 would
be such as to exclude for a long time the possibility of a large-scale
military intervention against us. In contrast to this, Trotsky in 1905
did not foresee the situation that would necessarily arise after the
imperialist war, but only reckoned with the realities of that time, such
as the mighty Hohenzollern army, the very strong Hapsburg army, the
mighty French Bourse, etc. This is truly a monstrous anachronism, which
becomes even more complicated by its ridiculous inner contradictions.
For, according to Radek, my principal mistake consisted precisely of the
fact that I did put forward the prospect of the dictatorship of the
proletariat ‘with the level of development of 1905’. Now the second
mistake becomes plain: I did not consider the prospect of the
dictatorship of the proletariat put forward by me on the eve of the 1905
Revolution in the light of the international situation which arose only
after 1917. When Stalin’s usual arguments look like this, we don’t
wonder about it, for we know well enough his ‘level of development’, in
1917 as well as in 1928. But how did Radek fall into such company?

Yet even this is not yet the worst. The worst lies in the fact that
Radek has skipped over the boundary that separates Marxism from
opportunism, the revolutionary from the pacifist position. It is a
question of nothing less than the struggle against war, that is, of _how
and with what methods war can be averted or stopped; by the pressure of
the proletariat upon the bourgeoisie or by civil war to overthrow the
bourgeoisie?_ Radek has unwittingly introduced a fundamental question of
proletarian policy into the controversy between us.

Does Radek want to say that I ‘ignore’ not only the peasantry but also
the pressure of the proletariat upon the bourgeoisie, and have taken
into consideration the proletarian revolution exclusively? It is hardly
to be assumed that he will defend such an absurdity, worthy of a
Thaelmann, a Semard or a Monnosseau. At the Third Congress of the
Comintern, the ultra-lefts of that time (Zinoviev, Thalheimer,
Thaelmann, Bela Kun, etc.) advocated tactics of putschism in the West in
order to save the USSR. Together with Lenin, I explained to them as
popularly as possible that the best possible assistance they could
render us would be systematically and in a planned way to consolidate
their positions and prepare themselves for the capture of power, instead
of improvising revolutionary adventures for our sakes. At that time,
regrettably enough, Radek was not on the side of Lenin and Trotsky, but
on the side of Zinoviev and Bukharin. But Radek surely recollects – at
any rate, the minutes of the Third Congress recollect it – that the
essence of the argument of Lenin and myself consisted precisely of
assailing the irrationally ‘sharpened formulation’ of the ultra-lefts.
After we had explained to them that the strengthening of the party and
the pressure of the proletariat are very serious factors in internal and
international relations, we Marxists added that ‘pressure’ is only a
function of the revolutionary struggle for power and depends entirely
upon the development of this struggle. For this reason, Lenin delivered
a speech at the end of the Third Congress, at a big private session of
the delegates, which was directed against tendencies to passivity and
waiting upon events, and closed with approximately the following moral:
Engage in no adventures, but, dear friends, please do not tarry, for
with ‘pressure’ alone we cannot last long.

Radek refers to the fact that the European proletariat was not able to
take power after the war, but that it prevented the bourgeoisie from
crushing us. I also had more than one occasion to speak of this.
Nevertheless, the European proletariat succeeded in preventing our
destruction only because the pressure of the proletariat coincided with
the very grave objective consequences of the imperialist war and the
world antagonisms aggravated by it. It is impossible to say which of
these elements was of more decisive significance: the struggle within
the imperialist camp, the economic collapse, or the pressure of the
proletariat; but the question cannot be put in that way. That peaceful
pressure alone is inadequate was demonstrated too clearly by the
imperialist war, which came in spite of all ‘pressure’. And finally, and
this is most important, if the pressure of the proletariat in the first,
most critical years of the Soviet Republic proved to be effective
enough, then it was only because at that time for the workers of Europe
it was not a question of exerting pressure, but of struggling for power
– and this struggle repeatedly assumed the form of civil war.

In 1905, there was neither a war nor an economic collapse in Europe, and
capitalism and militarism were in full-blooded frenzy. The ‘pressure’ of
the Social Democrats of that time was absolutely incapable of preventing
Wilhelm II or Franz Josef from marching into the Kingdom of Poland with
their troops, or, in general, from coming to the aid of the Tsar. And
even in 1918, the pressure of the German proletariat did not prevent
Hohenzollern from occupying the Baltic provinces and the Ukraine, and if
he did not get as far as Moscow then it was only because his military
forces were not adequate. Otherwise, how and why did we conclude the
Brest peace ? How easily yesterday is forgotten! Lenin did not confine
himself to hope for ‘pressure’ by the proletariat, but repeatedly
asserted that without revolution in Germany we should certainly perish.
This was correct in essence, although a greater period of time has
intervened. Let there be no illusions; we have received an undated
moratorium. We live, as before, under the conditions of a
‘breathing-space’.

A condition in which the proletariat is as yet unable to seize power,
but can prevent the bourgeoisie from utilizing its power for a war, is a
condition of unstable class equilibrium in its highest expression. An
equilibrium is called unstable precisely when it cannot last long. It
must tip toward one side or the other. Either the proletariat comes to
power or else the bourgeoisie, by a series of crushing blows, weakens
the revolutionary pressure sufficiently to regain freedom of action,
above all in the question of war and peace.

Only a reformist can picture the pressure of the proletariat upon the
bourgeois stale as a permanently increasing factor and as a guarantee
against intervention. It is precisely out of this conception that arose
the theory of the construction of socialism in one country, given the
_neutralization_ of the world bourgeoisie (Stalin). Just as the owl
takes flight at twilight, so also did the Stalinist theory of the
neutralization of the bourgeoisie by the pressure of the proletariat
arise only when the conditions which engendered this theory had begun to
disappear.

The world situation underwent abrupt changes in the period when the
falsely interpreted postwar experience led to the deceptive hope that we
could get along without the revolution of the European proletariat by
substituting for it ‘support’ in general. The defeats of the proletariat
have paved the way for capitalist stabilization. The collapse of
capitalism after the war has been overcome. New generations have grown
up that have not tasted the horrors of the imperialist slaughter. The
result is that the bourgeoisie is now freer to dispose of its war
machine than it was five or eight years ago.

As the working masses move to the Left, this process will undoubtedly,
as it develops further, once more increase their pressure upon the
bourgeois state. But this is a two-edged factor. It is precisely the
growing danger from the side of the working class that can, at a later
stage, drive the bourgeoisie to decisive steps in order 90 show that it
is master in its own house, and to attempt to destroy the main centre of
contagion, the Soviet Republic. _The struggle against war is decided not
by pressure upon the government but only by the revolutionary struggle
for power._ The ‘pacifist’ effects of the proletarian class struggle,
like its reformist effects, are only by-products of the revolutionary
struggle for power; they have only a relative strength and can easily
turn into their opposite, that is, they can drive the bourgeoisie to
take the road to war. The bourgeoisie’s fear of the labour movement, to
which Radek refers so one-sidedly, is the most substantial hope of all
social-pacifists. But ‘fear’ of the revolution alone decides nothing.
The revolution decides. For this reason, Lenin said in 1905 that the
only guarantee against the monarchist restoration, and, in 1918, against
the restoration of capitalism, is not the pressure of the proletariat
but its revolutionary victory in Europe. This is the only correct way of
putting the question. In spite of the lengthy character of the
‘breathing-space’, Lenin’s formulation retains its full force even
today. I, too, formulated the question in the very same way. I wrote in
_Results and Prospects_ in 1906:

‘It is precisely the fear of the revolt of the proletariat that compels
the bourgeois parties, even while voting monstrous sums for military
expenditure, to make solemn declarations in favour of peace, to dream of
International Arbitration Courts and even of the organization of a
United States of Europe. These pitiful declamations can, of course,
abolish neither the antagonism between states nor armed conflicts.’ (OUR
REVOLUTION, _Results and Prospects_, p.238 [3])

The basic mistake of the Sixth Congress lies in this, that in order to
save the pacifist and national-reformist perspectives of
Stalin-Bukharin, it ran after revolutionary-technical recipes against
the war danger, separating the struggle against war from the struggle
for power.

The inspirers of the Sixth Congress, these alarmed builders of socialism
in one country – in essence, frightened pacifists – made the attempt to
perpetuate the ‘neutralization’ of the bourgeoisie through intensified
‘pressure’ methods. But since they couldn’t help knowing that their
leadership up to now in a series of countries had led to the defeat of
the revolution and had thrown the international vanguard of the
proletariat far back, they endeavoured first of all to jettison the
‘sharpened formulation’ of Marxism, which indissolubly ties up the
problem of war with the problem of the revolution. They have converted
the struggle against war into a self-sufficient task. Lest the national
parties oversleep the decisive hour, they have proclaimed the war danger
to be permanent, unpostponable and immediate. Everything that happens in
the world happens for the purpose of war. War is now no longer an
instrument of the bourgeois regime; the bourgeois regime is an
instrument of war. As a consequence, the struggle of the Communist
International against war is converted into a system of ritualistic
formulas, which are repeated automatically on every occasion and, losing
their effectiveness, evaporate. Stalinist national socialism tends to
convert the Communist International into an auxiliary means of
‘pressure’ upon the bourgeoisie. It is just this tendency, and not
Marxism, that Radek helps with his hasty, slovenly, superficial
criticism. He has lost the compass and has got into a strange current
that may carry him to far different shores.

Alma-Ata, October 1928

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. _Speech on the Question of War and Peace_, 7 March 1918, 4th edition,
XXVII, pp.69-70. SELECTED WORKS, English edition, VII, 288.

2. VERBATIM REPORT OF THE 3RD CONGRESS OF THE COMMUNIST INTERNATIONAL,
Petrograd 1922, Lenin’s speech of 5 July 1922, 4th edition, XXII, 456.
SELECTED WORKS, English edition, IX, p.227.

3. See RESULTS AND PROSPECTS, _Europe and Revolution_.

The Permanent Revolution



9. EPILOGUE


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

The prediction, or apprehension which I expressed in the concluding
lines of the previous chapter was, as the reader knows, confirmed a few
months later. The criticism of the permanent revolution only served
Radek as a lever to push himself away from the Opposition. Our whole
book proves, we hope, that Radek’s passage into the camp of Stalin did
not come to us unexpectedly. But even apostasy has its gradations, its
levels of debasement. In his declaration of repentance, Radek completely
rehabilitates Stalin’s policy in China. This means plumbing the lowest
depths of betrayal. It only remains for me to quote an extract from my
reply to the declaration of penitence by Radek, Preobrazhensky and
Smilga, which puts them on the black list of political cynics:

‘As befits all self-respecting bankrupts, the trio has not of course
failed to take cover behind the permanent revolution. The most tragic
experience of the whole recent history of the defeats of opportunism –
the Chinese Revolution – this trio of capitulators seeks to dismiss with
a cheap oath guaranteeing that it has nothing in common with the theory
of the permanent revolution.

‘Radek and Smilga obstinately defended the subordination of the Chinese
Communist Party to the bourgeois Kuomintang, not only up to Chiang
Kai-shek’s coup d’etat but also afterwards. Preobrazhensky mumbled
something inarticulate, as he always does when political questions are
involved. A remarkable fact: all those in the ranks of the Opposition
who defended the subordination of the Communist Party to the Kuomintang
turned out to be capitulators. Not a single Oppositionist who remained
true to his banner bears this mark, which is a mark of notorious shame.
Three-quarters of a century after the appearance of the COMMUNIST
MANIFESTO, a quarter of a century after the founding of the party of the
Bolsheviks, these ill-starred “Marxists” considered it possible to
defend the keeping of the Communists in the cage of the Kuomintang! In
his answer to my charges, Radek already then, just as in his letter of
repentence today, tried to frighten us with the “isolation” of the
proletariat from the peasantry in the event of the Communist Party’s
withdrawing from the bourgeois Kuomintang. Shortly before that, Radek
called the Canton government a peasants’ and workers’ government and
thereby helped Stalin to disguise the subordination of the proletariat
to the bourgeoisie. With what are these shameful deeds, the consequences
of this blindness, this stupidity, this betrayal of Marxism, to be
covered? With what, indeed! With an indictment of the permanent
revolution!

‘As far back as February 1928, Radek, who was already looking for
pretexts for his capitulation, adhered promptly to the resolution on the
Chinese question adopted by the February 1928 Plenum of the Executive
Committee of the Comintern. This resolution brands the Trotskyists as
liquidators because they called defeats and were not willing to consider
the victorious Chinese counterrevolution as the highest stage of the
Chinese Revolution. In this February resolution the course towards armed
uprising and Soviets was proclaimed. For every person not entirely
devoid of political sense and tempered by revolutionary experience, this
resolution constituted an example of the most revolting and most
irresponsible adventurism. Radek adhered to it. Preobrazhensky
approached the matter no less ingeniously than Radek, only from the
opposite end. The Chinese Revolution, he wrote, is already defeated, and
defeated for a long time. A new revolution will not come soon. Is it
worth while squabbling about China with the centrists? On this theme,
Preobrazhensky sent out lengthy epistles. When I read them in Alma-Ata,
I experienced a feeling of shame. What did these people learn in the
school of Lenin? I asked myself over and over again. Preobrazhensky’s
premises were diametrically opposed to Radek’s premises, yet the
conclusions were the same: both of them were inspired by the great
desire for Yaroslavsky to embrace them fraternally through the good
offices of Menzhinsky. [1] Oh, of course, they did it for the good of
the revolution. These are not careerists. Not at all. They are simply
helpless, ideologically bankrupt individuals.

‘To the adventurist resolution of the February Plenum of the ECCI (1928)
I already then counterposed a course towards the mobilization of the
Chinese workers under democratic slogans, including the slogan of a
Constituent Assembly for China. But here the ill-starred trio fell into
ultra-leftism; that was cheap and committed them to nothing. Democratic
slogans? Never. “This is a gross mistake on Trotsky’s part”. Only
soviets for China – not a farthing less! It is hard to conceive of
anything more senseless than this – by your leave – position. The slogan
of soviets for an epoch of bourgeois reaction is a baby’s rattle, i.e.,
a mockery of soviets. But even in the epoch of revolution, that is, in
the epoch of the direct building of soviets, we did not withdraw the
democratic slogans. We did not withdraw them until the real soviets,
which had already conquered power, clashed before the eyes of the masses
with the real institutions of democracy. This signifies in the language
of Lenin (and not of the philistine Stalin and his parrots): not
skipping over the democratic stage in the development of the country.

‘Without the democratic programme – constituent assembly, eight-hour
day, confiscation of the land, national independence of China, right of
self-determination for the peoples living within it – without this
democratic programme, the Communist Party of China is bound hand and
foot and is compelled to surrender the field passively to the Chinese
Social-Democrats who may, with the aid of Stalin, Radek and company,
assume the place of the Communist Party.

‘Thus: although following in the wake of the Opposition, Radek
nevertheless missed what was most important in the Chinese Revolution,
for he defended the subordination of the Communist Party to the
bourgeois Kuomintang. Radek missed the Chinese counter-revolution,
supporting the course toward armed uprising after the Canton adventure.
Radek today skips over the period of the counter-revolution and the
struggle for democracy by waving aside the tasks of the transition
period in favour of the most abstract idea of soviets outside of time
and space. But in return Radek swears that he has nothing in common with
the permanent revolution. That is gratifying. That is consoling ...

‘The anti-Marxist theory of Stalin and Radek means for China, India and
all the countries of the East, an altered but not improved repetition of
the Kuomintang experiment.

‘On the basis of all the experience of the Russian and Chinese
Revolution, on the basis of the teachings of Marx and Lenin, tested in
the light of these revolutions, the Opposition affirms:

  ‘That the new Chinese revolution can overthrow the existing regime and
  transfer the power to the masses of the people only in the form of the
  dictatorship of the proletariat;

  ‘That the “democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the
  peasantry”, in contrast to the dictatorship of the proletariat which
  leads the peasantry and realizes the programme of democracy, is a
  fiction, a self-deception, or what is worse still – Kerenskyism or
  Kuomintangism.

‘Between the regime of Kerensky and Chiang Kai-shek, on the one hand,
and the dictatorship of the proletariat on the other, there is no
half-way, intermediate revolutionary regime and there can be none.
Whoever puts forward the bare formula of such a regime is shamefully
deceiving the workers of the East and is preparing new catastrophes.

‘The Opposition says to the workers of the East: Bankrupted by the
inner-party machinations, the capitulators are helping Stalin to sow the
seeds of centrism, to throw sand in your eyes, to stop up your ears, to
befuddle your heads. On the one hand, you are rendered helpless in the
face of stark bourgeois dictatorship by being forbidden to engage in a
struggle for democracy. On the other hand, there is unrolled before you
a panorama of some sort of saving, non-proletarian dictatorship, which
facilitates a fresh reincarnation of the Kuomintang in the future, that
is, further defeats for the workers’ and peasants’ revolution.

‘Such preachers are betrayers. Learn to distrust them, workers of the
East; learn to despise them, learn to drive them out of your ranks !
...’

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. Menzhinsky was at that time the head of the GPU; Yaroslavsky was one
of the heads of the Central Control Commission of the party and was
especially active in attacking the Opposition and expelling many of its
adherents from the party.

The Permanent Revolution



10. WHAT IS THE PERMANENT REVOLUTION? BASIC POSTULATES


------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

I hope that the reader will not object if, to end this book, I attempt,
without fear of repetition, to formulate succinctly my principal
conclusions.

1. The theory of the permanent revolution now demands the greatest
attention from every Marxist, for the course of the class and
ideological struggle has fully and finally raised this question from the
realm of reminiscences over old differences of opinion among Russian
Marxists, and converted it into a question of the character, the inner
connexions and methods of the international revolution in general.

2. With regard to countries with a belated bourgeois development,
especially the colonial and semi-colonial countries, the theory of the
permanent revolution signifies that the complete and genuine solution of
their tasks of achieving _democracy and national emancipation_ is
conceivable only through the dictatorship of the proletariat as the
leader of the subjugated nation, above all of its peasant masses.

3. Not only the agrarian, but also the national question assigns to the
peasantry – the overwhelming majority of the population in backward
countries – an exceptional place in the democratic revolution. Without
an alliance of the proletariat with the peasantry the tasks of the
democratic revolution cannot be solved, nor even seriously posed. But
the alliance of these two classes can be realized in no other way than
through an irreconcilable struggle against the influence of the
national-liberal bourgeoisie.

4. No matter what the first episodic stages of the revolution may be in
the individual countries, the realization of the revolutionary alliance
between the proletariat and the peasantry is conceivable only under the
political leadership of the proletariat vanguard, organized in the
Communist Party. This in turn means that the victory of the democratic
revolution is conceivable only through the dictatorship of the
proletariat which bases itself upon the alliance with the peasantry and
solves first of all the tasks of the democratic revolution.

5. Assessed historically, the old slogan of Bolshevism – ’the democratic
dictatorship of the proletariat and peasantry’ – expressed precisely the
above-characterized relationship of the proletariat, the peasantry and
the liberal bourgeoisie. This has been confirmed by the experience of
October. But Lenin’s old formula did not settle in advance the problem
of what the reciprocal relations would be between the proletariat and
the peasantry within the revolutionary bloc. In other words, the formula
deliberately retained a certain algebraic quality, which had to make way
for more precise arithmetical quantities in the process of historical
experience. However, the latter showed, and under circumstances that
exclude any kind of misinterpretation, that no matter how great the
revolutionary role of the peasantry may be, it nevertheless cannot be an
independent role and even less a leading one. The peasant follows either
the worker or the bourgeois. This means that the ‘democratic
dictatorship of the proletariat and peasantry’ is only conceivable as a
_dictatorship of the proletariat that leads the peasant masses behind
it_.

6. A democratic dictatorship of the prolelariat and peasantry, as a
regime that is distinguished from the dictatorship of the proletariat by
its class content, might be realized only in a case where an
_independent_ revolutionary party could be constituted, expressing the
interests of the peasants and in general of petty bourgeois democracy –
a party capable of conquering power with this or that degree of aid from
the proletariat, and of determining its revolutionary programme. As all
modern history attests – especially the Russian experience of the last
twenty-five years – an insurmountable obstacle on the road to the
creation of a peasants’ party is the petty-bourgeoisie’s lack of
economic and political independence and its deep internal
differentiation. By reason of this the upper sections of the
petty-bourgeoisie (of the peasantry) go along with the big bourgeoisie
in all decisive cases, especially in war and in revolution; the lower
sections go along with the proletariat; the intermediate section being
thus compelled to choose between the two extreme poles. Between
Kerenskyism and the Bolshevik power, between the Kuomintang and the
dictatorship of the proletariat, there is not and cannot be any
intermediate stage, that is, no democratic dictatorship of the workers
and peasants.

7. The Comintern’ s endeavour to foist upon the Eastern countries the
slogan of the democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and peasantry,
finally and long ago exhausted by history, can have only a reactionary
effect. lnsofar as this slogan is counterposed to the slogan of the
dictatorship of the proletariat, it contributes politically to the
dissolution of the proletariat in the petty-bourgeois masses and thus
creates the most favourable conditions for the hegemony of the national
bourgeoisie and consequently for the collapse of the democratic
revolution. The introduction of the slogan into the programme of the
Comintern is a direct betrayal of Marxism and of the October tradition
of Bolshevism.

8. The dictatorship of the proletariat which has risen to power as the
leader of the democratic revolution is inevitably and, very quickly
confronted with tasks, the fulfillment of which is bound up with deep
inroads into the rights of bourgeois property. The democratic revolution
grows over directly into the socialist revolution and thereby becomes a
_permanent_ revolution.

9. The conquest of power by the proletariat does not complete the
revolution, but only opens it. Socialist construction is conceivable
only on the foundation of the class struggle, on a national and
international scale. This struggle, under the conditions of an
overwhelming predominance of capitalist relationships on the world
arena, must inevitably lead to explosions, that is, internally to civil
wars and externally to revolutionary wars. Therein lies the permanent
character of the socialist revolution as such, regardless of whether it
is a backward country that is involved, which only yesterday
accomplished its democratic revolution, or an old capitalist country
which already has behind it a long epoch of democracy and
parliamentarism.

10. The completion of the socialist revolution within national limits is
unthinkable. One of the basic reasons for the crisis in bourgeois
society is the fact that the productive forces created by it can no
longer be reconciled with the framework of the national state. From this
follows on the one hand, imperialist wars, on the other, the utopia of a
bourgeois United States of Europe. The socialist revolution begins on
the national arena, it unfolds on the international arena, and is
completed on the world arena. Thus, the socialist revolution becomes a
permanent revolution in a newer and broader sense of the word; it
attains completion, only in the final victory of the new society on our
entire planet.

11. The above-outlined sketch of the development of the world revolution
eliminates the question of countries that are ‘mature’ or ‘immature’ for
socialism in the spirit of that pedantic, lifeless classification given
by the present programme of the Comintem. Insofar as capitalism has
created a world market, a world division of labour and world productive
forces, it has also prepared world economy as a whole for socialist
transformation.

Different countries will go through this process at different tempos.
Backward countries may, under certain conditions, arrive at the
dictatorship of the proletariat sooner than advanced countries, but they
will come later than the latter to socialism.

A backward colonial or semi-colonial country, the proletariat of which
is insufficiently prepared to unite the peasantry and take power, is
thereby incapable of bringing the democratic revolution to its
conclusion. Contrariwise, in a country where the proletariat has power
in its hands as the result of the democratic revolution, the subsequent
fate of the dictatorship and socialism depends in the last analysis not
only and not so much upon the national productive forces as upon the
development of the international socialist revolution.

12. The theory of socialism in one country, which rose on the yeast of
the reaction against October, is the only theory that consistently and
to the very end opposes the theory of the permanent revolution.

The attempt of the epigones, under the lash of our criticism, to confine
the application of the theory of socialism in one country exclusively to
Russia, because of its specific characteristics (its vastness and its
natural resources), does not improve matters but only makes them worse.
The break with the internationalist position always and invariably leads
to national _messianism_, that is, to attributing special superiorities
and qualities to one’s own country, which allegedly permit it to play a
role to which other countries cannot attain.

The world division of labour, the dependence of Soviet industry upon
foreign technology, the dependence of the productive forces of the
advanced countries of Europe upon Asiatic raw materials, etc., etc.,
make the construction of an independent socialist society in any single
country in the world impossible.

13. The theory of Stalin and Bukharin, running counter to the entire
experience of the Russian revolution, not only sets up the democratic
revolution mechanically in contrast to the socialist revolution, but
also makes a breach between the national revolution and the
international revolution.

This theory imposes upon revolutions in backward countries the task of
establishing an unrealizable regime of democratic dictatorship, which it
counterposes to the dictatorship of the proletariat. Thereby this theory
introduces illusions and fictions into politics, paralyses the struggle
for power of the proletariat in the East, and hampers the victory of the
colonial revolution.

The very seizure of power by the proletariat signifies, from the
standpoint of the epigones’ theory, the completion of the revolution
(’to the extent of nine-tenths’, according to Stalin’s formula) and the
opening of the epoch of national reforms. The theory of the kulak
growing into socialism and the theory of the ‘neutralization’ of the
world bourgeoisie are consequently inseparable from the theory of
socialism in one country. They stand or fall together.

By the theory of national socialism, the Communist International is
down-graded to an auxiliary weapon useful only for the struggle against
military intervention. The present policy of the Comintern, its regime
and the selection of its leading personnel correspond entirely to the
demotion of the Communist lnternational to the role of an auxiliary unit
which is not destined to solve independent tasks.

14. The programme of the Comintern created by Bukharin is eclectic
through and through. It makes the hopeless attempt to reconcile the
theory of socialism in one country with Marxist internationalism, which
is, however, inseparable from the permanent character of the world
revolution. The struggle of the Communist Left Opposition for a correct
policy and a healthy regime in the Communist lnternational is
inseparably bound up with the struggle for the Marxist programme. The
question of the programme is in turn inseparable from the question of
the two mutually exclusive theories: the theory of permanent revolution
and the theory of socialism in one country. The problem of the permanent
revolution has long ago outgrown the episodic differences of opinion
between Lenin and Trotsky, which were completely exhausted by history.
The struggle is between the basic ideas of Marx and Lenin on the one
side and the eclecticism of the centrists on the other.
